Authors
Alex Fung
Number of Reviews
84

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
KISS THE GIRLS (Paramount - 1997)
Starring Morgan Freeman, Ashley Judd, Cary Elwes
Screenplay by David Klass, based on the novel by James Patterson
Produced by David Brown, Joe Wizan
Directed by Gary Fleder
Running time: 120 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   In terms of filmgoing, there is little which wounds the heart more
   than watching an accomplished talent having their services wasted in
   an unambitious film project.  It was maddening enough to suffer
   through Mira Sorvino wallowing through a determinedly generic MIMIC a
   few months ago, but the suspense-thriller KISS THE GIRLS is a far
   more egregious offender, ensnaring the stellar talents of Morgan
   Freeman and Ashley Judd in a formulaic film which proves to be far
   beneath them.
   I sat through the screening stupefied, bewildered as to what could
   have drawn these two gifted performers to this project.  Mr. Freeman
   is surely one of the truly great actors currently working -- his mere
   presence onscreen commands attention like no other American actor,
   and his marvelously expressive voice conveys bountiful wisdom. 
   Meanwhile, Ms. Judd is one of today's most exciting young actors,
   turning in a flurry of astonishingly accomplished performances since
   her feature film debut in Victor Nunez's RUBY IN PARADISE -- not even
   the sheer brevity of her turns in Wayne Wang's SMOKE and Oliver
   Stone's NATURAL BORN KILLERS (where her footage was ultimately
   excised for the domestic theatrical release) could prevent her from
   outshining the vast majority of lead performances seen in recent
   film.  What on earth could these two have seen in KISS THE GIRLS
   which would have drawn them to the film?
   It surely couldn't have been David Klass' screenplay, which is
   woefully uninspired and formulaic -- one can literally tick off every
   tired convention in KISS THE GIRLS like a checklist.  The film opens
   most unpromisingly with the obligatory scene to establish the prowess
   of Washington D.C. forensic psychologist Alex Cross (he faces a
   suicidal woman) -- which, incidentally, seems rather superfluous with
   Mr. Freeman onboard as the character; it goes without saying that the
   instant he appears onscreen, the audience immediately associates his
   character with supreme competency -- and continues to throw in every
   hoary staple of the serial killer thriller genre: the stakeouts, the
   taunting messages from the killer, the near-captures, chase scenes
   galore, preferably on foot in some gloomy, obstacle-ridden area.  To
   capitalize on the cyber-craze, there's even an Internet reference
   (although thankfully it's not as overblown as it was in Jon Amiel's
   otherwise superior genre entry COPYCAT).  While it's bad enough that
   the screenplay by Mr. Klass is so by-the-numbers, what's even worse
   is the lack of interesting or inventive dialogue to buoy the film; in
   every aspect, this is a remarkably bland script.
   Many have drawn parallels between Mr. Freeman's similar character
   types in David Fincher's SE7EN (where he plays veteran homicide
   detective Somerset) and in KISS THE GIRLS, but despite their shared
   genre, there is clearly no comparison between these two vastly
   disparate films in terms of effectiveness -- only one of these films
   generates anything remotely close to resembling a facsimile of
   suspense or tension.  It's rather abysmal that the inherently
   gruesome situation of a crazed abductor on the prowl can wind up
   being so bla, and rather amazing that the film's protagonists do
   not prove to be compelling, even when they're placed into jeopardy.
   One ends up watching KISS THE GIRLS with a great deal of disinterest.
   KISS THE GIRLS focuses on the hunt for a North Carolina man (who goes
   by the name Casanova) that "collects": he methodically stalks,
   kidnaps, imprisons and rapes (and occasionally kills) young, pretty,
   college-age women. The film attempts to intrigue by teasing at the
   killer's identity; until the film's climax, his face is
   systematically obscured, although anyone not lulled by the film's
   sheer familiarity into a comatose state should realise his identity
   within the first fifteen minutes (and, if not, the tactless lingering
   shots on Casanova's alter-ego by sophomore feature film director Gary
   Fleder should be a sure giveaway), but one can hardly even care who
   he is, given the lacklustre attention paid to him in the film.  For a
   serial killer/rapist film, KISS THE GIRLS is mighty disinterested in
   the serial killer; Casanova's actions are obviously supposed to be
   construed as monstrous and lurid, and yet the film distinctly
   neglects him and never really delves its focus into his twisted
   world.  We can't even really stir up much compassion for his captives
   either, as we barely see them onscreen and they barely register.
   When one contrasts Brooke Smith's terrifying struggle in the well in
   Jonathan Demme's THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS with KISS THE GIRLS' group
   of imprisoned girls catatonically assembled in the killer's chamber
   of horrors while Alex's niece Naomi Cross (Gina Ravera) plays the
   violin, it is clear how much the filmmakers here have missed the
   mark.  Even the subterranean dungeon, glimpsed all-too-briefly, lacks
   any foreboding aura of dread or menace.
   Kate McTiernan (Ms. Judd) is a interning med student who's snatched
   from her home by Casanova in the early goings, and locked into a
   dungeon-like cell.  Forbidden to call for help and warned not to try
   to use any of her kickboxing arsenal on him, she naturally does both.
   (The scene in the dungeon where Kate persuades her unseen fellow
   captives to reluctantly call out their names in an act of defiance to
   Casanova is meant to be powerfully haunting and creepy, but frankly
   reminded me of a television commercial.)  After Kate unloads on
   Casanova and manages to escape from the dungeon, she finds herself in
   a madly dashing through a nondescript barren forest, her abductor in
   hot pursuit.  Even Kate's flee through the woods, clearly intended to
   echo the similar scene in Tobe Hooper's classic THE TEXAS CHAIN SAW
   MASSACRE, is merely a pale imitation: the sequence in Mr. Hooper's
   film depicted terror in its most primal form; in KISS THE GIRLS, it
   just looks like cinematographer Aaron Schneider kept falling over.
   In fact, Mr. Fleder, whose first film was THINGS TO DO IN DENVER WHEN
   YOU'RE DEAD, seems to be a fan of using disorientation as a
   substitute for dynamism, both in Kate's escape scene and in her
   kickboxing scenes, where a flurry of shots of flying fists, swinging
   legs, and sweaty torsos make do in place of a choreographed,
   simple-to-follow kinetic sequence.  It's distracting and nonsensical,
   and ultimately makes for rather aggravating viewing.
   By the climax of KISS THE GIRLS, I had gone from shaking my head in
   disbelief to holding it in disgust, as the heroes and the villain
   face off in typical fashion, and seem to lose 50 I.Q. points along
   the way.  The predictable battle-to-the-death conclusion is tired
   material, and this film takes the policy of dispatching the villain
   in an original fashion to ridiculous new ends; as the heroic music
   swelled in its aftermath, it was all I could do from laughing aloud.
   There are a lot of leaps in the storyline for KISS THE GIRLS, and
   numerous characters who essentially serve no point are are probably
   carry-overs from the novel (which, clearly, I haven't read).  The
   film's strengths are predictable -- the performances of Mr. Freeman
   and Ms. Judd, who customarily turn in solid, professional work and
   manage to elevate the film to near-mediocrity; they're literally the
   only reason to catch KISS THE GIRLS.
   So why did Mr. Freeman and Ms. Judd sign on for this project?  I'm
   guessing here, but it's probably the case that they were both fans of
   James Patterson's best-selling novel, which served as the source
   material for the screenplay.  I, however, would like to delude myself
   into believing that they had signed onto this project for the
   opportunity to work with each other, and that consequently KISS THE
   GIRLS didn't end up being a complete waste for them.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I'll never forget you.  You're too weird."
        - David Krumholtz, ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES

Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
With these three words, director/screenwriter Neil LaBute has crafted
an audacious opus of ruthlessness and manipulation unlikely to be
surpassed this year in its raw, savage brutality.  Certain to litter
year-end Top 10 lists across the board, IN THE COMPANY OF MEN cuts
straight to the core in its powerful depiction of misanthropy bred by
tumultuous anxiety associated with the modern cutthroat corporate
workplace -- it's a remarkably auspicious first feature for Mr.
LaBute.
Chad (Aaron Eckhart) and Howard (Matt Malloy) are diametric opposites
who make for unlikely friends: while Chad is tall, handsome,
assertive, superficially charismatic, and confidently authoritative,
Howard is short, bookish, insecure, awkward, and rather hapless.
However, it is Howard who wields the power in their professional
lives; he holds the title of project manager and Chad is his
subordinate when the two meet up at the film's outset in an airport
courtesy lounge; they've been assigned for six weeks to a Midwestern
office of their company.  Howard's authority, though, is in title
only: it's Chad who is the true leader, and when he proposes a little
sport -- to soothe their bruised male egos and as a bit of vindictive
payback to the female gender, he suggests that they find some
vulnerable and susceptible wallflower that they would both romance,
raising her spirits to dizzying heights ... and them dashing them,
and her, to pieces by unceremoniously dumping her -- Howard is unable
to resist.  They find their perfect mark in Christine (Stacy
Edwards), a young temp working at the Midwestern branch as a typist
who happens to be deaf, and unleash their malevolent plot.
In any list of Top 5 helpful tips to follow at a modern workplace,
"Watch your back" would occupy at least three of the entries, and IN
THE COMPANY OF MEN shows how the immersion of oneself into an
environment of ruthless ambition coupled with a paranoid cutthroat
mentality grooms bitterness, spitefulness, and anger.  Chad is
spawned from this system: he, as they say, knows how to play the game
-- on the surface, he's handsome, supremely self-assured, and
smoothly knows how to handle every situation -- how to charmingly say
exactly what people want to hear, or how put a convincing spin on
everything which leaves him in the best light (this naturally
requires casting everyone else in the worst light).  Chad's a mover,
a shaker, a man on the rise -- in terms of corporate America, he's a
winner.  But behind every handshake and pleasantry exchanged over
donuts and coffee before project meetings, one can almost sense the
palpable rage and malice emanating from Chad -- bitterness at being
passed over for promotion, for getting the dead-end assignments, for
failing to receive the recognition he feels is deserved; anger at
those who would dare pass him in the race up the corporate ladder,
who steal his deserved acclaim, who pose a threat for his
advancement.  "I hate that prick," Chad says of a co-worker
(actually, of many co-workers), and it's not uttered in jest or in a
light-hearted vein; he truly, completely means it.  To Chad, every
co-worker is potential competition for the pay increase or the cushy
new promotion, and is consequently an enemy -- one to be greeted
warmly, lulled into a false sense of security, and humiliatingly
betrayed.  It's Darwin's Law to the fullest extent -- survival of
the fittest -- and not only is Chad determined to be the one still
standing at the end, he's more than happy to be the one to slay off
his competitors and gloat as they squirm on their deathbeds.  "How
does it feel?"
If the competitiveness of the modern workplace creates hate-filled
monstrosities like Chad out of the strong-willed, among the weak the
pressure-cooker molds men like Howard, whose inherent insecurities,
fears, and frustrations are magnified into self-loathing.  Howard is
not an assertive man, and he clearly hates his impotency in his
professional (under his wing, his project is floundering) and
personal life (the film opens finding him tending to a bruised ear --
a parting gift from his new ex-girlfriend) -- it's obvious that
Howard admires and seeks to emulate Chad's confidence, slickness and
suavity; constantly seeking Chad's approval, it's easy to
occasionally forget that Howard is the project manager and the one
actually in the position of authority.  Howard, in short, does not
know how to play the game, which is akin to being a bloody slab of
meat in a shark-infested pool.
While IN THE COMPANY OF MEN is thunderously powerful and at times the
film's unflinching depiction of turpitude borders upon revolting, it
yet remains riveting and compulsively watchable, even wickedly funny
on many an occasion.  Mr. LaBute's incisive and daring screenplay,
filled with snappy dialogue, is wonderfully realised by an
accomplished trio of performances by the lead actors, and his use of
blaring percussive riffs as segueways between the seven separate
sections in the highly-structured film, as in Todd Solondz's WELCOME
TO THE DOLLHOUSE, jolts us and violently propels us forward.  Mr.
Eckhart's screen debut is nothing short of astonishing -- he's
deliciously villainous, an unrestrained embodiment of bile and venom
who is incomparably malicious.  It's a virtuoso performance which is
always utterly convincing, and heralds Mr. Eckhart as a bright new
talent. (Either that, or he's *really* like that -- a frightening
thought, but in either case Mr. LaBute deserves credit for his
casting.)  Ms. Edwards is superb as Christine, who proves to be more
resilient than anyone could have expected, although her depiction of
her character's deafness isn't quite credible and is consequently
mildly distracting.  Mr. Malloy is also good as Howard, perhaps the
most complex character in the film and certainly the one called upon
for the greatest emotional range, although he is overshadowed by his
castmates.
Many have pegged IN THE COMPANY OF MEN as a film about misogynism,
but this isn't a very accurate assessment.  While Chad and Howard's
game involves crushing the spirits of a vulnerable young woman, Chad
doesn't particularly hate women -- no moreso than his hatred of
everyone else, at least -- and Howard hates himself far, far more
than anyone with XX chromosomes.  What Chad understands at the outset
to their cruel sport, and what Howard fails to comprehend, is that
theirs is an environment where it's kill or be killed.  Their
malicious sport is an extension of this philosophy, and a means to an
end.  And as for sweet, innocent Christine, caught in the crossfire?
To Chad, she'll merely be a victimized bystander, a casualty of war.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Let's hurt somebody." - Aaron Eckhart, IN THE COMPANY OF MEN

Title
Review for Winner, The (1996)
THE WINNER (Live - 1997)
Starring Vincent D'Onofrio, Rebecca DeMornay, Delroy Lindo, Frank
  Whaley, Michael Madsen, Billy Bob Thornton
Screenplay by Wendy Riss, based on her stage play A DARKER PURPOSE.
Produced by Ken Schwenker
Directed by Alex Cox
Running time: 92 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
To assess Alex Cox's film THE WINNER as a loser would be so indolent.
It would be derisive.  It would be glib.  It would be dismissive.
Rarely have I seen a film as excruciatingly annoying as THE WINNER, a
would-be comedy which quickly proves to be tedious, unfunny, and
unengaging. The film attempts to be fresh and quirky, utilising a
myriad of colourful characters to weave its absurd tale, but appears
to overlook the fact that nobody in the film is remotely interesting
and that all of the characters are essentially preposterous.
The film is set in Las Vegas, and the focus in THE WINNER is on Philip
(Vincent D'Onofrio), an aloof, naive young man blessed with the odd
gift of luck; he virtually cannot lose at the tables.  Despite this
prodigious talent, Philip is perpetually mournful and quite
indifferent about his gambling fortunes, neither taking joy in his
winnings nor having the foresight to mask his abilities.
Consequently, he becomes an easy target for those who would ride upon
his coattails and take advantage of his talent.  Louise (Rebecca
DeMornay), a sultry lounge singer, insinuates herself into Philip's
life for the purpose of swindling him, while Philip's estranged
brother (and, conveniently, Louise's ex-beau) Johnny (Michael Madsen)
arrives on the scene.  (To add some colour, Johnny also happens to be
toting their father's corpse, sans one hand.)  Meanwhile, Philip is
also befriended by a trio of low-rent, opportunists (Frank Whaley,
Billy Bob Thornton, and Richard Edson), who have every intention of
taking advantage of their new buddy's gift with the dice.  Serenely
overlooking the chaos from behind the scenes is the casino owner
(Delroy Lindo); it is probably not giving away much to reveal that
his role in THE WINNER is essentially that alluded to at the end of
the flashy sequence in Martin Scorsese's CASINO which details the
organization hierarchy of a casino's operations - he *is* the eye in
the sky.
It could be maddening to endure a film whose central protagonist is so
oblivious of the ongoing blatant manipulation, but fortunately this is
not the case in THE WINNER, if only because our sadsack hero is such a
sap; not even remotely sympathetic or compelling, it becomes
impossible to root for Philip or even care about his fate, and the
would-be swindlers of Philip's fortunes are all drawn out as such
ludicrous, transparent buffoons with entirely unimaginative and
uninteresting schemes that one watches THE WINNER with a complete
sense of disinterest.
It is a shame, as THE WINNER features a talented cast - Mr. D'Onofrio
is an underrated and gifted actor with a huge range; Mr. Lindo has a
remarkable screen presence which infiltrates every film in which he
appears; Mr. Madsen, Ms. DeMornay, and Mr. Whaley have all done good
work in the past.  None of the actors in THE WINNER are in top form
here, and this film won't likely be a prized addition to their
respective resumes.
Director Alex Cox does what he can with Wendy Riss' screenplay, and it
is to his credit that this film at no point feels like an adaptation
of a stage play; I was startled to learn that THE WINNER was in fact
based upon one.  While tedious, the film is well-paced and does not
meander, but it would be near-impossible task for Mr. Cox (or, for
that matter, virtually any other director that comes to mind) to
overcome the film's widespread shortcomings in plot and
characterization.  To his credit, my understanding is that he has
chosen to distance himself from the project in acknowledgement of its
deficiencies.
I caught THE WINNER at its world premiere at the Toronto International
Film Festival in September 1996, and in fairness it is entirely
possible that the film has been extensively revamped since then due
to the lacklustre audience reaction generated - there were more
walkouts on this film than any of the others I screened.  To be
honest, though, I couldn't begin to isolate what could be done to
this film to improve it - I assume that throwing the whole thing out
and starting over is out of the question.  THE WINNER has apparently
played on cable television in the United States and is beginning a
limited theatrical release at the time of this writing.  The film has
a nice upbeat score by Pray For Rain, but I am honestly not being
facetious when I state that the thing I treasured most about my
screening of THE WINNER was the bag of popcorn upon which I was
munching.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"At one point when berated and bloodied by her male military superior,
 Moore screams out a guttural invitation to him to enjoy partaking in the
 absorption of a certain anatomical member." - Dan Cox, VARIETY, on G.I. JANE

Title
Review for House of Yes, The (1997)
THE HOUSE OF YES (Miramax - 1997)
Starring Parker Posey, Josh Hamilton, Tori Spelling,
  Freddie Prinze Jr., Genevieve Bujold
Screenplay by Mark Waters, adapted from the stage play by
  Wendy MacLeod
Produced by Beau Flynn and Stefan Simchowitz
Directed by Mark Waters
Running time: 90 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
If you've seen any number of American independent films in recent
years, you've no doubt run across the ubiquitous PARTY GIRL herself,
Parker Posey, who seems to literally appear in every third recent
movie.  From early 1997 releases like Christopher Guest's WAITING FOR
GUFFMAN, Greg Motolla's THE DAYTRIPPERS, Richard Linklater's
subUrbia, and Peter Cohn's DRUNKS to upcoming films such as Jill
Sprecher's feature debut CLOCKWATCHERS and a reunion with Hal Hartley
in HENRY FOOL, Ms. Posey is, along with the similarly-prolific Lili
Taylor, the reigning Queen of the Indies, and has been extremely
impressive throughout her career with her sassy, infectiuously
energetic and dynamic performances.  Her astonishing vivacious turn
in Mark Waters' debut film THE HOUSE OF YES, for which she was
awarded a Special Outstanding Performance prize earlier this year at
the 19th edition of the Sundance Film Festival, is the pivotal
performance in her career, and should serve as her big breakout role
into mainstream recognition and future stardom.
While most black comedies typically feature one or two decidedly
eccentric characters in order to heighten the inherently perverse
natures of their plots, the witty THE HOUSE OF YES deliciously takes
this concept a bit further -- virtually every character in the film
is quirky and bizarre to varying degrees except for cheery,
sweet-natured donut shop waitress Lesly (Tori Spelling), who acts as
the audience surrogate and plays as the interloper into the strange,
deranged world of the Pascal family.  Set on a stormy Thanksgiving
evening, conventionally handsome Marty Pascal (Josh Hamilton) returns
home with new fiancee Lesly, looking every bit like a fresh-faced
wholesome young couple, to his strikingly odd and scandalous clan:
dim and overly eager-to-please younger brother Anthony (Freddie
Prinze Jr.), supercilious and largely-preoccupied matriarch Mrs.
Pascal (Genevieve Bujold), and, most notably, his recently
deinstitutionalized and highly emotionally volatile twin sister (Ms.
Posey), who goes by the name Jackie-O and is completely obsessed with
the former First Lady to the point of trotting about the house
sporting a pageboy hairdo, in various looks immortalized by the late
Jacqueline Onassis: pink Chanel ensemble complete with pillbox hat,
or simple black dress with strand of pearls.  Jackie-O's fixations
aren't limited to the late First Lady; acerbic and hysterical while
preparing for Marty's return, she greets her twin brother at the
front door with a euphoric, impassioned embrace befitting that of a
savior, virtually vaulting herself into his arms.  When the inclement
weather knocks out the power and causes a hasty postponement of
Thanksgiving dinner, Mrs. Pascal retreats into the darkness, leaving
the four young characters to make do for the remainder of the
evening, and by candlelight the sordid family secrets of Lesley's
future in-laws are gradually revealed.
The antecedent of THE HOUSE OF YES as a 1990 stage play penned by
Wendy MacLeod (which had a long, successful run in San Francisco) is
clearly evident from the single locale and the heavy reliance on
dialogue to drive the plot forward.  However, despite a faithful
adaptation of Ms. MacLeod's play by Mr. Waters in his screenplay, the
stage roots of THE HOUSE OF YES do not prove to be restrictive --
indeed, attempts to greatly open up the story for the film medium
would likely destroy the claustrophobic tone set early in the film
and shatter the metaphoric barrier separating the unique world of the
Pascal family from normalcy, undermining the depiction of their
disturbed behaviour and resulting in their appearance coming off more
as ridiculous than distinctively quirky.
While THE HOUSE OF YES is a highly stylized and peculiar black comedy
with a truly inspired storyline, its clear strength is its wholly
original dialogue.  The film's astonishingly clever banter is wicked,
biting, and hysterical, and Mr. Waters' makes a fine feature debut
with his confident, assured helming of THE HOUSE OF YES, with some
inspired kinetic camera work and crisp cutting of the terrific verbal
interplay in an effectively precise, rhythmic pattern.  An inspired
and inventive opening sequence is wonderfully realised.  Mr. Waters'
ability to guide the film between viciously comic and stirringly
dramatic scenes are most impressive and clearly evident, and his
solid, capable work here heralds him as a promising new talent.
While the remainder of the ensemble cast of THE HOUSE OF YES is
generally solid, there can be no doubt that this film essentially
belongs to Ms. Posey, who dominates throughout with her wonderfully
entertaining and captivating performance.  An on-screen dynamo with
remarkable intensity, she can turn from delightfully witty and
hilariously cruel to remarkably unstable and utterly pathetic on a
dime, and Ms. Posey's rendition of Jackie-O is a completely
fascinating creation: a needy, fragile, and helpless mentally ill
young woman with a barely-suppressed hysteria who nonetheless lords
over the household by sheer audacity.  Hers is easily the most
interesting character in the film, and one is left wanting more when
she's offscreen.  Her delivery of the volley of stinging barbs at Ms.
Spelling's hapless character is brilliant -- savage and gleeful.
It's a stunning performance, highlighted by Ms. Posey's customary
fierce energy and mercurial appeal, and one which should catapult her
into the limelight.
"Independent film is where the heart is and where the stories are,"
Ms. Posey once commented, but after her triumphant performance in the
vastly entertaining THE HOUSE OF YES, it will be interesting to
observe how she reacts when Hollywood begins to pursue her with a
vigor.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"The separate forms of social behaviour that we associate with film and
 television are also starting to break down..." - Jonathan Rosenbaum, 1979

Title
Review for Nell (1994)
Fox
Starring Jodie Foster, Liam Neeson, Natasha Richardson, Richard Libertini
Screenplay by William Nicholson and Mark Handey
Produced by Renee Missel and Jodie Foster
Directed by Michael Apted
Rated AA [Adult Accompaniment] in Canada for brief nudity
     After much hype, 20th Century Fox's winter entry into the Oscar
fracas, NELL, has opened here in Toronto this Xmas weekend.
     NELL is a crowd-pleaser dealing with the discovery of the title
character, a young woman brought up secluded from society in the woods,
and found to communicate in unintelligible gibberish and grandiose
sweeping and swaying gestures with her arms and body.
     Nell's discovery is brought to the attention of two doctors, who
invariably differ upon the course of action to be taken.  One feels
that the 'wild child' should be brought to the local hospital for
observation and studying, while the other becomes enraptured by her
innocence and pure soul, and seeks to protect her.  However, the
agendas of both parties become altered by an unforeseen human element.
     Jodie Foster plays the title character in a breathtaking and
outstanding performance.  She brilliantly emotes with her eyes and
facial expressions, and makes a deceptively difficult acting job
convincing and effective.  Foster disappears completely into the role,
and makes Nell a very gut character while still exuding charisma.  With
this performance, it seems very likely that Foster will receive her
third Best Actress Oscar in less than a decade--it is excellent work.
     Liam Neeson plays Jerry, the doctor who befriends Nell, and is
capable in the role, if not quite up to the calibre of Foster.  He does
project likeability and a good sense of timing, while being a hulking,
imposing figure on the screen, especially in contrast to Foster's
fragile little Nell.  Natasha Richardson portrays Paula, the opposing
doctor who decides that it is in Nell's best interest to take her for
studying, and is just fair in the role.  Her performance tends to be
rather flat, and while she is competent, Richardson's emotional
interludes seem too forced and inauthentic.
     NELL's plotline is fairly formulaic and over-manipulative.  There
are many moments in the film where you may have more than an inkling on
future events in the movie, and some lines of dialogue are delightfully
hokey.  NELL suffers from an abudance of gushing weepy
over-sentimentalism, particularly in the ridiculous climactic scene
which almost undermines the entire film, and one scene designed to
bring suspense almost had me laugh aloud.  However, Apted utilises
visuals very well, with some beautiful shots of the brush and
wilderness, and a very pretty sky shot at one point in the film.  The
film's score is lush, if somewhat omnipresent, and the keynote song of
the film is Patsy Cline's CRAZY.  Although filled with several stock
characters, Apted has succeeded in producing a heart-warming tear-jerker
that should success commercially, and showcases an outstanding acting
performance by Jodie Foster.  On my four-star rating scale, I give
NELL three stars.

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Like its own opening shot, from out of the darkness BOOGIE NIGHTS
   triumphantly explodes upon the film scene with stunning authority and
   clarity, persuasively heralding its helmer Paul Thomas Anderson as a
   bonafide major talent.  A sprawling epic set in the heart of the
   disco era and focused upon the ascension and decline of a troupe in
   the adult film industry, BOOGIE NIGHTS is an astonishingly ambitious
   feature film which is completely effective both as an utterly
   entertaining joyride and as a strikingly impressive piece of
   filmmaking.
   The film follows a soft-spoken young man, Eddie Adams (Mark Wahlberg)
   from Torrance, through his induction into the erotic picture business
   to stardom, and later, to a harrowingly precipitous drop.  As BOOGIE
   NIGHTS opens, he's toiling as a dishwasher in a trendy San Fernando
   Valley nightclub, and living at home under the thumb of a tyrannical
   mother who denigrates him at every opportunity.  Recruited by
   fatherly Jack Horner (a rejuvenated Burt Reynolds), a successful porn
   filmmaker, Eddie abandons his old life in favour of a new one as Dirk
   Diggler, pornstar.  Wholeheartedly embraced by Jack's troupe,
   including the maternal Amber Waves (Julianne Moore), Reed Rothchild
   (John C. Reilly), Buck Swope (Don Cheadle), Rollergirl (Heather
   Graham), Dirk and his "one special thing" are quickly propelled to
   the top of his field, fulfilling his mantra of being a "big bright
   shining star".  His lack of discipline, however, incites a chain of
   circumstances which sees Dirk and his friends unravel as a new decade
   is ushered in.
   The element of BOOGIE NIGHTS which literally commands attention is
   the bravura direction by Mr. Anderson, whose fascination and prowess
   with the camera is obvious.  From the terrific tracking shot
   throughout a nightclub which opens the film and introduces the
   players through to the showy sequence in the camera follows a female
   partygoer diving into a pool, Mr. Anderson's accomplished command of
   the camera is without question.  While novice directors often
   demonstrate an unfortunate lack of restraint in terms of flamboyant
   camerawork which ultimately proves to be aggravating, impertinent and
   self-congratulatory (case in point: Marc Rocco's unforgettable
   perpetual-motion helming of MURDER IN THE FIRST), in BOOGIE NIGHTS
   every zoom or pan by Mr. Anderson, be it slow and deliberate or
   energetically sharp, is purposeful and potent.  It's a rarity and a
   delight to discover such a confidently assured work so early in a
   filmmaker's career -- BOOGIE NIGHTS is only his second feature film,
   following up his debut feature from earlier this year, HARD EIGHT --
   and although it's somewhat derivative (his storytelling style is
   reminiscent of Robert Altman, while in terms of visuals he's clearly
   influenced by Martin Scorsese), at least he's borrowing from some of
   the best, and it's entirely effective within the context of this
   film.
   While BOOGIE NIGHTS is astonishingly polished from a technical
   perspective, in terms of sheer entertainment value it's also
   rollicking good fun, with a wickedly deadpan sense of humour.  The
   film perfectly captures the essence of the disco period in terms of
   music, clothes, hairstyles, dance, idioms, and culture, aided
   immeasurably by impeccable production design by Bob Ziembicki and
   costume design by Mark Bridges, and BOOGIE NIGHTS convincingly
   catapults the audience back to this recent, pre-AIDS-scare period in
   American history where uninhibited, free-wheeling lifestyles
   abounded.  While much of the film's humour pertains to the
   characters' obliviousness of now-outdated aspects of their lives then
   prevalent in society -- a prime example is part-time salesman Buck
   Swope's demo of a stereo system with an eight-track tape, and
   inviting a prospective customer to get 'freaky deaky' with the music
   -- it's elicited with an undercurrent not of ridicule, but of wistful
   reminiscence, and some the throwback elements in the film are
   strangely wondrous.  A giant ensemble disco dance production number
   in a nightclub is funny, to be sure, but oddly magical, and the
   sequence which lovingly explores Eddie/Dirk's bedroom, completely
   adorned with posters and elements of iconic 1970s figures (Farrah
   Fawcett, Cheryl Tiegs, Bruce Lee) is breathtaking.  Ably supported by
   a well-selected collection of period music (all of which purportedly
   came straight from Mr. Anderson's personal collection), there's a
   clear affection for the era in BOOGIE NIGHTS.
   It's the period aspect and the playfully comic nostaligism of BOOGIE
   NIGHTS which has been played up in its marketing campaign in
   deference of the pornography element of the storyline; the film's
   promotional trailer markedly avoids any explicit reference to the
   adult film industry which unites its characters.  After the debacle
   with 1996's Milos Forman film, THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT, another
   finely-crafted work which was knocked off the market prematurely due
   to controversy regarding its pornography-related storyline, the New
   Line marketing team faced a unique challenge with BOOGIE NIGHTS in
   terms of attempting to deemphasize the relatively risque erotic
   picture element of the story in order to increase salability to the
   general public.
   However, while BOOGIE NIGHTS delves into the world of the adult film
   industry of two decades ago, it's hardly a lurid or seamy film --
   given the subject matter, there's very little nudity, and virtually
   none of it can be construed as gratuitous -- and BOOGIE NIGHTS
   smartly depicts erotic filmmaking not as a hotbed of carnality, but
   simply as a business.  The glimpses on the sets of Jack Horner's
   shoots reveal that while the films he makes are intended to
   titillate, there's a candid matter-of-factness in terms of sex; his
   cast and crew are professionals who are merely doing a job, and it's
   refreshing that the obvious cliches of depravity and sinful lechery
   often linked to dismissive portraits of adult filmmaking, such as
   coercion or debauchery, are avoided.
   If anything, BOOGIE NIGHTS is more interested in the process of adult
   filmmaking than the adult films themselves.  Jack Horner's dream is
   an honourable one -- he genuinely aspires to make a great film -- and
   to some degree BOOGIE NIGHTS is reminiscent of ED WOOD (albeit
   lacking a certain wistful innocence).  In both films, the world of
   quickie low-budget filmmaking is explored, and both Jack Horner and
   the version of Ed Wood by Tim Burton, Scott Alexander, and Larry
   Karaszewski share similar mindsets -- Jack's retort of "There are
   shadows in light, baby" to his cinematographer's complaint about poor
   set lighting echoes back to Ed Wood's "It's not about the little
   details, it's about the big picture!" rant when it is pointed out
   that his graveyard set for PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE appears patently
   false.  In BOOGIE NIGHTS and ED WOOD, the aspirations of the
   respective filmmakers' prove to be bemusing, not in their intentions
   -- there's nothing inherently silly in the goal of making an
   'artistic' erotic picture -- but in the degree that they miss the
   mark.  Much like the humour lacing ED WOOD, the laughs involving Jack
   Horner are double-edged; after viewing a hilarious excerpt from one
   of his latest films which hybridizes the James Bond and porn genres,
   when Jack breathes "This is the best work I've ever done", it's
   genuinely funny, but given his utter sincerity, also possesses a
   tinge of sadness.
   Mr. Anderson is at this point clearly a greater talent as a director
   than a screenwriter.  While BOOGIE NIGHTS shows great inventiveness
   in staging, there really isn't any clever dialogue in the film,
   though a valid point certainly can be made that none of the film's
   characters particularly lend themselves to thoughtful verbal
   exchanges; when one considers that the film's *protagonist* literally
   doesn't say a single insightful thing throughout the entire 152
   minute running time, it's no wonder why the playfully inane "How much
   can you bench?" banter between Dirk and Reed constitutes one of the
   film's finest exchanges.  And while Mr. Anderson creates a rich
   collection of fascinating characters, it's problematic that some of
   the the threads given to the film's characters are simply stale
   material -- Julianne Moore's child custody battle is fairly cliched
   stuff, better suited for a less risque and uninspired TV-movie
   version of her character's story, and far less interesting than the
   thread dealing with her woefully hackneyed filmmaking ambitions.
   Still, even if he doesn't always know what to do with his characters,
   Mr. Anderson most definitely captures their essences, and his
   resolutely nonjudgemental affection for them is infectious --
   misguided, even aimless, hopelessly naive, self-destructive,
   insufferable: I loved them just the same.
   In any case, it's hard to pick nits with a screenplay which contains
   one of the most audacious and inspired (and ultimately best-executed)
   scenes of the year: a scene where Dirk Diggler and Reed Rothchild are
   dragged along by their loose-cannon compadre to the home of drug
   baron Rahad Jackson (a mesmerizing Alfred Molina in an unforgettable
   performance, even if it's a small one) in a suicidal drug deal scam,
   only to find that the millionaire is a crazed eccentric (the part
   where he stops the deal to listen to the crescendo of Night Ranger's
   "Sister Christian" on his stereo system is sheer brilliance) flanked
   by an armed bodyguard.  If this scene already wasn't tense enough
   with these elements, Mr. Anderson introduces a Chinese boy that
   wanders through the scene, who for no discernable reason is tossing
   firecrackers around the room, pushing the scene to a new, surreal
   level of delightful giddiness.
   There are some other interesting touches in BOOGIE NIGHTS.  Mr.
   Anderson recycles the use of long methodical chimes on the soundtrack
   from HARD EIGHT; here, it accompanies the violent intercut sequences
   which depict the prostration of various characters to frightening
   effect.  Similarly, a painful scene where crew member Scotty J
   (Philip Seymour Hoffman) breaks down in tears in the driver's seat,
   sobbing "I'm so stupid" after being rebuffed by Dirk after an awkward
   but heartfelt advance is strikingly played out exactly as a later
   scene with Dirk in the driver's seat after a particularly tumultuous
   and traumatic evening.
   BOOGIE NIGHTS is exceedingly well cast, and each of the actors rise
   to the occasion; the ensemble cast is uniformly good.  While most of
   the acting accolades will no doubt go to Mr. Wahlberg (fulfilling
   upon the sparks of promise he demonstrated in some of his earlier
   films) and Mr. Reynolds (terrific as the father figure and stable
   anchor of the film, ringing true in every respect), a handful of
   other performances which might otherwise be overlooked deem mention.
   Mr. Reilly demonstrates here, as he did for brief glimpses in Ulu
   Grosbard's GEORGIA, a genuine aptitude for comedy -- many of his
   scenes in BOOGIE NIGHTS are among the very funniest in the film.
   I'm not sure how much of his performance as Reed was scripted and how
   much was done on the spot, but he plays the quintessential second
   banana character to a tee.  Mr. Reilly is the best part of the big
   disco dance production number, and it's wickedly funny to watch his
   Reed join in with Dirk after the fact in threatening the new stud on
   the block during a macho altercation.  Worth the price of admission
   alone is the glimpse of him getting down in the recording studio
   while the Dirk character is laying down a numbingly bad (and
   dead-on period; it sure sounds like bad early 1980s to me) demo track
   "You Got The Touch" in a vain attempt at a musical career.  Mr.
   Reilly plays his vacant character with utter conviction which is
   convincing and effective.
   Ms. Graham, with her long dirty blonde hair, innocent demeanour, and
   huge hazel eyes, looks like a Disney animated heroine come to life
   -- or in this case, a Disney animated heroine who came to life, made
   a wrong turn, and ended up on the New Line lot in a film focused on
   the late 70s / early 80s adult film industry.  Consequently, it's a
   bit incongruous to see this cheery sweet-faced starlet whizzing about
   the set on her roller skates, but in a scene where she's lounging in
   a limousine prowling the streets, garish red lipstick messily smeared
   on, giving the camera a hilariously pouty come-hither look, all one
   can do is gulp.  Her role in the film sadly needs more fleshing out
   (err -- in a figurative sense) -- she's essentially a glorified extra
   -- but she does score impressively in her key scene which is
   unnerving in its sheer primal ferocity.  (If only Mr. Anderson had
   filmed the scene so that we could actually see the expression of rage
   and anguish on her face, though!)  And a cautionary tale for the
   strict and prudish: as a teen, Ms. Graham's parents forbade her to
   take a part in the twisted cult classic HEATHERS; since then, her
   most notable roles have been as a junkie (Gus Van Sant's DRUGSTORE
   COWBOY) and now a porn starlet.  Draw your own conclusions.
   Perhaps the most quietly touching performance in BOOGIE NIGHTS is
   that of Mr. Cheadle, who lends dignity to his role as a character in
   search of his identity, and whose quest is comically manifested by a
   series of changes in his sense of fashion.  His relationship with his
   cheerfully supportive new wife Jessie St. Vincent (an interesting
   Melora Walters) is wholly compelling has genuine sweetness, and
   although his general longing for acceptance from others is
   perceptible, it's no more so than in the bank scene where his loan
   application to open a stereo store is rejected due to his background
   in the porn industry.  While the scenario is familiar, the wounded
   look in Cheadle's eyes makes the scene unforgettable.
   Luis Guzman's most famous work is possibly in Brian De Palma's
   CARLITO'S WAY, and here he plays a variation on the same character:
   Maurice T. Rodriguez is a hapless but good-natured nightclub owner
   who's a hanger-on to Jack's group, ingratiating himself into the
   clique and constantly hounding Jack, with little disguise made of his
   desperation, for a part in one of his erotic pictures.  Jack's
   eventual acquiescence to Maurice's request leads to one of BOOGIE
   NIGHTS' biggest comic payoffs.
   BOOGIE NIGHTS is a stunning achievement due to the virtuoso direction
   by Mr. Anderson, who immediately asserts his presence in the film
   industry as a presence of note with this work.  Striking a fine
   balance between humour and drama, and exceptionally well-crafted,
   there's no doubt that BOOGIE NIGHTS is among the very best films of
   the year.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Don't leave this girl alone with any handsome deaf-mutes Marty, that's my
 advice to you." - Parker Posey, THE HOUSE OF YES

Title
Review for Myth of Fingerprints, The (1997)

THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS (Sony Pictures Classics - 1997)
Starring Arija Bareikis, Blythe Danner, Hope Davis, Laurel Holloman,
  Brian Kerwin, James LeGros, Julianne Moore, Roy Scheider,
  Michael Vartan, Noah Wyle
Screenplay by Bart Freundlich
Produced by Mary Jane Skalski, Tim Perell, Bart Freundlich
Directed by Bart Freundlich
Running time: 93 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
Bart Freundlich's feature film debut, THE MYTH OF FINGRPRINTS, is
exciting -- not for the film itself, but for the promise it heralds
for its helmer and screenwriter.  He demonstrates a real gift for
sharp, clever dialogue and has created a series of rich, interesting,
and well-developed credible characters, while his direction of the
film is astonishingly assured for a first-timer, with good comic
pacing and adept camera work.  Although THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS
features a large ensemble cast and a myriad of concurrent subplots,
Mr. Freundlich skillfully juggles his many characters in an evenly
focused fashion where no single storyline inadvertently takes
dominance in the film.
The shame is that THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS doesn't have a terribly
interesting plot: Mr. Freundlich's film is an all-too-familiar tale
of a dysfunctional family reuniting for Thanksgiving weekend, where
closeted skeletons eventually are revealed after much wistful
retrospective discussion by family members over the course of the
holiday.  THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS handles this routine storyline in
a solid fashion -- it *is* an entertaining film -- but it's somewhat
frustrating that such witty dialogue and such great characters as
those Mr. Freundlich have fashioned are used in service of a plot
which is not their equal in terms of calibre or ambition.
Set in chilly New England, the film opens with Lena (Blythe Danner)
and Hal (Roy Scheider) in preparation for the return of their four
adult children after an absence of three years.  In quick succession,
siblings Leigh (Laurel Holloman), Jake (Michael Vartan), Mia
(Julianne Moore), and Warren (Noah Wyle) pass through the front doors
of the family home, with Jake bringing along forthright free-spirited
girlfriend Margaret (Hope Davis), and Mia towing sadsack boyfriend
Elliot (Brian Kerwin).  While appearing on the surface to be a
typical happy American family, eccentricities and quirks are unveiled
and buried secrets are unsurfaced which reveal the deep-rooted
dysfunctionality which has splintered apart the family.
While the pensive moments in THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS register
nicely, the film's greatest strength is in the interaction between
the characters, which come off as easy, amusing and boisterous.  Each
of the siblings have grown up coping with the dour family environment
in different fashions.  Leigh is mischievous and brash, while Mia is
consumed by bitterness and has not a kind word to snap at anyone.
Jake and younger brother Warren appear on the exterior to be
wholesome, clean-cut, well-adjusted young men, but they are fighting
their own interior demons: Jake is nagged by self-doubt, while Warren
is haunted by the loss of his relationship with high school
sweetheart Daphne (Arija Bareikis) and is masking a sense of
overwhelming sadness.  None of them are able to relate on a personal
level to their father Hal, who is decidedly eccentric and unable to
communicate with his children on any level, even skulking off to the
treehouse to avoid discussion.  The family's patient matriarch Lena
is the single common element in these two disparate sets.
Mr. Freundlich benefits from a fine ensemble cast, all of whom turn
in good performances and have good chemistry with one another.  Ms.
Holloman, a rising new star, is particularly good as Leigh, the
playful imp of the family, while Ms. Davis turns in a very funny
performance as Margaret, whose sprightly demeanour and propensity to
speak what's foremost on her mind brings about many embarrassing and
amusing moments.  Ms. Moore's performance is the most interesting in
the group; she successfully depicts Mia's unmitigated rage masking a
well of sorrow, and when she encounters old grade schoolmate
Leonard/Cezanne (James LeGros) during a trip into town, one can feel
her desperation as she listens to his wistful story -- she *wants* to
believe him, and that comes through in Ms. Moore's performance.
THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS marks the first major feature film for Mr.
Wyle since his emergence as a public figure with the success of the
television drama ER.  I first noticed him in Michael Bortman's
CROOKED HEARTS (and subsequently spent several years wondering
whatever happened to this promising young actor), which is extremely
similar on a thematic basis to THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS; the number
of parallels between the two films is striking.  As Mr. Wyle was very
keen on THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS, being the first in the cast to sign
on to the project and even obtaining a credit as an associate
producer, there is ample cause to assume that he has some sort of
predisposed affinity for material of this nature.
THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS doesn't break any new ground with its
routine storyline -- it follows the familiar path tread by all films
of this sort -- but it generates some big laughs and is a solid and
successfully amusing diversion.  The film is a wholly respectable
first feature, and Mr. Freundlich demonstrates a great deal of
promise as a screenwriter and, to a slightly lesser extent, as a
director -- keep an eye out for him: if his next project is built
around a more interesting and ambitious story, it could be very good
indeed.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Man, that was a big spider.  It was so big I thought I saw a small dog
 caught in its web.  We are talking big.  That spider could've kicked
 Charlotte's ass." - Hope Davis, THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
THE MATRIX (Warner Bros. - 1999)
Cast: Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne, Carrie-Anne Moss,
      Hugo Weaving, Gloria Foster, Joe Pantoliano
Screenplay by the Wachowski Brothers
Produced by Joel Silver
Directed by the Wachowski Brothers
Running time: 136 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   If one only considers their excellent previous film, the taut,
   intensely-plotted lesbians-versus-the-mob caper picture BOUND, there
   would appear to be little to connect the Wachowski Brothers with the
   dazzling futuristic thriller THE MATRIX, but when taking into account
   their background as Chicago-based comic book writers, the picture
   quickly clears.  Wildly imaginative and visually frenetic, THE MATRIX
   is essentially a sensational live-action comic book put to celluloid,
   and reaches spectacular new heights for this film genre.
   Already filmmakers of particular distinction on the basis of their
   attention-grabbing debut picture, THE MATRIX cements the reputation
   of Larry and Andy Wachowski as first-rate visual stylists who know
   how to make every shot count.  Thanks to the bravura work by
   cinematographer Bill Pope, who shoots the dark picture with an
   appealing glossy sheen, this is a fabulous-looking movie, rich in
   fantastic art design and employing groundbreaking visual technology
   which, in the hands of visual effects director John Gaeta, result in
   some truly stunning visceral sequences which overload the cool
   quotient.
   As incredible as the film is simply to look at, it's bolstered by an
   elaborately-constructed story spanning time and reality, with
   elements as disparate as mythology and Lewis Carroll factoring
   prominently into the tale in surprisingly cohesive fashion.  (The
   Wachowskis are so thorough in regards to the latter that not only are
   there overt "Alice In Wonderland" and "Through The Looking Glass"
   references, in one scene they even playfully threw footage of
   scampering rabbits on a background TV set.)  Given that one of the
   joys of the picture is to unweave its unusually well-developed
   storyline (and that promotional teasers are intentionally vague),
   suffice it to say that THE MATRIX initially tantalizes through
   deliberately-oblique scenes which intrigue, leaving gaping holes
   without trying our patience, and eventually reveals itself to be a
   futuristic Things Are Not What They Seem To Be variant, with a ragtag
   group of survivors including the zen-like Morpheus (Lawrence
   Fishburne) and Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss) recruiting computer hacker
   Neo (Keanu Reeves) to help save the world.  It's comic book mentality
   run amok, more ambitious than it perhaps ought to be, but it's far
   more consistent and better realised than the similarly-styled THE
   FIFTH ELEMENT.
   Aside from the flashy, hyperkinetic camerawork, the film
   distinguishes itself through its arresting action sequences.  The
   Wachowskis were clearly influenced by John "More Bullets" Woo, and
   the picture's gunfire battles, especially one involving Neo and
   Trinity pinned down in the lobby of an office building by the
   sinister Agents, are spectacular -- the best in any American action
   picture since, not coincidentally, Woo's own FACE/OFF.  As the
   steaming spent shell cases rain down in slow motion and marble
   pillars are pulverized in the frenzy of ammunition, it's an
   adrenaline thrill to watch the heroic characters performing
   impossibly evasive gymnastic stuntwork amidst the cheerfully wanton
   violence. The martial arts fight sequences are similarly jaw-dropping
   and almost certainly the best to ever come from a North American
   film.  Impressively choreographed by Hong Kong stunt master Yuen Wo
   Ping and vastly energetic, the wired hand-to-hand combat in
   conjunction with the energized camerawork produce such eye-popping
   results that they appear to be straight out of video games and
   Japanese anime, showcasing limitless flexibility of the combatants in
   terms of speed and fluid airborne motion.  Through it all, the actors
   are imbued with a glamorous cool chic, adorning ultra-hip
   black-dominated apparel with the requisite sunglasses; this is a
   picture which not only looks great, but where it's also crucial to
   look great.
   The film also sounds terrific due to stellar sound work by David
   Lee, who captures each squib with precision, and through the
   fierce score by Don Davis (who's assisted by a top-notch rock
   soundtrack featuring the likes of Rage Against The Machine and
   Prodigy).  From top to bottom, THE MATRIX is a technically superb
   accomplishment.
   With the riveting imagery on display in the picture, the best that
   the actors can hope to fare is to avoid being overwhelmed by the
   visuals, and they're largely up to the challenge.  While Reeves and
   Fishburne acquit themselves admirable in the physical aspects of
   their roles, the actors who leave the greatest impression are Moss,
   whose commanding presence as a leather-clad warrior reminded me of
   Michelle Pfeiffer's Catwoman in BATMAN RETURNS and Famke Janssen's
   lethal Xenia Onatopp from GOLDENEYE and who tackles her intense
   action sequences with a ferocious vigor, and veteran Australian
   actor Hugo Weaving as the menacing Agent Smith, who has a wonderfully
   flat, dispassionate delivery, speaking his lines without really
   moving his lips.
   While THE MATRIX has its share of flaws -- its coda is far less
   inventive than the rest of the picture, the laboured love story plays
   as if it was tossed in as a concession, the zen dialogue often feels
   like third-rate Yodaisms, and the Cypher character (Wachowski regular
   Joe Pantoliano) tips his hand far too early -- it's still a wild ride
   with much more interesting writing than per the norm.  The film isn't
   as provocative as it's likely meant to be, but it ably takes the
   audience into a memorable world with unprecedented dazzling visuals.
   "Whoa," whispers an amazed Neo during one scene; it's also the effect
   which THE MATRIX leaves.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"X-FILES fans come up to me in malls expecting me to be able to fill them
 in on the whole conspiracy.  Half the time I have no idea what they're
 talking about." - Martin Landau

Title
Review for Halloween: The Curse of Michael Myers (1995)
HALLOWEEN: H20 - TWENTY YEARS LATER (Dimension - 1998)
Starring Jamie Lee Curtis, Adam Arkin, Josh Hartnett
Screenplay by Robert Zappia, Matt Greenberg
Produced by Paul Freeman
Directed by Steve Miner
Running time: 85 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   No compendium addressing Hollywood cinema in the 1990s would be
   complete without a reference to the remarkable effect the works of
   screenwriter-of-the-moment Kevin Williamson have had on the film
   industry.  Churning out successive blockbusters SCREAM, I KNOW WHAT
   YOU DID LAST SUMMER, and SCREAM 2 (not to mention TV's latest trendy
   teen serial, DAWSON'S CREEK), he's reinvigorated the slasher genre
   to a point where an installment of the venerable HALLOWEEN franchise
   is not only being treated like an event movie by its handlers at
   Dimension Films, but looms so fearsome that its competitors have
   scrambled to avoid matching up against it -- the opening for
   DISTURBING BEHAVIOUR jumped two weeks, while VIRUS has been shuttled
   off to 1999.  When one considers the relative indifference which met
   the previous entry in the series a mere three years ago, HALLOWEEN
   6: THE CURSE OF MICHAEL MYERS, the shift in the climate is obvious.
   Mr. Williamson's fingerprints are all over this latest installment,
   HALLOWEEN: H20 - TWENTY YEARS LATER, as well.  An avid fan of the
   original John Carpenter classic, it's no secret that the current
   project was originally based on his story (Mr. Williamson eventually
   took an executive producer credit), and that he drummed up a cameo
   role on request for actress Janet Leigh.  In addition, his
   now-trademark referential style is clearly evident throughout --
   there are obvious nods to key scary films of the past, including the
   FRIDAY THE 13TH series, PSYCHO, and even PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE.
   (Well, *that* one's just dreadfully frightening.)
   The big hook for this 20th anniversary edition, of course, is the
   return of erstwhile scream queen Jamie Lee Curtis as Laurie Strode,
   the heroine of the first two films; as such, it's entirely
   appropriate that she enters the story shrieking her lungs out.  Take
   that, Neve Campbell -- the queen is back in town.
   But first, the film opens with a derivative, albeit capable, prologue
   involving another returning character, nurse Marion (Nancy Stephens),
   who finds her ominous, darkened house seemingly burgled.  As anyone
   familiar with the slasher genre can tell you, *don't go in there* --
   fortunately, she's been in two of these films before, so she knows
   what she's doing; two neighbourhood boys are dispatched instead to
   investigate the deathtrap.  It all ends rather messily, of course
   (and echoes -- you guessed it -- the opening scene in SCREAM [which
   itself referenced HALLOWEEN] by ending with cries of terror falling
   upon oblivious ears), but director Steve Miner adequately mimics
   John Carpenter's roaming POV Panavision images and conveys a nice
   sense of titillating dread during the segment.  The preface is capped
   off with an atmospheric opening credits sequence encapsulating the
   backstory (and winningly homaging the late Donald Pleasance's
   character, Dr. Loomis -- whom, in my book, was the series' most
   intriguing) which conveys two unmistakable points: a) Laurie Strode
   has faked her death and gone into hiding, and b) homicidal boogeyman
   (and brother, natch) Michael Myers is coming to get her.
   The final confrontation between the estranged siblings is clearly the
   showcase for the picture, but some forty minutes of maddening
   banality must be endured first.  While The Shape makes his
   cross-country trek, the film establishes its new characters and
   revisits Laurie, who's changed her identity and moved to California,
   leading a low-key life as the headmistress of a posh boarding school.
   Despite twenty years of anonymity and relative tranquillity, all is
   not right with our heroine -- for one thing, disconcerting visions of
   little brother pop up every five minutes or so.  The picture so
   mindlessly overkills with its reinforcement of Laurie's traumatized
   state (she pops pills, tosses down drinks with utter abandon, and is
   even referred to in dialogue as a functioning alcoholic) that it all
   becomes tiresome; any creepy effect generated by her neverending
   series of Michael Myers-themed hallucinations is sapped.  (It doesn't
   help that the eventual payoff scene is fumbled, either.)
   One of the requisites of the slasher genre is fodder for its maniac,
   and H20 oblingly complies, tossing a quartet of nubile adolescents
   and a couple of bumbling authority figures into the fray and then
   numbingly extending copious amounts of uninteresting screentime to
   these generic, disposable characters.  (Ronny, the would-be comic
   relief in the film, distinguishes himself the most, if only for being
   perhaps the most incompetent security guard on the planet.)  Although
   it's interesting to consider how it all might have played out had
   original choices Robert Forster and Charles S. Dutton took on the
   roles which ultimately went to Adam Arkin and L.L. Cool J,
   respectively, the weakness lies with the thinly-drawn archetypes
   thrust upon the actors.  The picture's interminable middle stretch is
   tedious, dreary material, punctuated by Mr. Miner's annoying attempts
   to elicit cheap shocks by zinging the sound board with every opening
   door.
   The problem is that there's just not enough story to sustain this
   film; although its running time is already a thin 85 minutes, if one
   cuts the fat off this flick we could conceivably be looking at a
   short film.  As a result, liberal doses of padding are used to occupy
   the bulk of the picture, killing time until Michael Myers arrives on
   the scene in a stolen car (the thought of which, forgive me, always
   makes me smile -- The Shape may be one bad-ass psychopathic maniac,
   but he's a mighty careful driver).
   The stretch drive of the film, featuring Michael Myers making the
   rounds and finally facing off against sis Laurie in a fight to the
   finish, is what we've been waiting for the entire film, and well
   worth the wait, almost redeeming the preceding monotony.  Though
   none of it is particularly original, it's nonetheless good fun to
   watch Michael stalk his prey (at one point, Michelle Williams put on
   a petrified expression that made me break out in a grin) and the
   sibling combat is about as exciting as a battle with a relentless,
   unstoppable villain can be.  The showdown includes the film's two
   best moments -- a shot of Myers, just out of reach from his victims,
   zestfully slashing away, and a terrific cinematic scene which finds
   Laurie calling out a challenge to the killer as the camera cranes
   back and an orchestral rendition of John Carpenter's unmistakable
   theme explodes on the soundtrack.  (It'd have been more effective if
   it were the simple, more elegaic piano original, but no matter.)
   What really makes the sequence work is the crazed intensity which
   shines through as Laurie shrieks into the darkness, indicating her
   shift from hunted to hunter; at that moment, she's the scariest
   person in the film.
   That being said, H20 isn't a noticeably scary film -- it relies more
   on adrenaline thrills than chills to keep the audience involved --
   and for a slasher flick, it's hardly gory; the resolution of a
   perversely intriguing tyke-in-jeopardy moment is indicative of its
   toothlessness.  It remains to be seen how the sheer predictability of
   its by-the-numbers plotting is received by savvy audiences -- I don't
   think it's any coincidence that the (annoying) eight-year old next to
   me that snuck into the screening was able to both correctly identify
   SCREAM 2 as the video tape playing onscreen and accurately (and
   loudly) assess the fates of the various extraneous characters.
   Among the three key horror franchises which emerged from the slasher
   era, HALLOWEEN is the sole survivor, having watched Wes Craven's A
   NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET gracefully bow out and FRIDAY THE 13TH go
   belly-up (although rumblings still persist about a Freddy vs. Jason
   project in the works, God forbid -- in terms of charisma, it's a
   mismatch).  Like all sequels of this genre, this film ends with a
   note of perceived finality, made all the more convincing by the
   characters involved and the manner in which it's dispatched.  Still,
   I don't buy it -- considering the plethora of inventive previous
   demises and after all he's been through, do we really have a reason
   to believe they can keep a good man down?
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Title
Review for Go (1999)
GO (Columbia - 1999)
Cast: Desmond Askew, Taye Diggs, William Fichtner, J.E. Freeman,
      Katie Holmes, Jane Karkowski, Breckin Meyer, Jay Mohr,
      Timothy Olyphant, Sarah Polley, Scott Wolf
Screenplay by John August
Produced by Paul Rosenberg, Mickey Liddell, Matt Freeman
Directed by Doug Liman
Running time: 100 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Doug Liman's GO is almost the certainly the first film in Columbia
   Pictures' history where its trademark fanfare and torch-bearing
   emblem flickers out to give way to a full-out rave in progress.  It's
   the sort of brazenly confident touch which Liman employs throughout
   the picture, revealing a fearless flashiness previously unseen in his
   breakout debut, SWINGERS.  So frenetic is GO, so aggressively
   energized, it'd be utterly exhausting were it not so exhilirating.
   Wearing its sardonic sense of humour like a badge of honour, the
   snappy screenplay by John August segments the film into three
   interrelated sections running along the same 24-hour timeline and
   careens through them at a breakneck pace.  We meet Ronna (Sarah
   Polley), in desperate need of rent money, who haphazardly engineers a
   drug deal which predictably goes awry.  There's her co-worker Simon
   (Desmond Askew), who embarks on a disasterous misadventure during a
   fling to Las Vegas with friends.  And there's Adam (Scott Wolf) and
   Zack (Jay Mohr), the soap opera actors who instigated the deal with
   Ronna and find themselves stumbling into a strange series of
   quandries.
   The entire film, in fact, is essentially a string of escalating
   situations which comically spin out of control in quirky and
   unexpected ways as its collection of disaffected young characters
   recklessly plow through the night.  While each of the vignettes has a
   slightly different tone -- Adam and Zack's is the most wickedly
   mischievous, while the madcap anarchy in Simon's manic half-hour
   contrasts with the sly deliberation in Ronna's chapter -- they easily
   meld in this lively black comedy where both Liman and his characters
   throw caution to the wind and charge into a pulsating world of
   dangerous chic.
   Despite possessing elements of action and tension, at heart, GO is a
   gleeful comic romp and consequently Liman never takes the mishaps
   which befall the characters seriously -- there are shootings, ODs and
   other assorted misfortunes, and yet the film doesn't let up for a
   moment; it's as if the director feared the picture would stall the
   moment he took his foot off the pedal.  While there's nothing
   especially remarkable about August's topical, consciously hip
   dialogue, the situations in which the characters find themselves are
   often very witty and some of the cute little touches are inspired; the
   unlikely macerena and feline sage are standout moments.
   As good as Liman is in effectively injecting offbeat comedy into
   otherwise grim situations of youthful folly, his confident, kinetic
   visual work is his chief contribution to the picture.  The film's
   urgent pacing is assisted by Liman's bold, appealingly edgy
   cinematography; the handheld camerawork pops with energy that
   complements the rhythmic soundtrack, and Stephen Mirrione's crisp
   editing helps keep GO humming.
   While it's Liman's picture, the young ensemble cast is uniformly
   solid.  I don't think that her performance as resilient would-be drug
   dealer Ronna is vintage Sarah Polley, but it says a lot that she's
   nonetheless wholly arresting.  In his North American debut, Askew is
   great naughty fun, while Taye Diggs as level-headed friend Marcus is
   an unexpectedly strong screen presence.  Katie Holmes, playing Ronna's
   timid friend Claire, makes for an appealing collatoral, while William
   Fichtner makes a strong bid for leftover Christopher Walken roles with
   his memorable turn as the creepy Burke.
   For all of its propulsiveness, GO begins to run out of steam before
   reaching the finish line, but its primary deficiency is its sheer
   narrative unpredictablility; all of the twists and turns in the plot
   basically play out in random fashion.  While this certainly helps to
   keep the audience on its toes and involved to a certain degree, such
   arbitrariness also makes the proceedings feel a bit fleeting and
   shallow.  Although PULP FICTION, to which this picture owes its
   structural resemblence and shared general aesthetic, completely deals
   with redemptive themes, GO really doesn't have any running
   undercurrent -- it's cheerfully, blissfully amoral, and consequently
   lacks any real resonance.  Ultimately, GO is nothing more than a
   thrill ride, but it's a stylish, enjoyable one.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS happens to be one of the best French movies since
 Jules met Jim."
                         - Anthony Lane, THE NEW YORKER

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION (Touchstone - 1997)
Starring Mira Sorvino, Lisa Kudrow, Janeane Garafolo, Alan Cumming,
  Julia Campbell
Screenplay by Robin Schiff, inspired by her stage play THE LADIES'
 ROOM
Produced by Laurence Mark
Directed by David Mirkin
Running time: 91 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION is an unabashedly formulaic
tale and while desperately upbeat and cheerful, it only manages to be
sporadically amusing and rarely does it ever become laugh-out-loud
funny - frankly, if you've seen the trailer for the film, you've more
or less seen its best lines.
The film's protagonists are endearingly-ditzy best friends Romy (Mira
Sorvino) and Michele (Lisa Kudrow), who share a place on Venice Beach
and spend their time club-hopping and rewatching PRETTY WOMAN on
video.  (Romy is the slightly-brigher of the two; she at least has
the good sense to make fun of the movie.)  When made aware of their
impending ten-year high school reunion, they reflect on their years
of ridicule from the A-group at Sagebrush High in Tucson, and come to
the shocking realization that their post-graduate lives haven't been
the epitome of success; both are single and only Romy has a job -
albeit, as a cashier.  Determined to impress their classmates, Romy
and Michele fabricate a success story (they settle on claiming to be
the inventors of Post-It notes), and hit the road for Arizona.
It doesn't take a genius to see where this movie is going - heck,
even Romy or Michele themselves could probably tell you that ROMY AND
MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION is going to see their cliqueish
tormenters receive their proper dressing-down, and that Romy and
Michele are going to make a splash at Sagebrush High and exit their
high school reunion triumphant.  Robin Schiff's screenplay doesn't
surprise in that respect, but its utter predicatability isn't
necessarily a bad thing for a film such as this; if the screenplay's
destination is already a given, at least we can hope for a good ride
along the way.
Unfortunately, this doesn't happen in ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL
REUNION.  An extended fantasy sequence (and I mean extended - it seems
to run for about fifteen minutes) in the middle of the film doesn't
quite work, nor does a series of flashback sequences depicting Romy
and Michele's persecuted high school years. The actual high school
reunion scenes also don't quite click - come to think of it, none of
the film really works as good as it could or should, which is a real
disappointment.  Ringing particularly false is an unnecessary incident
in the film which temporarily drives Romy and Michele apart; it
clearly comes off as a none-too-efficient device to build momentum for
the reunion scenes and the obligatory reconciliation scenes, and
doesn't work at all.
Ms. Sorvino and Ms. Kudrow struggle valiantly, and for the most part
succeed in bringing their dense Romy and Michele characters to the
screen; they're bubble-headed, but likeable protagonists for the film.
Ms. Kudrow is a bit more successful as Michele than Ms. Sorvino as
Romy; Ms. Sorvino's natural intelligence manages to shine through her
portrayal of the character, undermining the credibility of Romy's
ditzyness (which is somewhat of a surprise, given how successful she
was in an Academy Award-winning portrayal of a similarly vacant
character in MIGHTY APHRODITE).
None of the supporting characters in ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL
REUNION are particularly well-drawn out.  Class curmudgeon Heather
(the scene-stealing Janeane Garafolo) is funny, but her character is
mostly a mystery in ths film.  Oafish jock Billy Christiansen
(Vincent Ventresca), for whom Romy had a crush, and snobbish, nasty
cheerleader queen Christine (Julia Campbell) are predictably
one-dimensional, and class geek-turned-Bill Gates-clone Sandy Frank
(Alan Cumming) is nothing more than a caricature.
David Mirkin's feature film debut has a lot of energy and is
relentlessly upbeat, with the soundtrack being filled by cheery 1980s
pop songs from the likes of the Go-Gos and Bananarama, but Mr. Mirkin
seems to be unable to overcome the vaguely episodic nature of the
film's screenplay, resulting in a tendency for ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH
SCHOOL REUNION to lurch back and forth.  (There's an ironic scene in
the film where Romy and Michele, singing along with Kenny Loggins'
"Footloose" [and forgetting most of the lyrics], drive a vehicle that
does just that.)
ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION is a cheerful, frantically
feelgood comedy which ultimately proves to be unsatisfying.  It's
disappointing, because I found myself liking the Romy and Michele
characters; there's something endearing about their vacuous banter and
their obliviousness.  I'd like to see them in another movie, or at
least a better one than this.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"At one point when berated and bloodied by her male military superior,
 Moore screams out a guttural invitation to him to enjoy partaking in the
 absorption of a certain anatomical member." - Dan Cox, VARIETY, on G.I. JANE

Title
Review for Fast, Cheap & Out of Control (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
Very few filmmakers could even conceive of crafting a film in the
manner which Errol Morris did for his latest film, FAST, CHEAP & OUT
OF CONTROL, and even fewer filmmakers could actually pull it off.  It
is no surprise that Mr. Morris was successful, of course -- he's
clearly one of cinema's greatest documentarians (consider, if you
will, that among his illustrious filmography one will find entries
for GATES OF HEAVEN [his first feature, to boot], A BRIEF HISTORY OF
TIME, *and* the landmark 1988 film THE THIN BLUE), and once again he
has brought forth yet another interesting and completely inventive
film with his newest documentary.
Ostensibly a film which examines the varied occupations of four
seemingly dissimilar men -- Rodney Brooks, a M.I.T. robotics expert;
Dave Hoover, an aging circus lion tamer who idolizes the late circus
trainer Clyde Beatty; Ray Mendez, a mole rat researcher; and George
Mendonca, an elderly topiary gardener -- FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF CONTROL
is far more ambitious in scope than to simply document these
vocations, and is subtle in revealing its intended implications.
Only gradually do the parallels between the endeavours of the
subjects become evident, and progressively the film's themes become
apparent.
Initially, one can see no obvious connection between the film's four
subjects -- one can understandably fail to see much in common between
the work of a lion tamer and that of a gardener, or of a robotics
developer for that matter -- but Mr. Morris cleverly utilises
interviews with the subjects and associative footage of their work in
a unique manner.  FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF CONTROL stealthily weaves
interview footage of the four subjects, at times intercutting the
commentary of one with the activities of another, evoking new meaning
to their diatribes and new inadvertent insights.  However, these
implications are never explicit in their presentation during the
film, leaving it very much up as an exercise to the viewer to detect
and decipher the additional layers of complexity given to each of
these scenes.  It's quite a novel and stunning technique which keeps
the audience perpetually involved, and certainly a method which lifts
the film above the drabness which afflicts a typical talking-head
documentary.
Mr. Morris' film is hardly overly cerebral, though -- while
educational and provocative, FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF CONTROL is also
highly entertaining and often funny.  Mr. Mendez's wild enthusiasm
and clear affection for his blind, hairless mole rats, in conjunction
with his attire (especially the bow-tie) make for humourous viewing,
while it is mildly surreal to observe Mr. Brooks' unblinking
cheeriness during his prognostication of the forthcoming obsolescence
of "carbon-based life", to be eventually replaced by his beloved
silicon-based "lifeforms".  However, it's Mr. Morris' great affection
for his subjects, clearly evident throughout the film, which allow us
to titter at the depths of the subjects' fascinations without a hint
of ridicule entering the mix.  The comic nature of FAST, CHEAP & OUT
OF CONTROL is accentuated by Caleb Sampson's quirky score, as well as
mixing typical headshot interview footage with miscellaneous clips
from old movie serials (including one featuring Clyde Beatty), which,
as much in this film, at first appears to have little relevance but
ultimately resonates strongly with the themes explored.
It is perhaps a good thing that FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF CONTROL does not
heavily rely on the interview sessions with Mr. Morris' four
spotlighted men as the sole basis for its highly unconventional
narrative, for it seems to run out of material about fifteen minutes
prematurely; that the film can continue to confound and fascinate
despite the further lack of insight into the four subjects during the
film's final fifth lessens the severity of this shortcoming.  Yet
another triumph for Mr. Morris, FAST, CHEAP & OUT OF CONTROL is both
a profile of four interesting professions, and a contemplation of the
quickly changing scope of humanity and man's unsated, inordinate
demand for control.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I'll shoot for the Queen, and you can shoot for, well, whomever."
                               - Richard Harris, UNFORGIVEN

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The situation is explosive.  A lone former employee has commandeered
   the Museum of Natural History.  Armed with a shotgun and explosives,
   he's wounded a security guard, and holds a few museum employees and
   a visiting class of young children hostage.  Holed up behind the
   relative safety of museum's security implementations, his sole
   liaison to the police and outside world is -- a ruthlessly ambitious,
   ethically bankrupt TV investigative reporter?  Uh-oh.
   Such is the scenario for Costa-Gavras' MAD CITY, which, through
   exposition of the increasingly-compromised ethics and outright
   dishonesty in modern television reporting, wants to be a searing
   indictment against the media, but ultimately produces little more
   than a singe.
   Chief in its problems is its lack of originality; this is simply a
   story which is too familiar to be told in such a straightforward
   manner.  Not only has the theme of media manipulation been addressed
   in similar fashion in several other films, but it's safe to conclude
   that by now the increasingly mistrusting and suspicious public is
   jaded enough to fully realize that the reporting it absorbs through
   print, radio, and television comes with a spin courtesy of the
   source which delivers it.  Tom Matthews' screenplay for MAD CITY
   tells us nothing new in this respect; it's preaching to the
   converted.
   Essentially a character study which focuses on the everchanging and
   curiously symbiotic relationship between gunman Sam Baily (John
   Travolta), a museum security guard recently laid off due to budgetary
   constraints who accidentally triggered the hostage siege when
   returning to attempt to plead his case to museum director Mrs.
   Banks (Blythe Danner), and reporter Max Brackett (Dustin Hoffman),
   a former network star desperate to regain his ace status after being
   demoted to local coverage, MAD CITY is relatively intimate and staid
   enough that it could function in a glossed-down form as a stage
   production.
   Sam is not a bad man: he's effectively a slow-witted simpleton
   played by Mr. Travolta as a lost puppy dog who haplessly bumbled his
   way into the volatile situation presented in MAD CITY.  The film
   takes great pains to assert his relative innocuousness -- his
   shooting of the other security guard (fine character actor Bill
   Nunn, curiously billed extremely low considering his substantial role
   in the film) was accidental -- by presenting him with a childlike
   mentality: he frolics with and wins over the captive schoolchildren,
   and perpetually turns to Max for guidance.  In this treatment, MAD
   CITY tries to be a bit too cute for its own good at times, which
   undermines the tension inherent in the situation.
   Of course, Max is happy to pull the strings behind this story and
   milk it for all it's worth -- this is his ticket back to the big
   time.  While the film is often simply blatantly unsubtle with its
   theme of media manipulation and sensationalism, as evident by a
   recurring thread in which Max tutors Sam on how to play up the
   situation in order to win public support (and of course, in his own
   self-interest, create high ratings), as well as a scene where Max
   edits and syncs interview footage until the final product corresponds
   with what he wants his subjects to say, one can almost relish his
   forthright, unapologetic lack of scruples.  While not disturbing as
   the film would seem to like, Max's aggressive naked ambition
   occasionally proves to be quite amusing: a particularly good moment
   in the film is a flashback sequent which depicts the cause for Max's
   demotion -- a moment of on-air grandstanding histrionics which
   humiliated network anchorman Kevin Hollander (Alan Alda).  However,
   in a move which seems arbitrarily artificial, MAD CITY ends up trying
   to play it both ways by having Max be as slimy and manipulative as
   the system the film cries out against, and then do a sudden
   about-face as the plot requires and grow a conscience; it rings
   patently false.
   Yet, although it's anticlimactic and often a little too heavy-handed,
   MAD CITY is always engaging and maintains interest.  Well shot by
   Patrick Bloosier and paced well, the film unfolds in a logical
   progression which is predictable but ultimately inevitable.
   It's helped by good performances from its cast.  MAD CITY is
   essentially a showcase for Mr. Hoffman and Mr. Travolta, who are
   solid in their respective roles.  I couldn't help but enjoy Mr.
   Hoffman's depiction of a character who discards objective reporting
   and puts a spin on his story with nonchalant efficiency, and Mr.
   Travolta, despite my best efforts to resist, is occasionally
   endearing through his character's bewilderment at the escalating
   situation in which he finds himself.  He does tend to substitute the
   use of slang for obliviousness in his character here, much as he did
   for a remarkably similar character in another performance -- in
   Desmond Nakano's WHITE MAN'S BURDEN, Mr. Travolta played a
   lower-class, uneducated working man whom, after being laid off from a
   menial job, took his employer hostage.  On the note of drawing
   parallels to previous work, the theme of chastising media
   manipulation isn't new to Mr. Hoffman, as can be witnessed in Stephen
   Frears' HERO (titled ACCIDENTAL HERO overseas).
   Mia Kirshner has a lot of spunk as the protege videographer Laurie
   who falls under Max's wing and learns the tricks of the trade
   all-too-well, eventually becoming seduced with the glamour of
   'making' the news.  Ms. Danner is good in a small role as the museum
   director and lends dignity to the part, although most of the time she
   just gets to stand around.  Mr. Alda is fine, although it's somewhat
   dubious to cast him as a network star anchorman -- he just doesn't
   have the gladhanding aura about him.  William Atherton rehashes a
   variation of his most famous role from as unscrupulous reporter
   Richard Thornberg in DIE HARD (which, in its own way, was even more
   effective and less self-righteous in its skewering of the media) --
   here, he plays a transparently-vacuous local anchorman.
   While MAD CITY thankfully avoided overt parallels to the O.J. Simpson
   media circus, and was wrapped production before any references to the
   Princess Diana incident could be made, the handling of the race card
   in the film struck me as far too heavy-handed, and the montages of
   T-shirts being sold outside the museum and folk singers strumming
   odes to Sam pushed the film too far into satire.  Granted, as can be
   seen from coverage outside the L.A. courtroom from 1996, it's not at
   all unbelievable, but the film would have been more effective and had
   a stronger impact had the emphasis on the carnival-like atmosphere
   which prevails along with media events been lessened.
   MAD CITY can be neatly encapsulated with one particular sequence, in
   which Max chastises Laurie for aiding the wounded museum guard --
   she can't film him and help him at the same time, and the former
   clearly takes precedent.  It's a heartless sentiment, but the
   sequence, like the film itself, is neither quite as disturbing or
   shocking as it's intended to be, because we already know the film's
   angle.  For a potentially potent story, MAD CITY, while eminently
   watchable, is curiously hollow.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I'll never forget you.  You're too weird."
        - David Krumholtz, ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
TWO GIRLS AND A GUY (Fox Searchlight - 1998)
Starring Robert Downey Jr., Heather Graham, Natasha Gregson Wagner
Screenplay by James Toback
Produced by Edward R. Pressman, Chris Hanley
Directed by James Toback
Running time: 92 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   James Toback's return to directing after a eight-year layoff, TWO
   GIRLS AND A GUY, is a film which is comprised, more or less, of just
   that: one guy, Blake (Robert Downey Jr.); two girls, Carla (Heather
   Graham) and Lou (Natasha Gregson Wagner); one primary setting
   (Blake's absurdly spacious bachelor apartment), and a great deal of
   dialogue.  Embracing a near real-time approach, this is a highly
   theatrical feature that completely hangs upon the performances of its
   three actors and the quality of the dialogue written by Mr. Toback
   for his bantering characters.  Fortunately, the film's cast is up to
   the challenge, and the wordy exchanges between the triad of
   characters, while admittedly variable, are occasionally wickedly
   amusing.
   The film's setup is fairly generic in nature, and opens rather
   unpromisingly.  We meet self-possessed blonde Carla and feisty
   brunette Lou, both waiting outside a SoHo loft.  As they engage in
   idle chatter, it is revealed that they're both waiting for their
   respective boyfriends to return from the airport, and it doesn't take
   long for them to come to the realisation that they're being two-timed
   by the same guy.  More indignant with him than catty with each other,
   the duo break into Blake's loft and await his arrival for a
   confrontation.
   It's when Blake returns to his abode where the film hits its stride.
   Played with magnificent bombast by Mr. Downey Jr., Blake is a cad,
   all right, but a captivatingly dynamic, blusterous, and stealthy
   piece of work that bursts onto the scene and raises the stakes to new
   heights.  It's fascinating to watch this character in his natural
   habitat, and perhaps the film's best choice was to have his two
   girlfriends scamper off into hiding upon his return, allowing us to
   size up Blake not with his interactions with others, but by his own
   innate behaviour.  Whether he's flamboyantly behind his piano in a
   rollicking rendition of Vivaldi, or on the phone leaving messages to
   his beloveds (Carla, Lou, and his unseen sickly mother), it's never
   less than wildly entertaining and insightful.
   Though at this point I almost hoped the film would transform into a
   one-man show -- A Typical Afternoon In The Life Of Blake, if you will
   -- Carla, and then Lou, reveal themselves, and the sparks begin to
   fly.  (One of the great touches in the film is how Blake, when
   startled by Carla's unannounced appearance, begins to both verbally
   and physically backpedal even before he realizes that the cat's out
   of the bag.)  Double-teamed by the understandably aggrieved women
   (who are more smirkingly inquisitive than ferociously vengeful --
   they want a justification for his ongoing hypocrisy), an
   increasingly-flustered Blake weakly defends himself with apologetic
   and even self-righteous declarations against their verbal jabs.
   Surprisingly delightful in the waltz of scathing witty banter shared
   by its trio of characters, TWO GIRLS AND A GUY concludes its first
   sequence with an unexpected apoplectic act of such outrageous
   audacity that it seemed nothing was off-limits for this film.
   However, it'd be unfeasible to attempt to string along Carla and
   Lou's outrage to full feature-length, and it's as the movie gradually
   transforms into the sharing of exploratory profundities on the nature
   of fidelity and relationships that it slowly but surely begins to
   unravel.  The dialogue becomes less and less engaging and clever, the
   film's tempo loses its liveliness, the dynamic between the characters
   evolves in unconvincing fashion, and several sequences fall flat.
   Subtle and not-quite-subtle allusions are made (a poster of JULES ET
   JIM hangs prominently on the wall), and secrets are revealed which
   barrel the film toward an uncompelling weepy finale.
   One key turning point in the film is the kinky sex scene between
   Blake and Carla.  TWO GIRLS AND A GUY was embroiled in a bitter,
   long-running dispute with the MPAA with regards to this scene --
   contractually-obligated to deliver an R-rated film, Mr. Toback was
   forced to resubmit fourteen scaled-down versions of the steamy
   interlude before the MPAA withdrew their NC-17 rating in favour of an
   R -- and while admittedly titillating, the net effect of the vignette
   on the film's thematic narrative is rather dubious.
   If anything, TWO GIRLS AND A GUY serves as a showcase for the
   phenomenal talents of Mr. Downey Jr., whose versatility is put to the
   test in this film.  He plays the gamut from indignant to humbled,
   from self-assured to disconcerted, yet his acting gears shift so
   smoothly as to not be registered.  It's a wonderful performance in a
   role custom-tailored for him; Mr. Toback wrote the screenplay in four
   days shortly after Mr. Downey Jr. was arrested on drug charges, and
   it's hard not to see echoes of reality seeping into his character --
   in a monologue to his mirrored reflection, Blake's self-chiding to
   "get [his] shit together" is disquieting in its resonance.
   While Mr. Downey Jr.'s showstopping performance is undoubtedly the
   primary strength of the film, both actresses are solid in more
   broadly-observed roles.  Ms. Graham is quickly becoming one of
   America's more daring actresses, involving herself in three
   successive risky projects -- TWO GIRLS AND A GUY and BOOGIE NIGHTS
   are both quite sexually frank, while LOST IN SPACE has a screenplay
   penned by Akiva Goldsman.  She's quite appealing here, playing a
   character at once both dainty and sultry.  Meanwhile, Ms. Gregson
   Wagner initially portrays Lou with such an unwarranted spunk that
   audiences are likely to find it either annoying, or, like me,
   endearing.  She tones it down substantially as the film progresses,
   but I found her more fun to watch as the artificially excitable
   chatterbox.
   The film was reportedly shot in eleven days, filmed mostly in
   sequence, and the resultant artifacts of this rapid shoot are evident
   throughout.  TWO GIRLS AND A GUY has an agile, spontaneous sort of
   feel, and one senses that Mr. Toback encouraged a good deal of
   improvisation from his three actors.  While the film could be
   transposed directly to the stage more or less intact, it doesn't feel
   constricted; the expansive apartment setting is well-used to vary the
   background, and Mr. Toback allows his camera to wander and linger on
   his characters in an effective manner.
   TWO GIRLS AND A GUY falls short of its potential, but thanks to some
   stellar work by Mr. Downey Jr., it's still often an enjoyable,
   bitingly funny romp, particularly as we watch the
   surprisingly-resilient Blake evasively try to rationalize his
   behaviour and even turn the tables on his girlfriends.  "I'm an
   actor," he tells them at one point, using the ol' tried-and-tested
   occupational-hazard defense.  "Actors lie."  But not, they all seem
   to agree, Denzel Washington.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Sometimes, I have an overwhelming temptation to grab someone by the throat,
 head-butt them, leave them bleeding in the corner, saying 'That is my
 critical response to you.'" - NSFC award-winning director Mike Figgis

Title
Review for Extreme Measures (1996)
(Columbia-Castle Rock - 1996)
Starring Hugh Grant, Gene Hackman, Sarah Jessica Parker, David Morse,
   Paul Guilfoyle, Debra Monk, Bill Nunn
Screenplay by Tony Gilroy, based on the novel by Michael Palmer
Produced by Elizabeth Hurley
Directed by Michael Apted
Running time: 110 minutes
The medical thriller genre has been fairly dormant in recent years,
but Michael Apted's new film, EXTREME MEASURES, is a solid entry to
the genre, and looks to have strong commercial potential.  Making a
halfhearted attempt to touch on moral issues, the film is by and
large a thriller, and as such, a fairly good one.
Hotshot ER doctor Guy Luthan (played by Hugh Grant) is going places.
The British doctor, working in New York under a work permit, is the
star of Gramercy Hospital, and hobnobs with prestigous and brilliant
doctors like the presidentially-acclaimed Dr. Lawrence Myrick (played
by Gene Hackman).  When a homeless man is brought into Luthan's ER,
suffering from a multitude of convulsions, he is baffled by the
patient's spontaneously changing conditions.  Before dying, the
homeless man gasps off a few revelatory sentences to Luthan.
While everyone else writes off the incident as a mildly unusual
incident from a drugged-out homeless man (or not even that - "This
is New York!" points out one character), Luthan is unconvinced, and
begins to probe.  Finding resistance from senior staff, he becomes
intrigued and pushes deeper and deeper, even as obstacles and roadblocks
are thrown up in front of him.  Subtle and not-so-subtle threats
are issued at Luthan.
It doesn't take a neurosurgeon to see where this is going.  Tony
Gilroy's screenplay adaptation (he last adapted DOLORES CLAIBORNE)
isn't filled with innovative new concepts or clever banter, but it
is well-paced and, despite the familiarity of the basic plot,
engaging.  One knows where EXTREME MEASURES is headed, but it doesn't
really detract from the film.
The reason why is mostly the work of Hugh Grant in the leading role.
Getting his first chance to show off his dramatic chops since his
North American breakthrough in 1994 (supporting performance in SENSE
AND SENSIBILITY notwithstanding), Grant is wholly convincing and
credible as the young doctor whose life is torn apart around him.
While some of the action scenes surrounding Grant may be difficult
to swallow, his portrayal of the sharp and surehanded ER doctor are
on the nose.  Gene Hackman, despite his billing before the film's
title, plays a supporting role (or even a glorified cameo), and Sarah
Jessica Parker's character is really more of a plot device, so the
weight of EXTREME MEASURES has to be carried by Grant, who proves
to be up to the task.
In addition to its thriller elements, the film also attempts to deal
with moral issues - namely, the cost (and price) one is willing to
pay for medical treatment.  Foreshadowed earlier in EXTREME MEASURES
when Luthan is blasted by his supervisor for approving expensive lab
tests on a patient with no medical insurance, this theme ends up
casting a long shadow over the final third of the film.
Still, EXTREME MEASURES is not a wrenching drama, but a conventional
thriller, with the requisite gunfire and chase sequences and mano-a-mano
fisticuffs.  Director Michael Apted's last foray into this genre was
the little-seen BLINK (1993), and he proficiently handles this film,
always keeping things moving and keeping the audience involved.  With
his solid direction and Grant's fine performance, Castle Rock may
have another hit on their hands.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
JACKIE BROWN (Miramax - 1997)
Starring Pam Grier, Samuel L. Jackson, Robert Forster, Bridget Fonda,
  Michael Keaton, Robert De Niro, Michael Bowen, Chris Tucker
Screenplay by Quentin Tarantino, based on the novel RUM PUNCH by
  Elmore Leonard
Produced by Lawrence Bender
Directed by Quentin Tarantino
Running time: 155 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   During the three years since the release of the groundbreaking
   success PULP FICTION, the cinematic output from its creator, Quentin
   Tarantino, has been surprisingly low.  Oh, he's been busy -- doing
   the talk show circuit, taking small roles in various films,
   overseeing the production of his screenplay FROM DUSK TILL DAWN,
   making cameo appearances on television shows, providing a vignette
   for the ill-fated anthology FOUR ROOMS -- everything, it seems,
   except direct another feature-length film.  It's been the long
   intermission between projects as well as the dizzying peak which PULP
   FICTION reached which has made Mr. Tarantino's new feature film,
   JACKIE BROWN, one of the most anticipated films of the year, and his
   third feature film cements his reputation as the single most
   important new American filmmaker to emerge from the 1990s.
   Things aren't going well for Jackie Brown (Pam Grier).  She's 44
   years old, stuck at a dead-end job ("$16,000 a year, plus retirement
   benefits that aren't worth a damn") as a flight attendant for the
   worst airline in North America -- and she's just been caught at the
   airport by ATF agent Ray Nicolette (portrayed with terrific childlike
   enthusiasm by Michael Keaton) and police officer Mark Dargus (Michael
   Bowen) smuggling $50 000 from Mexico for gun-runner Ordell Robbie
   (Samuel L. Jackson), who has her bailed out by unassuming bail
   bondsman Max Cherry (Robert Forster).  The loquacious Ordell, based
   out of a Hermosa Beach house where his horny, bong-hitting surfer
   girl Melanie (Bridget Fonda) and agreeable crony Louis Gara (Robert
   De Niro) hang out, operates under the policy that the best rat is a
   dead rat, and he's soon out to silence Jackie Brown.  Meanwhile, the
   authorities' target is Ordell, and they want Jackie to help them by
   arranging a sting to the tune of a half-million dollars.  Only
   through a series of clever twists, turns, and double-crosses will
   Jackie be able to gain the upper hand on both of her nemeses.
   Although JACKIE BROWN marks Mr. Tarantino's first produced screenplay
   adaptation (based on the Elmore Leonard novel "Rum Punch"), there's
   no mistaking his distinctive fingerprints all over this film.  While
   he's adhered closely to the source material in a narrative sense, the
   setting has been relocated to Los Angeles and the lead character's
   now black.  In terms of ambiance, the film harkens back to the 1970s,
   from the wall-to-wall funk and soul music drowning the soundtrack to
   the nondescript look of the sets -- even the opening title credit
   sequence has the echo of vintage 1970s productions.  The opening
   sequence featuring Ms. Grier wordlessly striding through the LAX,
   funky music blaring away on the speakers, is emblematic of films of
   that era.  The timeframe for the film is in fact 1995, but the
   atmosphere of JACKIE BROWN is decidedly retro.
   Of course, nothing in the film screams 1970s more than the casting of
   Pam Grier and Robert Forster as the two leads, and although the caper
   intrigue is fun to watch as the plot twists, backstabbing, and
   deceptions deliciously unfold, the strength of JACKIE BROWN is the
   quiet, understated relationship developed between Jackie and Max;
   when they kiss, it's perhaps the most tender scene of the year.
   Tenderness?  In a Quentin Tarantino film?  Sure, there've been
   moments of sweetness in his prior films -- the affectionate exchanges
   between the Bruce Willis and Maria de Madeiros characters in PULP
   FICTION and the unflagging dedication shared by the characters of Tim
   Roth and Amanda Plummer, or even in RESERVOIR DOGS, where a deep,
   unspoken bond develops between the Harvey Keitel and Tim Roth
   characters -- but for the most part, Mr. Tarantino's films are
   typified by manic energy, unexpected outbursts of violence, and
   clever, often wordy, banter.  These staples of his work are all
   present in JACKIE BROWN, but what's new here is a different facet of
   his storytelling -- a willingness to imbue the film with a poignant
   emotional undercurrent, and a patience to draw out several scenes
   with great deliberation.  This effective demonstration of range
   prohibits the pigeonholing of Mr. Tarantino as simply a helmer of
   slick, hip crime dramas with fast-talking lowlifes, and heralds him
   as a bonafide multifaceted talent; he's the real deal.
   This new aspect of Mr. Tarantino's storytelling is probably best
   embodied in a single character -- that of the world-weary, sensitive,
   and exceedingly-professional Max Cherry, whose unspoken attraction to
   Jackie is touching.  Mr. Forster's nuanced, understated performance
   is the best in the film; he creates an amiable character of such
   poignancy that when he gazes at Jackie, we smile along with him.
   Much press has been given about the casting of blaxploitation-era
   icon Pam Grier in the lead, with the wags buzzing that Mr. Tarantino
   may do for her what his PULP FICTION did to bolster John Travolta's
   then-sagging career.  As it turns out, Ms. Grier is solid in the
   film's title role, although nothing here forces her to test her
   range.  I do have to take exception to the claim that this film marks
   her career resurrection, though -- she's been working steadily over
   the years, often in direct-to-video action flicks, but also in such
   recent theatrical releases as Tim Burton's MARS ATTACKS! and Larry
   Cohen's ORIGINAL GANGSTAS (where she first teamed up with Mr.
   Forster.)  Of course, it's true that her role here was a Godsend -- a
   meaty a part as this is rarity for *any* actress, let alone one of
   her age and current status in the industry.
   While JACKIE BROWN may disappoint those looking for another PULP
   FICTION clone, it marks tremendous growth of Mr. Tarantino as a
   director whose horizons are rapidly expanding, and whose
   characterizations have never been better.  And while the film's
   narrative doesn't really warrant a running time of 155 minutes, it's
   filled with such sumptuous riches, ranging from the brashness of the
   vivid soundtrack to entertaining, inconsequential conversations
   between the characters, that there wasn't an unengaging moment.  With
   an impressive trio of feature films under his belt, it'll be
   interesting to see what he tries next.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"There was a six-year-old girl sitting near me, and she piped up 'That's
 Harvey Keitel' within seconds of the film's start.  I want to know what
 that kid's been seeing." - Charles Odell

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
(Warner Bros. - 1997)
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Uma
  Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Michael Gough
Screenplay by Akiva Goldsman
Produced by Peter Macgregor-Scott
Directed by Joel Schumacher
Running time: 130 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
I had never thought that an entry in the modern incarnation
of the BATMAN feature film would approach this level of
campiness, but in many instances BATMAN AND ROBIN nears, and at
some point even exceeds this standard.  This is a
disasterously bad film, easily the worst in the series to
date, and fairly epitomizes a cinematic definition of the word
excessive - it's loud, garish, and obnoxious, with pointless,
gratuitous action sequences and set pieces which clutter up
the screen with elaborate production design to the point of
overkill. 
BATMAN AND ROBIN features the Caped Crusaders (George Clooney
debuting as Batman, with Chris O'Donnell returing as Robin)
squaring off against another bevy of chemically-induced
villains - the nefarious ice-cold Mr. Freeze (Arnold
Schwarzenegger), armed with a weapon which freezes everything
in its sights, and the slinky Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman), who
has the ability to blow powerful love dust into the faces of
men in order so that they will fall helplessly in love with
her (not that the dust is really necessary to accomplish this
result, but whatever), and then dispatch them with a poisoned
kiss.  By Ivy's side is the giant steroid monster Bane (Jeep
Swanson), a grunting hulk of a beast.  The villains' goals
are noble ones - Freeze steals diamonds to power his climate
suit (in order to keep his body temperature at zero degrees),
so that he can survive in order to devise a cure for his
beloved wife (Vendela), dying of a degenerative disease and
frozen in suspended animation, and Ivy's intent is to restore
the dominance of plant life on Earth, albeit by destroying all
human life.  Meanwhile, on the homefront, life at Wayne Manor
is thrown into upheaval by the illness of butler Alfred
Pennyworth (Michael Gough), and the arrival of his niece
Barbara (Alicia Silverstone). 
Akiva Goldsman's screenplay for the film is ridiculous and
laughably bad, with astonishingly terrible dialogue, lame
jokes, and an awful by-the-number plot which simply coasts
along and fails to generate any genuine excitement.  It makes
Goldsman's screenplay of BATMAN FOREVER, which I thought was
dreadful, look positively inspired in comparison. I am still
astonished that a cheesy plot device which I'd seen used in -
no joke - an episode of GILLIGAN'S ISLAND somehow make its
way into a multimillion dollar blockbuster production. 
Joel Schumacher's direction of BATMAN AND ROBIN is horrific,
with a terrible balance of flashiness over substance.  There
is a clear conceit towards neon in this film, even moreso
than with his previous BATMAN FOREVER, with the revamped
Batcave helpfully sporting gigantic glowing emblems for the
Dynamic Duo (just in case, I suppose, if they ever happen to
forget that the Batcave is the headquarters of Batman and
Robin), and with neon prominently figuring in an
utterly-pointless fight sequence with Bane and a street gang
over Ivy's chosen new abode.  Another action sequence which
fails to serve any useful point other than to chew up five
minutes of screentime involves an incredibly uninvolving
late-night motorcycle race with Barbara and some Gotham
goons.  Mr. Schumacher's focus for BATMAN AND ROBIN appears to
be to make the film as visually striking as possible, to the
detriment of the story - there are drastic shifts in the tone
of the film between all-out camp and heartfelt drama, with
the latter completely unconvincing and ineffective. 
It is perhaps not the most promising of signs when the group
I was with burst out laughing within twenty seconds of the
film's opening, even before a single line of dialogue had
been uttered.  Is BATMAN AND ROBIN supposed to be campy? I
think it is - it's hard to imagine that the filmmakers could
have intended many parts of the film to be taken at all
seriously.  (One of my favourites was when Bane helpfully
grunted "Bomb!" each time he laid down an explosive device in
the Gotham Observatory.)  Is it supposed to be as overly
campy as it turned out to be? I somehow doubt it - the
subplot involving Afred is delivered so solemnly and with
such graveness that the impression is made that the film
isn't attempting to be the utter farce which it is. 
Arnold Schwarzenegger is top-billed in the film as the
villainous Mr. Freeze, and is bland and uninteresting,
perhaps the worst thing that a villain can be.  Mr.
Schwarzenegger's attempts to be menacing are laughable, and
his attempts at conveying pathos are laughable; frankly,
everything he does onscreen is laughable.  By the end of the
film, I was stifling a chuckle every time he simply appeared
onscreen.  The bulk of his performance consists of uttering
near-unintelligble puns and one-liners featuring every
possible permutation of "Cool!" in the least inventive way. 
George Clooney has been given very little to do in BATMAN AND
ROBIN, being overshadowed by the villains, and consequently
he looks rather uncomfortable in the film.  His Batman is
hardly an imposing figure.  Chris O'Donnell is unimpressive
in a one-note performance, while Alicia Silverstone
lackadasically fails to make any impression at all. 
The film's one saving grace? Undoubtably Uma Thurman's
entertaining performance as sexy villainess Poison Ivy.  Her
work in BATMAN AND ROBIN is certainly over-the-top, but in a
controlled fashion which works splendidly within the tone of
the film.  Ms. Thurman's comic timing is impeccable, and
reminds us that it takes skilled performers to make campiness
work successfully.  (I'm already starting to positively
reassess Jim Carrey's performance in BATMAN FOREVER.)  Her
amusing Poison Ivy is the most entertaining character in the
film, and when she's offscreen the film greatly suffers.  I
figure that if one has to die, being kissed to death by Uma
Thurman isn't a half-bad way to go. 
While BATMAN AND ROBIN was hardly a ride of pulse-pounding
excitement, I must admit that I was not bored watching it,
although I did glance at my watch repeatedly through the
screening - my attention was kept through anticipation of the
utterance of yet another terrible pun or one-liner, and by
awaiting yet another scene to fall flat.  It's been a long
time since I've laughed so much at a movie.  "At", of course,
is the operative word. 

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   I think there's one thing that its many enthusiasts and handful of
   detractors can safely agree on: there isn't anything remotely
   innovative about Gus Van Sant's latest film, GOOD WILL HUNTING,
   co-written by stars Matt Damon and Ben Affleck.  It is what it is --
   a relentlessly feelgood drama following a conventional, utterly
   predictable storyline focused upon a directionless young man with
   talent to burn, and the attempts of those around him to help him find
   the right path.  The film's about as unsubtle as a brick through your
   front window, but damned if it isn't effective.
   20-year old Will Hunting (Matt Damon) is a once-in-a-generation-type
   genius who can instantly recall obscure passages from texts and has
   the inherent raw ability to casually solve mathematical problems
   which are considered year-long endeavours by some of the world's
   greatest minds.  However, Will's decidedly working-class, and
   cheerfully so; the film presents the irony of a high school dropout
   toiling as a janitor at the prestigious MIT who's more brilliant than
   any of the university's students *or* teachers.  He's also a bit of a
   handful; orphaned and in and out of foster homes during his
   childhood, Will's had several run-ins with the law.  When
   award-winning professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard of BREAKING THE
   WAVES and INSOMNIA, in another fine performance) presents his class
   with a thorny mathematical challenge, he's taken aback when the
   correct solution appears on the blackboard outside the lecture hall
   the very next day.  None of the students take credit for the
   anonymous answer (they must be pretty honourable over at MIT; at my
   old school, you'd find no shortage of brownnosers who'd falsely lay
   claim to the honour in a heartbeat), but Lambeau is stunned to find
   that it's Will who's the resident genius when he catches the janitor
   scrawling the solutions to a second challenge on the blackboard.
   Before Lambeau can take the prodigy under his wing, Will finds
   himself under arrest after zealously striking a police officer
   intervening in a neighbourhood altercation involving him and his
   buddies Chuckie (Ben Affleck), Morgan (Casey Affleck), and Billy
   (Cole Hauser).  Lambeau convinces the authorities to give Will
   parole, hinging on a weekly math session and the promise of
   counseling.
   It's at this point where the film shifts its focus to where its
   interest lies: the relationship that develops between Will and
   similarly-wounded therapist Sean McGuire (Robin Williams), and how
   after initial dislike and mistrust, they slowly bond and eventually
   help each other overcome past traumas.  Cue the maudlin music.
   The film's hokey and sentimentalist, but it works, successfully
   remaining uplifting and heartwarming despite its obvious generic
   formulism.  To a good extent, the film's ability to overcome problems
   associated with predictability can be credited to the solid
   performances turned in from its impressive cast.  Mr. Williams is
   fine in his quiet, self-contained role, never lapsing into his
   typical zany persona; he carries himself with demeanour of a man
   whose silent sadness weighs upon him like an anchor.  Meanwhile, Mr.
   Damon impresses as the title character, effortlessly alternating
   through Will's many faces -- street tough, brilliant genius, charming
   suitor, exasperating smart-ass, fragile soul -- he's convincingly
   persuasive in all of them.
   Credit has to be allocated to helmer Gus Van Sant as well, who
   fortunately refrains from beating the audience over the head during
   the film's frequent emotionally poignant moments.  His helming is
   thoroughly competent workmanship, with one scene standing out as
   particularly visually striking: a sequence with Will and new love
   Skylar (Minnie Driver) contentedly chatting in bed, which is
   wonderfully lit and shot in close-up by cinematographer Jean Yves
   Escoffier as a great tapestry of flesh and shadows filling the frame,
   gently shifting and rolling like a series of wakes on the sea.
   The GOOD WILL HUNTING screenplay is exceedingly neat and tidy,
   ensuring that everything is brought full circle, and that every major
   event in the film meticulously ties into a prior anecdote.  This may
   or may not be a good thing -- it's certainly tidy screenwriting, but
   it comes across as overly calculated, and plays out onscreen with a
   noticeable loss of spontaneity, particularly in the film's coda where
   key lines are dropped like dominos.
   I admired that the film's screenplay had the temerity to make its
   protagonist not only impertinent and belligerent (albeit, naturally,
   in a loveable, audience-winning sort of way), but even occasionally
   downright cruel to those around him, goading other sympathetic
   characters and zeroing in on their soft spots.  However, the change
   in the Lambeau character as the film progressed seemed particularly
   arbitrary, an artificial means with which to bring the plot to a
   head.
   The themes and storyline of GOOD WILL HUNTING are hardly fresh; they
   are, however, executed effectively.  There's a great deal of
   crowdpleasing material in the film -- one-upmanship of hissable
   characters, warm fuzzy emotional epiphanies, cute snappy one-liners
   -- and if one can ignore the sheer predictability of the story and
   overlook the shameless tugging on the heartstrings, there's much to
   enjoy.
   If anything, the genesis of the GOOD WILL HUNTING project is more
   interesting than the film itself.  Penned by childhood buddies Matt
   Damon and Ben Affleck while they were struggling actors, their
   screenplay generated a bidding war among the studios which quickly
   elevated to a figure of an even million dollars -- if the actors
   would detach themselves from the project.  Resolved to stay on as
   actors on their project, the duo stuck to their guns and eventually
   sold the screenplay (with themselves attached as stars) to Castle
   Rock Entertainment for a lesser fee of $500 000.  The project
   eventually made its way over to Miramax, who have to be delighted
   with the way things have worked out; during the interim, these two
   then-unknowns have blossomed into the hottest young actors working
   today -- Mr. Affleck, fresh from the critically-acclaimed Kevin Smith
   film CHASING AMY, will appear in the upcoming summer Bruce Willis
   vehicle ARMAGEDDON, as well as Dimension's sci-fi thriller PHANTOMS
   and New Line's comedy BALLING THE JACK.  Meanwhile, Mr. Damon seems
   to have been anointed as Hollywood's new It guy (taking over from pal
   Matthew McConaughey), scoring coveted roles with directors as
   esteemed as Francis Ford Coppola (JOHN GRISHAM'S THE RAINMAKER) and
   Steven Spielberg (the upcoming SAVING PRIVATE RYAN).  Well done,
   gents -- but as for GOOD WILL HUNTING: cripes, what's with the
   ridiculous title?
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"There was a six-year-old girl sitting near me, and she piped up 'That's
 Harvey Keitel' within seconds of the film's start.  I want to know what
 that kid's been seeing." - Charles Odell

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER (Columbia - 1997)
Starring Jennifer Love Hewitt, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Ryan Phillippe,
  Freddie Prinze Jr., Muse Wats, Anne Heche, Bridgette Wilson
Screenplay by Kevin Williamson, based on the novel by Lois Duncan
Produced by Neil H. Moritz, Erik Feig, Stokely Chaffin
Directed by Jim Gillespie
Running time: 101 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   You knew it was bound to happen.  With the completely unanticipated
   degree of success enjoyed by Wes Craven's SCREAM from December 1996,
   it was just a matter of time before the revitalized teen slasher
   genre revved back into gear, and I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
   manages to be among the first to capitalize on the trend. As of this
   writing, it's an unqualified hit -- consider that it topped the
   domestic weekend tallies for its first three weeks; only
   megablockbusters MEN IN BLACK, LIAR LIAR, and STAR WARS: SPECIAL
   EDITION have done likewise in 1997 -- and it's sure to give
   credibility to the cost-effective strategy of raiding television
   shows for pretty young starlets in order to assemble an ensemble cast
   which will draw the youth demographic.  Putting aside the lawsuit
   from Miramax over I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER's advertising
   campaign (which touted the film as being from the creator of
   Dimension Films' SCREAM -- in this case, hot screenwriter Kevin
   Williamson penned both), Sony executives have to be grinning from
   ear to ear over the success of their horror entry.
   I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER is fairly generic in scope -- it has
   the standard setup of a group of teens stalked by a homicidal madman
   -- and uses familiar scare tactics, but it's sort of fun in an
   offhanded way.  There are too many standard fright devices employed
   in the film (eyes suddenly opening with a startle, the presumed-dead
   lurching back to life, attackers popping out from the darkness -- any
   of this sound familiar?) to take it seriously; it's simple popcorn
   fun.  I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER obviously isn't as
   self-consciously knowing as SCREAM, but it's not aspiring to be as
   similarly clever.
   The film focuses on four teenagers reaching a pivotal moment in their
   young lives -- high school graduation, and the promise of bright
   futures ahead -- but it's really only interested in its female
   characters, best friends Julie James (Jennifer Love Hewitt from PARTY
   OF FIVE) and newly-crowned local beauty pageant queen Helen Shivers
   (Sarah Michelle Gellar, from the television series BUFFY THE VAMPIRE
   SLAYER).  As is often the case in modern slasher films, Julie and
   Helen serve both as the chief protagonists which drive the plot
   forward, and as the requisite lust objects; a profuse number of
   scenes in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER find its heroines either
   in swimsuits or scurrying about in revealing attire, and there's an
   abundance of tittilative cleavage shots (it's actually bemusing to
   observe how director Jim Gillespie strategically frames his shots).
   In fact, given the film's preponderance for ogling its pretty
   starlets, it's somewhat amusing that Bridgette Wilson, who plays
   Helen's older sister Elsa, is cast against type as a brainy,
   no-nonsense department store manager (fully clothed throughout, yet).
   After a cozy July 4th evening on the beach, complete with wistful
   introspection and boozing, Julie and Helen, and their respective
   beaus Ray Bronson (Freddie Prinze Jr.) and Barry Cox (Ryan
   Phillippe), pile into Barry's car and head home.  While driving back,
   Ray is distracted by Barry's drunken antics and plows into something
   in the road.  They all begin to panic when they realise that they've
   just run over someone, and after much frantic bickering, Barry
   convinces the group to dispose of the incriminating evidence by
   dumping the body into water.
   Jump forward to a year later.  The formerly tight-knit group has
   splintered apart after the incident, friendship giving way to guilt,
   bitterness, and resentment, and their once-promising futures have
   since dissipated: Helen's acting aspirations in New York flopped,
   and the beauty queen is reduced to manning the cosmetic counter at
   her family's department store; Ray toils as a fisherman. seemingly
   resigned to his lot in life; Barry staggers about on his family's
   estate in a haze; former scholar Julie crashed and burned in her
   freshman year at her prestigious Ivy League college.  Suitably gaunt
   and haunted, Julie returns back home to the North Carolina fishing
   community where a mysterious note awaits, predictably reading "I
   know what you did last summer!" (as opposed, I guess, to "You may
   have already won ten million dollars!")  In the wake of this ominous
   message, Julie reunites the reluctant clique in order to determine
   who's behind it.  And the killing begins...
   The costumed killer in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER is decked out
   in full fisherman's garb, complete with slicker and hat, and wields
   a razor-sharp hook as his preferred instrument of death.  The film
   makes a point of obscuring the madman's face and coyly drops clues
   throughout in order to play up the mystery of his alter-ego, but
   ultimately I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER doesn't really play fair
   in terms of revealing the identity of the killer.  When The
   Fisherman is finally unmasked, one can sense a collective sentiment
   of Who Cares? erupting from the audience.
   For awhile, it appears as if I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER is
   going to veer towards a more psychological approach to the plot --
   the depiction of the characters' lives irrevocably shattered by their
   murderous deed is effective, and they all seem to walk around as
   empty shells of their former selves.  Julie, who was the most adamant
   against dumping the body after the hit-and-run, appears the most
   tormented and harrowed of the group after the fact, and after
   one-third of the film, I almost expected a resolution involving a
   schizophrenic Julie to be behind it all, although shots of a
   weathered male hand grasping the Fisherman's hook sort of ruined that
   misguided notion.
   I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER, then, is fairly conventional in
   terms of the handling its slasher elements, and Mr. Gillespie's
   feature debut is a competent if uneventful piece of work.  Although
   it can be difficult to generate real tension from such familiar
   scenarios -- I've honestly always wondered how a maniac, walking as
   if on a leisurely stroll, can *still* always seem to gain on the
   frantic, fleeing heroine --  his traditional handling of various
   sequences in the film doesn't help matters.  After a character
   endures a harrowing ordeal, when the film cross-cuts between the
   character finally within the reach of safety and the look of relief
   on the character's face, it's a telltale sign that something
   unfortunate might befall the character, and any opportunity for a
   shock or a surprise is consequently destroyed.
   The sequence which is the most effective in the film is the critical
   hit-and-run scene; the mounting tension and escalating sense of
   panic as the situation begins spiraling out of control is palpable,
   and as played by the lead actors, wholly credible and convincing.  I
   particularly enjoyed the touch of having the Barry character exclaim
   "My car!" in the aftermath of the collision, which is both darkly
   humourous and frankly authentic.
   In general, the performances from the ensemble cast of I KNOW WHAT
   YOU DID LAST SUMMER aren't outstanding, but generally appealing and
   perky.  While the leads are fine, the striking performance in the
   film is that of Anne Heche, who in a small role is disquietly creepy
   as Melissa Egan, the sister of the dead man fished from the water.
   After some nondescript performances earlier this year, it's a relief
   to see her return to form -- I was beginning to worry.
   As in SCREAM, Mr. Williamson includes some knowing references in his
   screenplay for I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER (which he incidentally
   wrote during the SCREAM shoot) which are amusing.  There's a cute
   reference to Jodie Foster's Clarice in THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS by
   the heroines as they nervously approach Melissa Egan's out-of-the-way
   house.  While he's an interesting writer and a particularly good
   scenarist, I still find much of Mr. Williamson's attempts at snappy
   teen dialogue to be particularly awkward.  Who wasn't wincing during
   SCREAM when Neve Campbell and Skeet Ulrich were exchanging clumsy
   dialogue about their is-it-an-R-or-is-it-a-PG-13 relationship?
   Along the same lines, in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER, "You feel
   my pain" just doesn't cut it.
   I don't think it spoils much to reveal that after the film has
   culminated, there's a final coda in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
   which is all too generic -- a standard last "Boo!" to leave the
   audience nervously tittering as they exit the theatres (much along
   the same vein as Julie Delpy's remarkably hairy chest in the
   oft-run trailer for the upcoming AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN PARIS).
   This coda teases at a sequel, which is par for the genre, but in this
   case, due to the film's surprisingly potent success, a sequel is
   indeed in the works.  As Mr. Williamson himself wrote, "Let's face it
   -- these days, you gotta have a sequel."
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I was reminded for some reason of something Fred Kareman, my acting
 teacher, had once said: 'Most people in this business should be selling
 zippers on 7th Avenue.'" - Tom DiCillo

Title
Review for Floating Life (1996)
FLOATING LIFE (Southern Star - 1997)
Starring Annette Shun Wah, Annie Yip, Anthony Wong, Edwin Pang,
  Cecilia Fong Sing Lee, Toby Chan, Toby Wong
Screenplay by Eddie Ling-Ching Fong, Clara Law
Produced by Bridget Ikin
Directed by Clara Law
Running time: 95 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
FLOATING LIFE, Australia's first-ever submission to the Academy of
Motion Picture Arts & Sciences for consideration in the Best Foreign
Language Film category (its dialogue is in Cantonese, English, and
German), marks a special accomplishment by Clara Law.  A compelling,
at times poignant film, it manages to maintain its truthfulness while
teetering between comedy and melodrama.
FLOATING LIFE centers around a Hong Kong family's sense of dislocation
and loss of identity after moving to Australia in order to avoid the
Communist takeover of Hong Kong, and is divided into clearly defined
vignettes, each chapter labelled with title cards pertaining to
houses, which serves to emphasize the film's theme of family.
The film opens with Mr. and Mrs. Chan (Edwin Pang, Cecilia Fong Sing
Lee) and their two teen sons (Toby Wong, Toby Chan) leaving the
bustling, claustrophobic metropolis of Hong Kong to join their second
daughter Bing (Annie Yip) in Australia.  With their spacious,
immaculately-white new house and the vast abundance of neighbourhood
greenery, the Chans initially find this serene new land a strange and
wonderous one, and - with neurotic Bing cooly remarking about the
possible dangers of Australian life (killer dogs, poisonous spiders,
dangerous ultraviolet rays) - a frightening one.  This sets up a
wonderfully amusing scene early in the film where the four immigrants,
aimlessly ambling about their new suburban neighbourhood, are sent
scrambling by the yelps of a little white puppy.
The tone set up early in the film is broadly comic, and one expects
FLOATING LIFE to depict the clash of cultures as the Chans struggle to
acclimatize themselves to the new ways of Australian life as they
integrate themselves into Australian society (a scene where the two
teen sons meet up with a sunbathing neighbourhood girl is left
dangling), but the film suddenly veers towards an introspective and
melodramatic tone.  FLOATING LIFE shifts its focus away from the
exploits of the new immigrants and towards Bing's domineering of her
newly-reunited family, setting out a set of stringent and oppressive
rules which create tremendous tension within the household and
threaten to fracture the family.
Meanwhile, elder daughter Yen (Annette Shun Wah), happily settled in
Germany with her husband and young daughter, begins to suffer an
identity crisis, manifesting itself with her claims to her patiently
exasperated husband that their new home is cursed with bad feng shui,
and further exacerbated upon hearing of the familial conflict Down
Under.  Among the dramatic threads of FLOATING LIFE, this is perhaps
the most effective and engaging, with an interesting set of characters
and a storyline which generates a genuine emotional punch.
The one misguided vignette in FLOATING LIFE involves eldest son Gar
Ming (Anthony Wong), left behind in Hong Kong to resolve various
affairs on behalf of his family and to await his immigration papers
before rejoining his parents and brothers in Australia.  Emotionally
detatched and aimlessly drifting, his is an uncompelling character,
and consequently subsequent attempts to draw out pathos are
uninvolving and ineffective.  His desperate search for emotional
fulfillment is depicted by philosopical droning on the exquisite peak
of an orgasm, which quickly becomes tedious.
Ms. Law's film cheerfully embraces melodrama - each of the major
vignettes feature excessively emotional climaxes which I couldn't
help but find reminiscent to Wayne Wang's acutely unsubtle THE JOY
LUCK CLUB - but despite the director's rather clear attempts to tug
at the heartstrings, I couldn't help but be touched by a powerful and
affecting soliloquy delivered masterfully by Cecilia Fong Sing Lee
which truly packs an emotional wallop and, in dramatic terms, is
certainly the highlight of FLOATING LIFE.
FLOATING LIFE at times spreads itself too thin; given the myriad of
characters involved, it could either stand to delve into each
vignette a little deeper, or narrow its focus to a select group of
key characters.  However, it is a fine film, with a thoughtful and
insightful screenplay by Clara Law and husband Eddie Ling-Ching Fong,
and some superb acting by a cast consisting almost exclusively of
non-actors (special note is to be made of Cecilia Fong Sing Lee,
Annette Shun Wah, and a short but dazzling performance by an actress
who portrayed Gar Ming's girlfriend from Vancouver).  FLOATING LIFE is
ultimately about the ties that bond a family together, which are able
to withstand great distances and new environments.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"At one point when berated and bloodied by her male military superior,
 Moore screams out a guttural invitation to him to enjoy partaking in the
 absorption of a certain anatomical member." - Dan Cox, VARIETY, on G.I. JANE

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
BULWORTH (Fox - 1998)
Starring Warren Beatty, Halle Berry, Don Cheadle, Oliver Platt,
  Paul Sorvino, Jack Warden
Screenplay by Warren Beatty, Jeremy Pikser
Produced by Warren Beatty, Pieter Jan Brugge
Directed by Warren Beatty
Running time: 107 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
     "Yo." - U.S. Senator Jay Billington Bulworth
   That, in a word, sums up the appeal of Warren Beatty's project
   BULWORTH, essentially a one-gag premise stretched kicking and
   screaming to feature-length.  While the film's scathing concept is
   inspired and often wickedly funny, it's swamped by familiar
   extraneous material which subverts the comedy, and a sociopolitical
   message too jarringly self-conscious to mesh with the film's other
   elements.
   It's the eve of the 1996 California primaries, and we're at the
   "doorstep to a new millennium".  Incumbent Democratic Senator
   Bulworth (Mr. Beatty) is despondent -- his life is in a shambles, he
   hasn't eaten or slept in three days, and he's sick of spewing out the
   same meaningless deliberately-worded rhetoric -- so sick, in fact,
   that he's ready to end it all.  After ordering a hit on himself, he's
   obligingly trotted around Los Angeles by his handlers, led by
   media-savvy campaign manager Dennis Murphy (Oliver Platt), for a
   final round of campaigning.  Liberated by his impending mortality,
   Bulworth's free to throw caution to the wind, and he uncorks a
   barrage of decidedly politically-incorrect platitudes at his various
   stops, stunning and outraging his audiences and launching Murphy into
   a state of panicked spin control.  Ultimately transforming himself
   into a rapping homeboy of a senatorial candidate, complete with
   hip-hop duds, Bulworth also undergoes a political reawakening, and
   his rhyming, disarmingly blunt liberal tirades begin to strike a
   chord with the weary, seen-it-all populace.  Bulworth is reborn --
   but will he survive long enough to enjoy it?
   BULWORTH is at its best when it's at its most irreverent, with the
   newly-metamorphosized title character cheekily blurting observations,
   or strutting through the darkened streets of South Central backed by
   Cypress Hill on the soundtrack.  There's discernable glee when the
   senator is given an impromptu crash course on hip-hop culture during
   an all-night party, and it's often great fun to take in a wildly
   animated Bulworth incongruously bursting out into rap, but the gag
   begins to lose its bite after constant repetition -- how many times
   can we cut to the faces of scandalized spectators before the humour
   dissipates?  It's only through Mr. Beatty's engaging performance that
   this aspect of the film doesn't wear out its welcome.
   We've got the makings of a fine political farce here, but the film's
   raison d'etre is its underlying impassioned rant against the status
   quo political system, and here's where BULWORTH loses its footing.
   Mr. Beatty's a famously avowed liberal, and his convictions are
   clearly heartfelt, but his film skewers each of its meaty targets --
   from the impact of media manipulation to the role of politician as
   industry puppet to the touchy race issue in America -- in a manner
   that's not only lacking in eruditeness, but also rather simplistic
   and obvious.  The film allows its characters so much screentime to
   wax eloquently on the state of inner city life that it becomes
   painfully sermonic.  Corrupt officials, spin doctors, poll-watching,
   harassment of black youth by white cops: it's all been addressed in
   more sophisticated and thought-provoking fashion elsewhere.
   If the film spins its wheels with its sociopolitical commentary, it's
   with the hitman subplot where it swerves and crashes.  Distracting at
   best and aggravating at worst, this thread begins as a series of
   merely intrusive scenes involving the senator, associate Eddie Davers
   (Jack Warden), and faithful hit go-between Vinnie (Richard Sarafian),
   and quickly degenerates into mindless, annoying chase sequences, with
   Bulworth diving into shrubbery or burning rubber alongside mysterious
   new admirer Nina (Halle Berry) to evade a menacingly omnipresent
   suspected assassin.  Best left on the cutting room floor, this aspect
   of the film is a drain, failing to add any comic or dramatic
   interest, and comes off as a weak excuse to include some action in an
   already-kinetic movie.
   When I first saw the teasers for BULWORTH several months ago, my
   first though was that of cynical amazement that a film which
   superficially resembled AS GOOD AS IT GETS -- loud-talking
   protagonist cheerfully spewing racial jibes for comic effect -- could
   make it to market so quickly.  In fact, this is a film whose
   gestation period has been a long one; Mr. Beatty, who wears multiple
   hats on the project (star, director, producer, co-writer), took great
   deliberations in his pitch to Fox (only the barest plot outline was
   given, with all of the political and racial angles excised), and
   leveraged monies owed from DICK TRACY in order to assume total
   control.  This is clearly a personal project for Mr. Beatty, and he
   throws himself into the film with utter abandon -- rarely does an
   actor seem to be as filled with enthusiasm as he does here.
   Consistently amusing throughout, there's an extra bounce in his step,
   a delightful grin on his face that's infectious.  Mr. Beatty's a
   wonderfully awful rapper, and it's disarmingly funny to watch a
   sexagenarian employing street hand gestures and gleefully rhyming his
   way through a televised debate.  Taking a sizable risk, he pulls it
   off with flying colours -- Mr. Beatty's performance is by far the
   strongest aspect of BULWORTH.
   The remainder of the cast is more hit-and-miss.  Ms. Berry, a
   luminous onscreen presence, is nonetheless rather uninspiring as
   Bulworth's new devotee, playing Nina with such fierce remoteness that
   not only is she sufficiently ambiguous, she's also uncompelling; by
   the time the gloves are off in the third act, one can scarcely raise
   an eyebrow.  Meanwhile, Mr. Platt's a wonderful character actor and
   does what he can with his frazzled Murphy character, but he's given
   only a few notes from which to riff as the aggravated aide.
   Mr. Beatty has spent much of his life deeply involved in American
   politics, working alongside the likes of Robert Kennedy, George
   McGovern and Gary Hart, and with BULWORTH comes his opportunity to
   express some of his reflections and concerns on the direction the
   system is heading.  The elements are present for a spectacularly good
   political lampoon, but ultimately the film is most memorable not for
   the message it conveys, but the sight of the iconic actor swaggering
   around, microphone in hand, chanting lines like "Billions to Mexico
   and never have to fear / Coz taxpayers, taxpayers take it in the rear
   / Yeah yeah yeah".
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Title
Review for Parent Trap, The (1998)
THE PARENT TRAP (Walt Disney Pictures - 1998)
Starring Lindsay Lohan, Dennis Quaid, Natasha Richardson,
  Elaine Hendrix
Screenplay by David Swift and Nancy Meyers & Charles Shyer, based on
  the novel DAS DOPPELTE LOTTCHEN by Erich Kastner
Produced by Charles Shyer
Directed by Nancy Meyers
Running time: 127 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The remaking of classic films, always a risky artistic proposition,
   is under scrutiny more than ever these days by the cynical and savvy
   masses -- consider the current sentiment of disapproval at Gus Van
   Sant's ongoing recreation of Alfred Hitchcock's PSYCHO, prompting
   cineastes to collectively shake their heads and wail in dismay.
   "Don't remake masterpieces!" thundered Roger Ebert on a recent
   episode of his weekly television program.  "If it works, don't fix
   it!"
   While film buffs passionately rail against remakes, it's easy to
   understand why studios continue to churn them out at prodigious
   rates.  There's a certain name recognition carried over from the
   earlier versions which reduces the effort involved to sell the new
   flicks to the public -- no longer is there a need to enticingly
   sketch the movie's elements ("There's a guy, see, and he *really*
   loves his mother...") when everybody's familiar with the original --
   and a nostalgic fondness that's culled from audiences' memories of
   the tried-and-true predecessors.  Even skeptical cynics are counted
   upon to grudgingly drag themselves to the theatre to partake remakes
   of old favourites, if only to witness how the new version bastardizes
   their beloved original.  Remakes aren't always risk-free commercial
   endeavours -- witness, for example, at the crash-and-burn of Jeremiah
   Chechik's edition of DIABOLIQUE (that he's behind the helm for the
   upcoming cinematic adaptation of THE AVENGERS is suddenly not
   particularly reassuring) or the decidedly mediocre performance of
   Andrew Davis' recent A PERFECT MURDER -- but there's a bit of a
   safety buffer.
   No studio in recent years has been cannibalizing its past hits as
   much as Disney.  Admittedly, none of the revisited originals would
   classify as masterpieces -- I feel safe assuming THAT DARN CAT!
   didn't *just* miss the cut on the AFI list -- but Team Mouse is
   meddling in a particularly tempestuous kettle: beloved family
   classics.  I suspect that the public would scarcely bat an eye should
   a half-assed version of CITIZEN KANE churn out the pipe, but a
   filmmaker who desecrates iconic crowdpleasers like THE WIZARD OF OZ
   had better assume a new identity and move to the tropics.  So far,
   Disney's faring remarkably well -- among others, FLUBBER, DR.
   DOLITTLE, and THE NUTTY PROFESSOR have been unqualified box-office
   hits -- but with the release of the Nancy Meyer-helmed version of THE
   PARENT TRAP they're treading on especially shaky ground.  (The 1961
   original, a cross-generational hit starring Hayley Mills, was so
   revered by the younger set in its day that this edition's top-billed
   actor, Dennis Quaid, freely admits that his involvement in the
   project was due to his child.)
   Avowed curmudgeons would do best to avoid the newest version of THE
   PARENT TRAP, a film so sunny and cheerful that extended exposure will
   cause surly audience members to undergo allergic convulsions.  A rare
   picture whose photobook conclusion feels truly earned rather than
   obligatorily appended, its slick, high-spirited nature and eager,
   almost desperate willingness to please is winning, and the film
   benefits from its great casting (Mr. Quaid, charming; Natasha
   Richardson, luminous; Lindsay Lohan, darling), but in terms of
   fundamental filmmaking and storytelling it's sometimes irritatingly
   uninspired.
   Obviously, there's a requisite of faithfulness to the original film,
   and one hardly expects inventive or groundbreaking filmmaking in a
   carefully-crafted family picture, but novice director Ms. Meyer has
   the frustrating tendency to repetitively go for the most obvious gag
   possible, making the entire two hour-plus experience vaguely tedious.
   If there's a blatant establishing shot of a needlessly perfunctory
   swimming pool, you can bet that somebody's going to fall in.
   Likewise, even sly visual send-ups aimed at older audiences are
   similarly telegraphed; Beatles fans should spot the film's quick
   homage coming a mile away.  Most of the humour is similarly impaired:
   breezily pleasant but not particularly witty.  (I did like one line
   regarding the villainess' spelling aptitude.)  It's all competently
   helmed, but not particularly engaging.
   I found the film's first half hour to be especially worrisome.  It
   starts off well enough, with both separated twins Hallie Parker (Ms.
   Lohan) and Annie James (ditto) arriving at summer camp to inevitably
   reunite, but when Annie and her mother's trusty butler Martin (Simon
   Kunz) spontaneously burst out into a choreographed hand-slapping,
   hip-swiveling dance, it all seemed a bit Too Precious.  Later scenes
   including Hallie arriving for a late-night poker session, decked in
   black leather and sunglasses and backed by a rock guitar soundtrack,
   and an insanely elaborate camp prank staged like a Wile E. Coyote
   scheme weren't very reassuring.  Fortunately, the picture does pick
   up when the two girls finally realize their blood ties and set out on
   their grand master plan to reunite their long-divorced parents.  (And
   I enjoyed the scene where naughty Hallie and Annie are banished to
   the camp's clearly-labelled Isolation Cabin, which is probably bigger
   and better furnished than my house.)
   The bulk of the film rests upon the capable shoulders of Ms. Lohan,
   who seamlessly plays both twins (often opposite "herself") and imbues
   Annie with a reasonably credible British accent.  The lively young
   freckled redhead is great fun to watch and makes for a wonderfully
   charming set of protagonists, full of spunk and sly spirit, although
   ultimately her dual roles act simply as a device to set up the
   rekindling romance between Nick Parker (Mr. Quaid, who's given a
   great introductory shot and whose wide grin is disarmingly likeable)
   and Elizabeth James (Ms. Richardson).  He owns a vineyard; she's a
   bridal gown designer; they're obviously made for each other, and it's
   just a matter of time before all the pieces fall into place.  As a
   dramatic obstacle, a vampy fiancee named Meredith Blake (gamely
   played by Elaine Hendrix) is introduced, and the film provides comic
   relief in the form of the kooky help -- the aforementioned Martin as
   well as Nick's straight-shooting nanny Chessy (Lisa Ann Walter) --
   but it all boils down to the romantic core of the picture, whose
   spectre dominates the final third of the film and is played out with
   warmth and simplicity.
   Overlooking some of the story's implications -- what sort of parents
   would shield their daughters from the knowledge that they have a twin
   sister? -- it's interesting to examine the basic appeal of this
   story.  I think it's derived not from wacky hijinx, but from the
   empowering notion that the twins are able to right a wrong and
   against all odds succeed in reuniting their parents; in this case,
   Daughters Know Best.  This film has a bit more of the former than I'd
   prefer, but thanks to fine performances by the cast, the latter
   aspect shines through with good-natured amiability.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
SCREAM 2 (Dimension - 1997)
Starring David Arquette, Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox,
  Sarah Michelle Gellar, Jamie Kennedy, Laurie Metcalf, Elise Neal,
  Jerry O'Connell, Timothy Olyphant, Jada Pinkett, Liev Schreiber
Screenplay by Kevin Williamson
Produced by Cathy Konrad, Marianne Maddalena
Directed by Wes Craven
Running time: 120 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   On December 20, 1996, amidst all the year-end Oscar bait releases
   from the major studios, Miramax's genre label Dimension Films quietly
   released a sly little ensemble slasher flick titled SCREAM.  Although
   the teen horror market had been given up for all-but-dead in recent
   years, the film shocked industry observers by scoring consistently
   high box office returns, eventually topping $100 million domestic and
   becoming one of the most successful films of its type in history,
   while delighting audiences by finally presenting a set of knowing
   slasher flick protagonists who were aware of the all the standard
   cliches associated with the genre.  The sleeper success of SCREAM
   sent shockwaves through the industry -- suddenly, everybody was
   looking for hip, inexpensive fright films that might be able to reap
   similar fortunes.  The strategy of casting young TV stars to draw the
   youth demographic was given a boost.  SCREAM director Wes Craven,
   previously best known as the creator of New Line's A NIGHTMARE ON
   ELM STREET film series, was thrust back into the limelight.  And
   SCREAM's rookie scribe, Kevin Williamson, burst onto the film scene
   in stunning fashion.
   It's hard to understate this last point.  Mr. Williamson has, based
   upon his produced screenplays as of this writing (SCREAM, I KNOW WHAT
   YOU DID LAST SUMMER from October 1997, and now SCREAM 2), enjoyed a
   meteoric rise to fame, quickly become the most well-known
   screenwriter amongst the Entertainment Weekly-reading, box office
   figure-watching youth culture since -- well, since that Quentin
   Tarantino guy (whom, it is said, has also achieved some renown as a
   director).  Indeed, in a singularly freakish oddity, it is the
   screenwriter, Mr. Williamson, and not the director that has been
   receiving the lion's share of acclaim for the success of SCREAM, and
   the print advertisements for SCREAM 2's theatrical release are
   similarly indicative of his increasing prominence: while the
   traditional "A FILM BY WES CRAVEN" drapes the film's title in the
   ads, right below it (in equal sized font, yet) reads "WRITTEN BY
   KEVIN WILLIAMSON", an affirmation of the screenwriter's contribution
   to the project which may be unprecedented.  (I can envision the board
   of WGA, licking their chops at this coup and counting the days until
   their goal of "A FILM BY " is attained.)
   And, much like Mr. Tarantino's screenwriting, Mr. Williamson's work
   is vaguely unconventional, incorporating both contemporary pop
   culture references and allusions to other films into the dialogue of
   his characters.  In SCREAM, they satirically discussed other horror
   films; here in the sequel, the characters discuss the relative merits
   of film sequels.
   SCREAM was written in 1995 during the infamous Bob Dole rampage
   against Hollywood, and Mr. Williamson's rejection of this tirade
   clearly influenced the writing in both that film and this sequel.
   While the sequel was planned from the outset -- a treatment of SCREAM
   2 was included when Mr. Williamson sold the screenplay for SCREAM --
   the basic premise for the film and the reunion of the surviving
   characters nevertheless seems extremely artificially contrived, and
   it's only at about the film's midway point when it becomes engaging.
   Like its predecessor, SCREAM 2 opens with a splashy, eye-grabbing
   prologue which only vaguely ties into the film's principal narrative;
   this time around, we're following the exploits of a young couple
   (Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps) attending a riotously gleeful sneak
   preview screening of STAB (a running film-within-a-film gag where the
   "true life" events behind the first film has been turned into a
   movie).  However, although it tries hard and has some good ideas --
   the nightmarishly enthusiastic audience in the film vaguely reminded
   me of the one I was sharing the theatre with, and I was certainly
   thinking about gutting the overly-noisy person a few seats away
   myself after about fifteen minutes -- the prologue is a pale
   imitation of the bravura opening sequence in the original with Drew
   Barrymore (where her performance not only convinced me that she
   *could* act, but was so good that it would rank among the best
   performances in a horror film that I've ever seen).  There are too
   many knowing, hip pop-culture references crammed into the SCREAM 2
   sequence, and the setup isn't nearly as cleverly frightening as
   SCREAM's; while the first film's preface dizzyingly built up to a
   final shot that was exhilaratingly terrifying, the payoff here is
   almost campily theatrical.
   Flash to the campus of a smalltown Ohio college, where returning
   characters Sidney (Neve Campbell) and Randy (Jamie Kennedy) have
   relocated for their studies and to escape the notoriety from the
   events in the first film.  The murders which open this film result in
   reuniting the survivors -- single-minded tabloid TV reporter Gale
   Weathers (Courteney Cox) roars into town to cover the breaking story,
   while ever-awkward former deputy Dewey Riley (David Arquette) flies
   in to protectively guard over Sidney.  They're joined by Cotton Weary
   (Liev Schreiber), who was falsely accused of homicide in a cameo
   appearance during the first film; his role here is significantly
   expanded.  The film incidentally provides surprisingly little
   backstory, although I suppose a good case can be made that it really
   isn't necessary -- not because so many people have seen the first
   installment, but because this is, after all, a sequel to a slasher
   film: what do you *think* happened to these characters in the prior
   movie?
   There's a lot of new faces on the scene too: Sidney's new boyfriend,
   Derek (Jerry O'Connell) and her new roommate Hallie (Elise Neal),
   Randy's fellow film student Mickey (Timothy Olyphant), Gale's
   newly-assigned nervous cameraman Joel (Duane Martin), omnipresent
   local journalist Debbie Salt (Laurie Metcalf), co-ed Cici Cooper (Ms.
   Buffy herself, Sarah Michelle Gellar), and a pair of simpering
   sorority sisters (Rebecca Gayheart and SIRENS' Portia Di Rossi).  Any
   of these characters could be the killer -- or for that matter, could
   be the next victim.
   As is seemingly becoming a regular staple of a Kevin Williamson
   screenplay, the narrative is once again framed around the
   increasingly-flimsy premise of a whodunit.  One problem that SCREAM
   didn't have was keeping you interested in the identity of the killer.
   Here (and to some extent in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER), Mr.
   Williamson's screenplay seems slightly hampered by trying to turn the
   identity of the killer into a mystery.  The film occasionally becomes
   so bogged down with misdirection that you can sense it straining at
   the seams to try and drop red herrings left and right at the expense
   of its thriller elements.  (It doesn't help matters any that the
   killer's alter-ego is fairly obvious from the get-go.)
   Indeed, the finale plays as full-out camp when the villain is finally
   unmasked, frothing at the mouth with glazed eyes.  This is one of
   those cases where the villain goes on such an endless diatribe about
   their machinations, scheming, and motivation, that you actually get
   bored listening and just want them all to get on with it.
   While the basic setup and premise for the film is fairly contrived,
   the aspect where it's head-and-shoulders above its predecessor is in
   its suspense sequences.  They're staged much more imaginatively here
   (save for the first post-prologue murder, which is handled in such a
   mediocre, conventional fashion that it seems to be culled directly
   from the predictable 1980s slasher flicks that the first film
   satirized), and are much more fun to watch.  It's hard to hold back a
   smile during a giddy scene where Sidney and her companion have to
   climb over the incapacitated killer in order to escape from a car
   wreck, and a cat-and-mouse chase involving Gale and Dewey in a campus
   sound lab is very nicely staged, although its ultimate resolution is
   hilariously overblown.
   In terms of its characters, the strong part of the film is the
   interesting relationship between Gale and Dewey (who ambles onto the
   screen accompanied by his very own theme music).  Their verbal
   sparring at the outset provides much humour -- an exchange where
   Dewey defensively rebukes charges of a perceived aura of incompetency
   is well-written -- and there's a curiously endearing aspect about
   their relationship amidst all the mayhem and bloodshed.
   On the other hand, Sidney is pretty dull here.  She doesn't have any
   compelling presence, and there's nothing particularly interesting
   about her this time around to make us care about her other than that
   she's the returning heroine.  Given this, and the fact that there's
   no strong second banana character for Sidney (Elise Neal's role isn't
   nearly substantive enough to adequately fill Rose McGowan's shoes),
   it's no wonder why the roles for Gale and Dewey have been
   significantly augmented for this installment of the film.
   What surprises me the most about SCREAM 2 is its zealousness in
   decimating its cast.  The film's mounting body count bears out the
   fact that *no* character is safe (well, *almost*); while in principal
   I applaud this bold policy, at some point you've got to be wondering
   about just how many characters will make it to the next sequel.  (I
   was particularly surprised with the untimely demise of one in
   particular, whose casting for the next installment of the series
   would've seemed obvious.)  But hey, as Rose McGowan's character said
   in the first film: "No, please don't kill me, Mr. Ghostface -- I want
   to be in the sequel!"  Look what that got her.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"There was a six-year-old girl sitting near me, and she piped up 'That's
 Harvey Keitel' within seconds of the film's start.  I want to know what
 that kid's been seeing." - Charles Odell

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   It's not too difficult to like Michael Moore, creator of the highly
   successful documentary ROGER & ME who returns with his
   similarly-themed follow-up, THE BIG ONE.  His intrinsic appeal to his
   many fans is fairly obvious -- he's the proverbial fly in the
   ointment to corporate America, the underdog crusader challenging and
   confronting big business on behalf of the downtrodden working class.
   It's easy to garnish the audience's support in an Us vs. Them
   polemic, particularly when Mr. Moore labels the Them as the powerful,
   faceless downsizing corporations across America, while the Us is
   depicted as the sad, desperate faces of the newly-unemployed; when
   forced to choose to empathise with either the wealthy industry bigwig
   or the struggling factory worker with bills to pay and hungry mouths
   to feed, it's far too easy to recognize ourselves in the latter.
   Mr. Moore himself does a good job as coming across as an Everyman,
   with his portly, cheerful, insidiously mischievous demeanor, his
   infectious grin, his omnipresent baseball cap, and his propensity not
   to take himself too seriously.  One can immediately tell, however,
   that he takes the topic of downsizing very seriously, and in THE BIG
   ONE, while sent on a whirlwind cross-country tour in 1996 to promote
   his book "Downsize This!  Random Threats From An Unarmed American",
   Mr. Moore and a makeshift skeletal film crew took the opportunity to
   film this irreverent guerrilla documentary on the effects of
   corporate downsizing.  His approach?  In addition to including
   testimonials on the unfairness of the situation from newly-downsized
   workers (corporations are already reaping huge profits, yet are
   nonetheless relocating their plants abroad, where cheaper labour
   abounds), Mr. Moore seemingly-innocously ambled unannounced into
   front foyers of many downsizing corporate headquarters across the
   country and created scenes by demanding justification for the
   layoffs, preferably from a CEO.
   His confrontational approach, though, is decidedly more caustic than
   vitriolic: Mr. Moore typically comes bearing gifts, albeit dubious
   ones -- "Downsizer Of The Year" award certificates, oversized cheques
   for eighty cents ("the first hour's wages for a Mexican worker").
   Bane of corporate America -- one company even issued an internal
   memorandum instructing its staff how to address the situation should
   he pay them an uninvited visit -- Mr. Moore's essentially the working
   man's shit-disturber, ambushing greedy big businesses and holding
   them up for ridicule, all the while remaining eminently polite and
   good-natured; forced out of one office building, he calls out through
   the glass window to the staff member manning the front desk, "You
   tricked me!" in a tone of bemused indignity.
   Although these showdowns are occasionally amusing, they tend do lose
   their bite after repetition as Mr. Moore pulls the same stunt in
   city after city.  Curiously, as the film progressed I found my own
   sympathies lying more and more towards the corporate security guards
   being awkwardly put in the position of attempting to quell his
   instigations; what did these working men ever do to deserve this?
   And Mr. Moore even shows an mean-spirited side in a prank on one of
   the media escorts assigned by his publisher to accompany and assist
   him at his book signings; while she's being forcibly ejected from the
   premises by a security guard misinformed that she's a stalker, the
   person next to me in the theatre choked out "That's so mean!" in
   between her chortles of laughter.  I agreed, although I wasn't
   laughing.  After the joke is finally revealed, we get a close-up of
   the humiliated media escort who's been simply doing her job (she was
   actually fetching Mr. Moore a soda at his bequest when she was
   promptly expelled), grinning and bearing it; behind her gritted
   teeth, you know that deep down she's ready to belt the guy.
   Where THE BIG ONE is at its best is when Mr. Moore interacts with
   other people and unearths surprising and often superficially-shocking
   bits of inanity: he gets a manager of a Payday candy bar plant being
   relocated from Centralia, Illinois to Mexico to state on-camera that
   the move would've been delayed had the employees been *less*
   productive; he finds a convicted murderer who reveals that TWA is
   using low-paid California prison inmates to provide information to
   callers on the airline's 1-800 number.  The mind boggles.
   The film culminates in Seattle, where Mr. Moore is *invited* for a
   one-on-one session with Nike Inc. CEO Phil Knight.  When asked why
   Nike's factories are based in Asia rather than in the U.S., Mr.
   Knight responds "Americans don't really want to make shoes," and
   perhaps he has a point; no amount of low-angle camera shots that Mr.
   Moore employs successfully hides the fact that the group of Flint,
   Michigan hopefuls rallied to convince Nike in setting up a hometown
   shoe factory falls well short of the 500 promised.  In retrospect,
   his pleas for an American-based factory, all the while admitting that
   its margin of profitability would be less than that of a
   foreign-based plant, is disturbing in how much it resembles as a plea
   for charity.  The meeting grows quickly inane after Mr. Knight
   sensibly points out that any unemployed worker sufficiently desperate
   will attest to a desire to work in any sort of profession, upon which
   Mr. Moore challenges the corporate bigwig with a footrace, and then
   an armwrestle for a Flint Nike plant.
   THE BIG ONE is an unabashed pro-labour, pro-union advocacy piece, and
   Mr. Moore's tirades against big industry make for engaging
   soundbites.  Even if one doesn't agree with Mr. Moore's ideologies,
   the film is still entertaining, humorous, and quick-paced.  THE BIG
   ONE weaves in and out of wickedly funny excerpts from Mr. Moore's
   sociopolitical speaking tours monologues (a key target: the
   unblinking Steve Forbes), and savvy editing is employed to elicit
   maximum effect from the many contradictions and absurdities stumbled
   across.  It's an argumentative and provocative film which plays as
   a romp as much as it does a lecture.
   There's a little irony buried within the film which I couldn't help
   but enjoy.  So when anti-big business, pro-union Michael Moore is on
   the road and gets the munchies, where does he get his crew to pull
   over? Why, at McDonald's, of course; gotta have that Filet-O-Fish.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Sometimes, I have an overwhelming temptation to grab someone by the throat,
 head-butt them, leave them bleeding in the corner, saying 'That is my
 critical response to you.'" - NSFC award-winning director Mike Figgis

Title
Review for Nine Months (1995)
Starring Hugh Grant [Samuel Faulkner], Julianne Moore [Rebecca Taylor],
     Tom Arnold [Marty Dwyer], Joan Cusack [Gail Dwyer],
     Jeff Goldblum [Sean], Robin Williams [Dr. Kosevich]
Screenplay by Chris Columbus, based on the film NEUF MOIS by
     Patrick Braoude
Produced by Mark Radcliffe, Michael Barnathan, Chris Columbus,
     Anne Francois
Directed by Chris Columbus
Music by Hans Zimmer
Rated PG [Parental Guidence suggested] in Ontario for profanity,
   comedic violence and mature themes
     From the first ten minutes of the film NINE MONTHS, it becomes
fairly obvious what is the theme, and the storyline of the film is a
foregone conclusion.  Now, that's not necessarily a bad thing; surprise
has not usually been an essential element of recent romantic comedies,
and a clever, witty script can salvage even the most formulaic
plotlines.  Unfortunately, such a script was not to be found for this
film.
     The central character of NINE MONTHS is Samuel Faulkner, as played
by Hugh Grant.  At the outset of the film, Samuel is celebrating a
five-year relationship with girlfriend Rebecca Taylor (Julianne Moore)
with a beach picnic.  With the blatant revelation that Samuel seems
oblivious to Rebecca's longful stares at little children frolicking on
the beachside or her inferences to marriage, the audience can sit back
comfortably and foresee the character arc driving the film.
     Of course, Rebecca turns out to be pregnant, a concept which
horrifies Samuel to no end--this is reinforced by the contrived
introduction of the Dwyer couple, Marty and Gail (Tom Arnold and Joan
Cusack), whose three young daughters perpetually terrorize Samuel, and
by the advice of his best friend, Sean (Jeff Goldblum), a struggling
artist who conveniently happens to be Gail's brother.  Samuel's fears
are not alleviated when they end up with a first-time obstetrician (on
humans, anyway), Dr. Kosevich (Robin Williams), a Russian recently
emigrated to San Francisco.
     With such a cliched setup, the plotline and resolution of the film
becomes fairly obvious, and NINE MONTHS desperately requires something
to set it apart from other romantic comedies.  Unfortunately, it lacks
the sharp, tight script which could have made it more than just a
conventional Hollywood romantic comedy.  The dialogue is not
particularly clever, and the comedy is erratic.  There is a fair amount
of physical comedy, some of which borders upon sitcom quality, and the
film tends to weave between an attempt to honestly portray its
characters, and ridiculous caricatures not at all congruous in the
film.
     However, this is not to say that NINE MONTHS does not have its
merits.  The film certainly has the warm fuzzy feeling which permeates
from all of director Chris Columbus' biggest commercial hits (HOME
ALONE, MRS. DOUBTFIRE), and this is sure to appeal to a mass market
audience.  Columbus is effective in manipulating the audience during
the obligatory moving scenes throughout NINE MONTHS, and the pacing of
the movie is very well done.
     NINE MONTHS has a strong cast, none of which are utilized to their
fullest potential.  Hugh Grant, in his first American film lead role,
shows only flashes of the screen presence which made him a star in
1994's FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL, and which have carried him through
such varied roles over the years as in IMPROMPTU, SIRENS, THE LAIR OF
THE WHITE WORM, and THE ENGLISHMAN WHO WENT UP A HILL BUT CAME DOWN A
MOUNTAIN.  He is still able to carry the film, but this is not his best
work.  Julianne Moore is an excellent actress, and her role in NINE
MONTHS is certainly her highest-profile one to date; she's had
supporting roles in such blockbusters as THE FUGITIVE and THE HAND THAT
ROCKS THE CRADLE, but this one may increase her public awareness.
Moore is primarily a dramatic actress (with some of her outstanding
work including performances in SHORT CUTS, VANYA ON 42ND STREET, and
SAFE) and in NINE MONTHS she makes an understated but successful jump
into comedy.  Joan Cusack is a fabulous actress, and is wasted in this
film; she has no more than a handful of significant scenes in NINE
MONTHS.  Tom Arnold surprised many with his work in TRUE LIES as the
sidekick, and his role in this movie is similar in many ways - he
portrays an annoying but likably overbearing character.  However,
Arnold is not nearly as successful in this attempt; he fails to make
the Marty character any more than superficially likable (though the
annoying part of the character is all-too effective).  Jeff Goldblum is
good in a small role, and Robin Williams is charismatic (if over the
top) as the inept but eager Russian doctor.  (And if anyone can go over
the top and still remain effective, it's Robin Williams.)
     NINE MONTHS succeeds at becoming a light Hollywood
romantic-comedy, and fails to become anything beyond or better than
that.  It does generate superficial charm, but fails to exploit the
abilities of its cast.  On my four-star scale, I give NINE MONTHS
two-and-a-half stars.

Title
Review for Love Serenade (1996)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
Make no mistake about it, Shirley Barrett's debut feature film, LOVE
SERENADE, is truly a strange one. A number of critically acclaimed
recent Australian comedies have been lauded for their inventive,
offbeat stories -- MURIEL'S WEDDING, THE ADVENTURES OF PRISCILLA,
QUEEN OF THE DESERT, STRICTLY BALLROOM -- but the zany LOVE SERENADE
stands out even among this eccentric group of films in terms of sheer
outlandishness. LOVE SERENADE starts off as simply relatively quirky
but becomes increasingly bizarre as the film progresses, and its
loopiness will certainly not be for all tastes. Nonetheless, Ms.
Barrett's film is generally highly entertaining, with a lot of
offbeat humour and some big laughs.
The setting for the film is a fictional Australian backwards hamlet
in the middle of nowhere called Sunray, where nothing much ever
happens and which time (and technology) seems to have overlooked --
the local one-man radio station is stocked with tunes from the 1970s,
like Glen Campbell's "It's A Sin When You Love Somebody", Van McCoy's
"The Hustle", Dionne Warwick's "What The World Needs Now Is Love",
and Barry White's "Love Serenade". Even worse -- they're on *vinyl*.
Things are about to change in Sunray -- big-shot Ken Sherry (George
Shevtzov), a former Brisbane radio disc jockey of some eminence, is
headed into town, and things will never be the same for the Hurley
sisters, gawky twenty-year old Dimity (Miranda Otto), who spends days
riding around town aimlessly on her bicycle and nights waiting tables
at an empty Chinese restaurant, and plainly desperate 26-year old
Vicki-Ann (Rebecca Frith), who works as a beautician and is seeking
someone to replace her last suitor, who befell an unfortunate
chainsaw accident. Ken Sherry, who fancies himself a suave casanova
(this is established in the film's extremely significant opening
scene, as he mouths along with the Barry White tune playing on his
car radio, and reinforced in any subsequent scene in which he opens
his mouth) could be the man for the job -- his 'celebrity' status
delights Vicki-Ann, and she's all agog when he moves in next door.
Falling just short of throwing herself at him, Vicki-Ann is
consequently aghast when Ken Sherry displays an interest in young
Dimity, and the two sisters spar off in a sibling rivalry over the
affections of Sunray's new disc jockey, oblivious of his manipulative
smarminess and his general indifference to both of them as anything
other than conquests.
This does not even begin to indicate just how strange LOVE SERENADE
is, yet it would be spoiling the film to describe the odd goings-on
in any greater detail. You'd never believe me, anyways.
Suffice it to say that the film's quirkiness is accentuated by the
colourful characters which inhabit it, especially when contrasted
with the bleak drabness of the town of Sunray. Ms. Barrett perhaps
goes a bit *too* far at times in giving her characters little quirks
-- painting a simple character like Dimity's foil, Chinese restaurant
chef Albert Lee (John Alansu) as a psuedo-philosophizing nudist is
stretching it -- but in general proves to be fairly successful; these
characters are interesting, entertaining, and eminently watchable.
The best performance in the cast is that by Ms. Otto, who turns in an
outstanding comic performance as Dimity. She embraces her character's
shy, uncertainty and naivity, assuming awkward, timid body language,
and with her sporting a scrunched-up, baffled, slightly-addled look
on her face for most of the film, she's a delight to watch.
Mr. Shevtzov is terrific as the sleazy Ken Sherry -- his is a tricky
role, for had he not delved unabashedly into his character's smug
persona, Ken Sherry would have come off as merely repugnant. As it
stands, he still *is* repugnant, of course, but also oddly fascinating
and compelling -- it is hard to loathe him and his manipulations of
the two female leads, despite the attachment the audience has grown
for the Hurley sisters, because his transparency of his actions are
so amusing. One watches his mellow faux-worldly on-air psychobabble
with a sense of incredulous disbelief, and the airy, laid-back,
detatched way in which he impresses himself into the hearts of Dimity
and Vicki-Ann is cruel yet strangely bewitching to watch; a
particular nice touch is the cool repetition of any questions
addressed to him in his suave radio voice. Mr. Shevtzov plunges
headfirst into the role without any hint of restraint, and the film
is all the better for it.
Ms. Frith is somewhat less successful than her castmates as
Vicki-Ann, although she has a very good physical scene where she
attempts to shoo away her loitering sister. She is unable to prevent
her character from occasionally slipping into caricature, but it
should be pointed out that her part is not as well-written as the
other two central characters in the film, particularly in LOVE
SERENADE's first half. (For instance, an early scene has Vicki-Ann
telling Dimity that she should leave new neighbour Ken Sherry alone
in peace, for he needs his privacy, and is immediately cuts to
Vicki-Ann insistently knocking on Ken Sherry's front door. Heh.)
Ms. Barrett does go overboard with the fish symbolism in LOVE
SERENADE, and the film's conclusion, which seems to be intended as a
bit of a surprise, ends up being somewhat telegraphed (even moreso
if, like I, you're watching Ms. Otto), but this is a remarkably
original film. Ms. Barrett won the prestiguous Camera d'Or at the
1996 Cannes Film Festival for Best First Feature with LOVE SERENADE,
and it is extremely rare that I see such a singularly peculiar film
as this one. There is a scene in the film where Dimity is being told
by Vicki-Ann that she's odd; the same could be said about this
amusing little film.

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
MULAN (Walt Disney Pictures - 1998)
Voices by Ming-Na Wen, Eddie Murphy, B.D. Wong, Harvey Fierstein
Screenplay by Rita Hsiao, Christopher Sanders, Philip Lazebnik,
  Raymond Singer, Eugenia Bostwick-Singer
Produced by Pam Coats
Directed by Barry Cook & Tony Bancroft
Running time: 88 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   East meets West in MULAN, the latest installment in Disney's parade
   of annual animated feature films.  An odd fusion of ancient Asian
   traditions and disconcerting elements which betray obvious
   mass-market commercial sensibilities, this confident entry is easily
   the most engaging and satisfying Hollywood animated feature in years,
   but falls short of actualizing its potential.
   Though not for lack of trying.  In many respects, MULAN is among
   Disney's most mature efforts, skirting the surface of adult themes
   and daring to sneak glimpses into the messier side of combat.  The
   violence of the battles in the film are admittedly sanitized -- the
   imagery of a pillaged village, neatly encapsulated in the form of a
   child's discarded doll, is in itself no more harrowing than Luke
   discovering his fallen guardians in STAR WARS, and Mulan's later
   heroics in dispatching of the ruthless invaders is done so in the
   most tidy, bloodless method imaginable -- yet how often does a
   Hollywood animated film, long considered as the last safe refuge for
   the innocent, dare touch upon the consequential horrors of war in
   such a provocative manner?  In an instant, idealistic Mulan's
   innocence is lost, and her jovial squadron are reminded of what their
   efforts are spent defending.
   The film, based upon an ancient Chinese fable, centers on a spirited
   young woman who disguises herself as a man in order to serve as her
   family's obligatory conscript when China finds itself under attack by
   Huns (cartoonishly depicted by easy demonic overtones, replete with
   glowing yellow eyes and dagger-edged teeth, although lent a
   surprisingly genuine sense of menace).  Dipping into the mythology of
   other cultures for the first time after cavorting in animated
   revisitings of familiar Western / European fables and literature for
   decades, Disney's new film is boldly set in ancient China rather than
   relocated elsewhere, story intact, to some neutral territory, and
   revels in its East Asian roots; aside from a predominantly
   Asian-American cast providing the film's vocal work, there's liberal
   usage of Oriental iconography throughout, and the artwork reveal
   hints of Japanese anime influence.  While the film does occasionally
   reach its limits and starts to tread upon old stereotypes -- invoking
   pseudo-Asian references to items like beancurd and rice in every
   third sentence grows rather hoary, and I can't imagine that the
   regiment for ancient Chinese warriors *really* included
   karate-chopping blocks of stone in two -- it's rather remarkable that
   a movie primarily positioned for American and European audiences
   delves so wholeheartedly into new foreign territory.  The film also
   freely touches upon cultural idiosyncrasies from its outset; although
   savvy viewers should easily pick up on the intrinsics immediately,
   it's startlingly assertive in providing as little shorthand as it
   does to unfamiliar youngsters with regards to the customs and
   traditions of Mulan's land.
   At its core, the film is a tale of heroic adventure, and as such
   paints its story in bold strokes of honour, perseverance, nobility
   and courage.  As such, animation is the perfect vehicle for this
   flavour of epic, where stark emotional simplicity is able to
   effectively work hand-in-hand with visual purity.  Scenes which
   would play out as unbearably hokey in live action, such as Mulan's
   venerable father pridefully tossing aside his cane when accepting his
   draft notice, are lent a sense of strength and conveyed with greater
   emotional clarity in animation.  MULAN capitalizes on this during its
   strongest moments, particularly during our heroine's
   character-defining opening half-hour.
   It's when the film attempts to integrate the traditional mainstays of
   recent Hollywood animation -- the friendly animal sidekick, the
   colourful array of supporting characters -- into the mix where it
   goes slightly awry.  Off to battle, Mulan finds herself being trailed
   by a jive-talking diminutive dragon called Mushu and an agreeable
   little "lucky" cricket, who ostensibly appear to assist in her
   subterfuge and realistically serve as audience-friendly comic relief.
   They're affable presences, and not precisely ineffective --
   reasonable amounts of humour are elicited, and Eddie Murphy (who
   voices Mushu) is amusingly earnest -- but amidst all the high
   melodrama, the effect is mildly jarring and, from a storytelling
   perspective, questionable in its necessity.  At training camp, Mulan
   antagonizes and eventually wins over a trio of fumbling recruits
   (easily characterized simply as the Short Clown, the Skinny Clown,
   and the Big Clown), who provide more levity into the film with
   decidedly less effectiveness, and, in a familiar retread of
   traditional Disney patterns, she grows a certain fondness for a
   handsome, square-jawed young captain, Shang.  Everybody needs love,
   even ancient Chinese warrior princesses, but not necessarily in
   *this* film. The romantic angle, which lets the air out of the sails
   of the story's neo-feminist underpinnings, lacks any genuine spark
   and plays out like a contractual obligation.
   Another staple of recent Disney animated films, a cache of hummable
   little ditties, has also obligingly been carried over to MULAN but
   proves to be a decided weakness.  Composed by Matthew Wilder, none of
   the handful of tunes are particularly distinguishing, and one --
   "I'll Make A Man Out Of You" (unimaginatively accompanying a tired
   montage featuring our crew of characters transforming into lean
   fighting machines) -- becomes so grating and hackneyed that it seems
   almost interminable.  Only "Reflections", an early ballad of lament,
   proves to be a song of any consequence, serving as an effective
   showcase for Lea Salonga, one of musical theatre's most wondrously
   pure voices.
   Nonetheless, MULAN is an especially appealing piece of work from the
   Disney factory, with a strong narrative arc and pleasant artwork; the
   computer-generated stampede of Hun warriors charging down a snow
   mountain is wholly impressive.  While the blatantly child-friendly
   elements at times seem incongruous with the remainder of the film,
   they're not dissuasive and remain fairly enjoyable.  Briskly paced
   with a smart, energetic heroine and filled with high adventure, the
   film is ultimately most satisfying on the intimate scale of father
   and daughter.

Title
Review for Box of Moonlight (1996)
BOX OF MOONLIGHT (Trimark - 1997)
Starring John Turturro, Sam Rockwell, Catherine Keener
Screenplay by Tom DiCillo
Produced by Marcus Viscidi, Thomas A. Bliss
Directed by Tom DiCillo
Running time: 107 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
If screenwriter/director Tom DiCillo had his way, his new film BOX OF
MOONLIGHT would have been released years ago; he had originally
envisioned it as his follow-up to his feature film debut JOHNNY SUEDE,
but due to numerous financing problems and setbacks, the project was
postponed time after time.  In the meantime, Mr. DiCillo and a group
of friends shot a short film which was expanded to become LIVING IN
OBLIVION, the critically-lauded 1995 comedy on the perils of
low-budget filmmaking that has inspired many aspiring directors, and
which has revitalized his filmmaking career.  Based on this success,
BOX OF MOONLIGHT was finally put into production after years of
aborted starts, and the result is a delightfully charming and amusing
little comedy.
There is virtually nothing in BOX OF MOONLIGHT that one hasn't seen
before in many other films: the strength of this film about a distant,
emotionally-repressed engineer who learns to come out of his shell and
enjoy life is not in its originality, but in its execution.  Mr.
DiCillo elicits superb performances from his cast, and the film is
both well-paced and well-written, capturing an infectuous carefree
sense of whimsy.  BOX OF MOONLIGHT is a light and inconsequential
film, but a terribly amiable one.
The film's protagonist is straight-laced Al Fountain (John Turturro),
an electrical engineer whose life has reached a crisis state.  He is
despised by his employees for his priggish work ethic, emotionally
detached from his loving wife, and his chastisement of his young
son's inability to memorize the gigantic flashcard multiplication
tables Al brings home puts him at unease - Al is not a happy man.
When his offsite project is abruptly cancelled, Al decides in a
moment of spontaneity to visit a lake from his childhood rather than
return home, in the hopes that the detour might help him recapture
some of the happier moments from his past.  As Al's luck would have
it, the idyllic crystal-clear pond from his treasured memories has
become a toxic cesspool of pollution, but it is on his way away from
the lake where he comes across a strange, quirky young man dressed in
a ragged Davey Crockett suit (Sam Rockwell), who, though a series of
bizarre adventures, ultimately helps Al change the way he looks at
life.
That the uptight Al will learn from the free-spirited Kid to loosen
up is never in question; BOX OF MOONLIGHT does not surprise in that
respect, but what is interesting is that this is depicted onscreen in
such a compelling and affecting manner, which is primarily due to the
work of the two lead actors.  John Turturro, one of American film's
leading character actors, is in superb form here; this is one of his
finest performances, effectively conveying his character's
stringentness ultimately superceded by an uneasy levity within a
comic context.  (The scene in the film where Al breaks out into a
little dance is a delight.)  Mr. Turturro is terrific in BOX OF
MOONLIGHT, with his uneasy and unsettled Al a churning pot of
conflicting emotions at the outset of the film, and his winning turn
is award-calibre.  Sam Rockwell also is strong in his debut
performance as the wacky Kid; while a strange, loopy creation whose
simple wisdom far exceeds expectations, Mr. Rockwell is able to find
the humanity in the character, making him affable and ingratiating
while maintaining his harmless eccentricities.
BOX OF MOONLIGHT ultimately works because Mr. DiCillo's characters
win us over; it is amusing to watch Al's wide-eyed incredulousness at
the Kid's unorthodox lifestyle, and as Al releases the shackles which
have bound his way of life, it is equally liberating for the audience.
While not particularly a novel film, BOX OF MOONLIGHT is a sweet,
charming, and satisfying one.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"At one point when berated and bloodied by her male military superior,
 Moore screams out a guttural invitation to him to enjoy partaking in the
 absorption of a certain anatomical member." - Dan Cox, VARIETY, on G.I. JANE

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The rhythmic, Buffalo Springfield-flavoured Public Enemy title track
   pervasive throughout Spike Lee's new film HE GOT GAME is quite a
   contrast to the explosively raw, ferocious "Fight The Power" which
   brilliantly opened the landmark DO THE RIGHT THING, but this is a
   markedly different sort of film.  It's not the equal of his 1989
   masterpiece -- few films are -- but HE GOT GAME is a splendidly
   entertaining piece of work, and probably the most accessible film in
   Mr. Lee's canon.  While it's primarily an intimate domestic drama
   focusing upon the tenuous relationship between estranged father and
   son, it's also a lamenting film which decries the corrupt world of
   amateur athletics.
   Exploitation of burgeoning athletic prospects isn't exactly a new
   theme, having been repeatedly addressed in numerous films of recent
   years, but what makes it so effective here is Mr. Lee's superb
   ability at creating a sense of community for his characters, which
   lends authenticity to the proceedings and makes the scenario all the
   more tragic -- while it's morbidly amusing to watch, what's
   disturbing about the scene where Uncle Bubba (Bill Nunn) greedily
   sinks his claws into top-rated high school basketball prospect Jesus
   Shuttlesworth (Ray Allen) is not the sheer unbridled parasitism of
   his gesture as much as it is the weary expression on Jesus' face,
   which immediately conveys the knowledge that such displays of greed
   are all too commonplace sights for him.
   Indeed, the film is as much about the loss of innocence as it is
   about the basketball experience.  We open with reverential scenes of
   the youth of America immersed in the joy of game, effectively backed
   by the evocative music of Aaron Copland -- hey, I'm not even a big
   fan of basketball, and yet I found it hypnotic and stirring -- and
   then watch as young Jesus progresses from an exuberant child who can
   triumphantly exclaim "Boo-yeah!" when beating his cousin on a video
   game to a jaded adolescent, pushed too hard by his father during his
   formative years and forced to support his family at a tender young
   age while required to keep a wary eye open for those who would
   befriend him for their own gain.  Pulled upon from all sides, Jesus
   is, through no fault of his own, dehumanized by those around him --
   he's a commodity, not a person.  (There's a sobering key scene late
   in the film where a character matter-of-factly explains to Jesus why
   he's being exploited -- it would almost make you despise the
   character, if it were not for the fact that in its own twisted way,
   it does make its odd sort of sense.)  To Jesus' dismay, even his
   young sister Mary (a splendid Zelda Harris) becomes temporarily
   corrupted by the greedy urchins hovering around him, seduced by
   dreams of wealth and prosperity.  Still, as a good filmmaker is wont
   to do, Mr. Lee conveys his message without preaching at the audience,
   expressed in an inventive and engaging manner.
   In fact, HE GOT GAME is hugely palatable for mainstream audiences
   principally due to the tempestuous relationship between father and
   son which serves as the heart of the film.  Jake Shuttlesworth
   (Denzel Washington), serving time for a crime which is only revealed
   at the mid-point of the film, is temporarily (and unofficially)
   released from jail to be sent on an unique mission; he's to try to
   persuade his son Jesus to sign on with Big State, the governor's alma
   mater, by weeks' end.  In return, Jake's promised the chance of early
   parole.  The only problem is that his relationship with his estranged
   son is in tatters, and Jesus, despite sorely lacking in guidance,
   nonetheless wants nothing to do with him.  Angrily shunned by his
   son, the scene where their paths first cross is shot in such a stark,
   unsensationalized manner that it's consequently fraught with genuine
   tension.  This doesn't play like melodrama; it has a verisimilitude
   of authenticity.
   There's been a good deal of press about certain preview screenings of
   the film which found audiences screaming aloud in disapproval of
   Jake's interracial love affair.  While I'm surprised that this
   innocuous little romantic angle has created so much controversy (Mr.
   Lee plays the race card much more provocatively in a conversation
   shared by two characters where they compare black and white women), I
   was also aghast when I saw this thread play out.  However, my
   consternation was with the superfluousness of this entire generic
   subplot, which is so potentless that it calls upon such familiar
   clichis as the good-hearted prostitute under the thumb of an abusive
   pimp.  It's true that Jake's been in jail for five-and-a-half years,
   but does he *really* need a love interest?  I found that it
   distracted from the reconciliatory thread between father and son with
   little gain in return.  Despite it all, model-turned-actress/folk
   singer Milla Jovovich fares well in her minor role, while Mr.
   Washington imbues Jake with shades of gentleness.
   Mr. Washington's such a charismatic actor that I've always wanted to
   see him play against type as an irredeemably nasty villain.  He of
   course doesn't here, nor does he really approach it, but it comes as
   no surprise that he's very good at layering darker aspects onto his
   character.  Mr. Washington is convincingly antagonistic when
   brutishly pushing and goading his young son, and does a solid job at
   depicting Jake's suppressed rage; we're incredulous to learn what
   crime had Jake committed, but a scene where he angrily blasts his
   basketball after a blow-up with Jesus dispels any doubts of a more
   volatile side of his character under the surface.  Still, Mr.
   Washington generates so much goodwill by his sheer amiable presence
   that we accept Jake completely.
   Mr. Lee is one of America's most important contemporary directors,
   and he's in top form with HE GOT GAME.  Always a spectacular visual
   storyteller, he employs his familiar bag of techniques (different
   film stocks, characters directly addressing the camera, insert shots,
   leaps between time frames, jump cuts, use of slow-motion, etc.)
   effectively throughout.  As with all of his films, this one has a
   great deal of heart -- at times it's extremely moving -- but I
   especially appreciated Mr. Lee's keen eye with the little touches;
   when Jesus tells his girlfriend Lala (Rosario Dawson) at one point
   that he loves her, you can just barely catch her momentarily
   flinching.
   The film's cast all turn in top-notch performances.  Mr. Washington
   demonstrates why he's one of our very best actors, while between this
   film and CROOKLYN, Ms. Harris clearly makes a case for herself as one
   of the top performers of her generation; she's terrific.  HE GOT GAME
   hinges on Mr. Allen in the pivotal role of Jesus, and the acting
   debut of the Milwaukee Bucks guard is legitimately superb, relaxed
   and convincing.  It's a remarkable turn, a genuine revelation.
   As good as the cast is, and as impressive as the contributions by
   cinematographer Malik Hassan Sayeed and editor Barry Alexander Brown
   may be, this is Mr. Lee's triumph.  Adeptly combining humour, drama,
   raw emotion and insight in affecting fashion, he once again
   demonstrates that as well as being one of the most controversial of
   directors, he's also one of the best.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
The teaser trailers for MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING scarsely
gave reason for hope - it looked like the sort of goofy,
light-hearted comedy than might put Julia Roberts back in the
limelight, but little more; I'd frankly rarely seen a trailer
place such an emphasis on people falling over for laughs so
often.  It was then to both my surprise and my delight to
find that MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING was such a success - a
strong, bouyant romantic-comedy with some decidedly
unconventionally quirky comic aspects, featuring a triumphant
performance from Ms. Roberts. 
The heroine of MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING is Julianne Potter
(Julia Roberts), a successful New York restaurant critic, and
we open the film with a whimsical revelation to her editor
George Downes (Rupert Everett) that years ago, she had made a
pact with her dear best friend and ex-lover Michael O'Neal
(Dermot Mulroney), a sports writer, that if they both hadn't
married by the time they reached 28, they had promised to
marry each other.  Both Julianne and Michael are both single,
of course, and when George inquires about Michael's age,
Julianne realizes that he's mere weeks away from his 28th
birthday, and is quite distressed when she receives a phone
call from Michael later that day.  However, she finds herself
even more distraught when Michael's call is in regards to his
impending marriage to heiress Kimmy Wallace (Cameron Diaz),
and when he asks Julianne to fly down to Chicago for the
wedding, Julianne suddenly realizes that she loves Michael,
and resolves to break up the wedding and steal the groom by
any means necessary. 
The setup for MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING, then, is a fairly
conventional one, and in many ways the film's storyline is
formulaic - but only to a certain extent: the film was
directed by P.J. Hogan, whose first feature, MURIEL'S
WEDDING, had quite an offbeat tone for a traditional
uplifting ugly-duckling story, and the same holds true for MY
BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING, which confidently combines traditional
romantic-comedy elements with a really eccentric sense of
humour.  The film is innundated with sly mischievousness
which seems clearly the influence of Mr. Hogan.  For example,
there's a heartfelt, emotional exchange between Julianne and
Michael late in the film - with a trio of teenagers, inhaling
helium and sounding every bit like Alvin and the Chipmunks,
harmonizing in the background.  MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING
opens with an inspired opening credit sequence which sets the
tone for the film, and there are scenes where actors
spontaneously burst into song to good comic effect - it could
almost be argued that this film is nearly as much of a
musical as Woody Allen's EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU; I'd even
assert it's a more successful one. 
MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING keeps breaking conventionality with
its characters as well.  In a typical romantic-comedy, Kimmy
would be portrayed as a snooty, conniving ice queen, and the
audience would be cheering for Julianne to rescue Michael
from her grasps; this film is smarter than that - here, Kimmy
is sweet, sincere, and innocent; Julianne even admits at one
point that had she not resolved to utterly destroy Kimmy's
life, she'd actually like her too.  The George character is
almost a staple of recent film - the homosexual male friend
of the heroine who acts as a confidant and provides the
guiding voice of reason - but in MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING, he
gets to have a playful, mischievous and charming personality.
Throughout the film, the formulaisms one often sees is
romantic-comedy are given little twists, and the result is a
film which is compelling all the way to its somewhat
unorthodox conclusion.  There is a lot of smart writing in
the well-paced screenplay by Ronald Bass; we're given four
interesting, vivid, and likeable characters, with some good
dialogue and some genuinely charming and touching moments.
MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING marks a strong career rebound for
Julia Roberts, who turns in a top-notch, confident and
reassured performance as Julianne.  This isn't the sort of
role one usually associates with Ms. Roberts - the Julianne
character's neurotic, fumbling characteristics are more in
line with a Meg Ryan role - but Ms. Roberts works wonderfully
in the film and demonstrates her aptitude at comedy here,
remaining compelling and empathetic to the audience, if not
entirely sympathetic, even when her deeds done to destroy the
wedding plans of her best friend are less than honourable. 
Even better than Ms. Roberts though is Cameron Diaz, who
turns in a shining performance in MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDDING.
With a smile which lights up the screen, she effectively
conveys Kimmy's insecurity and utter sweetness in an
endearing manner, and never hits a false note in the film.
She even sings - I won't soon forget her charming serenade of
"I Just Don't Know What To Do With Myself". 
Rupert Everett is given a very juicy role as George, and he
makes the most of it with a hilarious turn which makes his
character perhaps the most vivid and most memorable in the
film.  His George is a bit of a devilish rogue, entirely
affable, and Mr. Everett's performance is a delight to watch;
he's clearly having fun, and his joy is infectuous. 
Dermot Mulroney is adequate in a thankless role - unlike the
other characters in the film, he's not given a lot to do, but
there is a genuine onscreen chemistry between Ms. Roberts and
Mr. Mulroney, and consequently the longstanding friendship
between his Michael character and the Julianne character
always seemed completely authentic. 
When Julia Roberts' lustre began to fade, and she was usurped
from her title as "America's Sweetheart" by Sandra Bullock, I
thought it was a canny career move on her part to take
supporting roles in prestige projects like MICHAEL COLLINS
and EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU to raise her profile.  While that
didn't quite work out, it's near-certain that her successful
return to the genre which made her a big star back in 1990,
the romantic-comedy, will once again raise her ante in the
Hollywood game.  MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING marks a return to
form for Ms. Roberts, and cements P.J. Hogan's reputation as a
skilled director of comedy. 

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
ANALYZE THIS (Warner Bros. - 1999)
Cast: Robert De Niro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow, Joe Viterelli,
      Chazz Palminteri
Screenplay by Peter Tolan and Harold Ramis and Kenneth Lonergan
Produced by Paula Weinstein and Jane Rosenthal
Directed by Harold Ramis
Running time: 103 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Harold Ramis' comedy ANALYZE THIS is a film whose central conceit
   winds up being more interesting than its screen realisation.
   Lampooning mafioso stereotypes with abandon, the picture runs out of
   gas fairly early on and lurches the remainder of the way to the
   finish line.
   With the public's fascination with the dangerous glamour of organized
   crime reaching the level where media saturation on the topic has made
   the John Gotti-led Gambino crime family as fabled and familiar to the
   masses as the Corleones, it was inevitable that accompanying
   cinematic attention to the Mafia would ultimately lead to the
   evolution of an unlikely film sub-genre -- the mob comedy.  Joining
   Andrew Fleming's THE FRESHMAN and Jim Abraham's unfortunate MAFIA! in
   this category is ANALYZE THIS, which attacks one of the more curious
   what-if scenarios of late (though not *singularly* curious -- I
   understand that there's a new HBO series operating on the same basic
   premise): what if a mob boss was stricken with panic attacks and
   enlisted the services of a psychiatrist?
   Billy Crystal, adorning the requisite shrink beard, plays the doctor
   and Robert De Niro lends his iconic status as the angst-ridden
   gangster who finds his life as fearsome New York mob boss Paul Vitti
   increasingly crippled by his volatile emotional state.  An inability
   to brutally bash in a turncoat's head with a steel pipe?  Can't
   perform in bed?  For a macho overlord whose dominance over the Big
   Apple is threatened by a rival mobster (Chazz Palminteri), this
   simply will not do.  And becoming teary-eyed at sentimental
   commercials? Unforgivable.
   Vitti commandeers the unwilling services of Crystal's mild-mannered
   Dr. Ben Sobel at a rather inopportune time -- the shrink is headed on
   vacation to Miami where he's scheduled to marry reporter Laura
   MacNamara (Lisa Kudrow).  After this setup, the Florida-based segment
   of this film mostly plays like a Mafia-tinged version of WHAT ABOUT
   BOB?, where the befuddled Sobel is constantly hounded by his
   demanding new patient who continues to appear at the most
   inappropriate moments.  Of course, fitting the stature of a crime
   boss, it's not Vitti himself who pesters Sobel -- his dim, sad-eyed
   right-hand man Jelly (Joe Viterelli) is the one to break into the
   shrink's hotel room and haul him out of bed in the middle of the
   night.
   The culture clash between the hardened world of the mob and Sobel's
   suburbanite is often amusing, and there are several funny comic
   routines and sight gags, but it gradually becomes apparent that the
   film is content to skewer the Mafia in a series of repetitive riffs,
   toying with the tough, family-loving, God-fearing, honour-bound
   archetype familiar from the movies; the picture establishes a rhythm
   which plays itself out quickly.  On the flip side, although hinting
   at it on several occasions (at one point, when instructed to be
   vague, Sobel notes that his profession has left him well-equipped for
   imprecision), the picture fails to add a little variety to the comedy
   by doing little to send-up the psychiatric profession, and indeed
   winds up endorsing mushy therapeutic cliches during the story's
   uninvolving resolution, dulling the carefree irreverence of the
   picture.
   Beyond its premise, the film doesn't really have much of a compelling
   story to speak of, and what that there is evolves in the weaker
   latter half of the picture as the action shifts back to New York.
   It's mostly routine and uncompelling material -- FBI stings, mob
   summits, yet *more* goofy wedding ceremony fiascoes (a tired gag
   which has been pretty much been run into the ground) and serves as a
   rather flimsy hanger upon which to float more comic bits.  Howard
   Shore attempts to inject energy into the piece with a jaunty score
   which only serves to underline how muddled the film has become.
   While De Niro demonstrates his good sportsmanship in the picture
   through his cheerfully straight portrayal of the stressed mob boss,
   Kudrow's imitable quirkiness is largely wasted in a tiny, generic
   role, and Palminteri's saddled with a two-dimensional character he
   could play in his sleep.  On the other hand, it's been so long since
   his heyday with WHEN HARRY MET SALLY... and CITY SLICKERS that I'd
   begun to actually forget about Crystal as a solid screen comedian and
   found myself thinking of him mostly as The Guy Who Knows How To Host
   The Oscars.  In the final reel of ANALYZE THIS, he gets to shed the
   second banana role worn throughout the bulk of the picture to deliver
   one of his best onscreen moments in quite some time.  The result was
   silly and predictable, but it had me chuckling.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"X-FILES fans come up to me in malls expecting me to be able to fill them
 in on the whole conspiracy.  Half the time I have no idea what they're
 talking about." - Martin Landau

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   At the end of the day, those reflecting upon the debacle that is THE
   AVENGERS would do well to take note that warning clouds loomed on
   the horizon for the project well before Warner Bros. made the
   contentious decision to abandon preview press screenings and scrapped
   plans for a gala premiere.  This highly-anticipated film rendition
   of the cult television show was originally slotted for an early June
   opening, where it would have gone head-to-head against the rival
   studios' heavy hitters; its eventual demotion to a less potent
   mid-August opening was an obvious early indication of the studio's
   lack of confidence with the picture.
   And with good reason.  This is a joyless exercise of a film, held
   together by a barely coherent plot and lacking any semblance of
   excitement, thrills or wit.  Remarkable in its banality and brutally
   uninvolving, THE AVENGERS is a catastrophic mess which immediately
   invites comparisons to last year's case study in style over
   substance, Joel Schumacher's much-loathed BATMAN & ROBIN.  (Indeed,
   both films even feature appalling, ridiculous sequences which find
   central characters dressed up in fuzzy oversized costumes.)
   Uma Thurman, who takes on the salacious role of the catsuit-clad,
   karate-chopping Emma Peel immortalized by Diana Rigg, was the only
   bright spot in the aforementioned Schumacher disaster, imbuing her
   Poison Ivy with a dose of sassiness and sly wit that gave audiences
   something to smile at amidst the cinematic carnage.  Unfortunately,
   the same can't be said here, where she and cohort Ralph Fiennes (our
   new John Steed, taking over for Patrick Macnee) demonstrate no
   appreciable chemistry whatsoever, fatally crippling the picture as
   they volley fizzling repartee back and forth and trade
   double-entendres with all the enthusiasm of two actors painfully
   aware that they're on board a sinking ship.  At this rate,
   usually-splendid actor Mr. Fiennes may never make the transition from
   Arthouse Apollo to mainstream leading man -- his tepid turn here will
   make as much of an inroad as his commendably seedy performance in the
   regrettably-neglected Kathyrn Bigelow film STRANGE DAYS.
   The duo *look* the part -- and admittedly THE AVENGERS is, more than
   most, heavily dependent upon style -- but they're no fun to watch,
   and I found myself growing increasingly distant and annoyed by the
   lack of spark between the two cheekily ironic characters as they
   navigated through the picture's caper-esque plot.  When not checking
   my wristwatch or shifting restlessly in my seat, I began to alleviate
   the boredom by considering how this all might have played out had the
   filmmakers chose to go instead with that erstwhile EMMA as our Mrs.
   Peel -- no, not Kate Beckinsale (although the notion now intrigues
   me), but Gwyneth Paltrow, who was originally in the running for the
   part and can veritably handle a spot-on English accent.  If nothing
   else, it'd at least be highly entertaining for the incongruous sight
   of the vaguely twiggish young actress kicking butt.
   The story, such as it is, involves the ever-bemused tandem of Steed
   and Peel combating the malevolent Sir August de Wynter (Sean
   Connery), an eccentric aristocrat threatening the safety of the
   nation with his climate-controlling contraption.  (They also sip a
   lot of tea.)  Overlooking some goofy cloning nonsense and quirky
   hijinx involving our protagonists' superiors, it sounds far better
   than it plays, and is rendered almost indecipherable by blatant
   post-production tinkering; it's clearly evident that the picture has
   been cut to shreds.  THE AVENGERS was never about gripping drama, and
   our heroes accordingly never take villainous Sir August very
   seriously, but given the lack of cohesion in the plot and the lack of
   menace conveyed by the buffoonish maniac, it's all decidedly
   uncompelling.  Mr. Connery, who's onscreen barely long enough to
   register an impression, approaches the role like a man fulfilling a
   contractual obligation, simultaneously chewing the scenery while
   unable to hide his disinterest.
   At least it all looks good.  This is a genuinely handsome production,
   with fine costume design by Anthony Powell and crisply shot by Roger
   Pratt.  In particular, the gleaming production design by Stuart Craig
   commands attention, adeptly drawing elements both old and new in
   order to depict this Great Britain.  There are a handful of striking
   visual moments in the film, including an attack by a swarm of giant
   robotic bees and a nice shot of Steed and Peel finding a way to walk
   on water, but the film is so unremittingly dull that even these
   instances fail to stir interest or raise pulse rates.  By the time
   the film's climax had arrived, my interest was not with the sight of
   Steed and Sir August slugging it out amidst crashing waves and
   thundering rain, but with the quickest escape route from the theatre.
   Not coincidentally, the enticing bits of visual bravura were the
   shots assembled into the movie's remarkable trailer, a savvy piece of
   work which ironically is infinitely more appealing that the feature
   film itself; the first promo which made the rounds in early spring is
   probably my favourite studio trailer so far this year.  It's
   everything that THE AVENGERS is not -- saucy, clever, engaging, and
   entertaining.  A crushing disappointment, the film is one of the
   worst outings of the year -- too drearily awful to be savoured as
   gleefully bad, too polished to overlook its deficiencies.  There may
   be upcoming pictures that are even more lifeless than THE AVENGERS,
   but I sure hope not.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Title
Review for Dolores Claiborne (1995)
Starring Kathy Bates, Jennifer Jason Leigh, Christopher Plummer,
         David Strathairn, Judy Parfitt
Screenplay by Tony Gilroy, based on the novel by Stephen King
Produced by Taylor Hackford and Charles Mulvehill
Directed by Taylor Hackford
Rated AA [Adult Accompaniment for those under thirteen] in Ontario for
         brief violence, profanity and mature themes
Running time: 131 minutes
     The release of DOLORES CLAIBORNE into wide release this weekend
adds another entry into the long list of film adaptations of Stephen
King's work.  This slow-moving character study provides some
outstanding acting performances by the principals, but suffers from a
tepid conclusion, inconsistent direction, and may not have wide
commercial appeal.
     When the maid, Dolores Claiborne, is found brandishing a rolling
pin standing over the bloody and dead body of her employer, it seems
like an open-and-shut murder case.  Upon hearing of the death via a
mysterious fax, Dolores' estranged and bitter daughter, Esquire
magazine writer Selena St. George, returns from New York back to her
tiny island village childhood home.  As the two clash horns, the story
behind the mysterious death of Dolores' abusive husband two decades
ago, ruled an accident despite the protests of Detective John Mackey,
is revealed.  Did Dolores kill her husband?  And did she kill her
employer?
     DOLORES CLAIBORNE is certainly more of a character study than a
suspense thriller.  Consequently, it is fortunate that their cast
includes some of Hollywood's finest character actors, such as Bates,
Leigh and Strathairn.
     Kathy Bates plays the film's title character, and gives a
sensational lead performance.  DOLORES CLAIBORNE is essentially a
showcase for the talent of Bates, as her character has a huge amount of
screen time.  She dominates the screen, producing a character that is
compelling and arresting, as we watch the character go through two
decades of history via flashbacks.  Kathy Bates' performance is
award-calibre stuff.
     The rest of the cast is also very good.  Jennifer Jason Leigh
plays the perpetually sour, bitter Helena St. George well, and
Christopher Plummer seems to be enjoying himself as Dolores'
ever-present nemesis, the determined Detective John Mackey.  David
Strathairn is particularly interesting and suitably smarmy and
despicable as Dolores' husband, Joe St. George.  Judy Parfitt is fine
as Dolores' tyrannic socialite employer, Vera Donovan--it would have
been interesting to see, say, Meg Foster in this role.  Child actor
Ellen Muth is also worth noting as the young Selena during the
flashback sequences; she is very impressive.
     The direction of DOLORES CLAIBORNE by Taylor Hackford wildly
varies throughout the film, ranging from some parts which are quite
clever in their own right, to parts which are embarrassingly hokey.  The
segues between flashbacks and the present are very hit-and-miss in
terms of effectiveness.  The pacing of the film tends to be numbingly
slow, which tends to undermine any suspense which might be built up.
However, the cinematography by Gabriel Beristain is wonderful--I
particularly like the chilling ice-blue hue permeating the present-day
scenes, contrasting well with the many Nova Scotia ocean shots--and
Danny Elfman provides a surprisingly understated score for the film.
     It would seem that the commercial potential of DOLORES CLAIBORNE
is limited.  None of the performers in the film could be classified as
a big draw, and its pacing may be a turn-off to those expecting a
gripping suspense film filled with twists and turns and car crashes and
axe-wielding psychopaths.  Although being essentially the only film in
its genre in release now, it may also be hurt by the negative
perception of King works, even with the recent critical success of THE
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION and THE STAND.
     DOLORES CLAIBORNE suffers from a very unsatisfying conclusion, and
moves very slowly.  However, the performances are uniformly excellent,
particularly Kathy Bates, and the film has its moments.  On my
four-star scale, I give DOLORES CLAIBORNE three stars.

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
MIMIC (Dimension - 1997)
Starring Mira Sorvino, Jeremy Northam, Josh Brolin, Giancarlo Giannini,
  Charles S. Dutton, Alexander Goodwin
Screenplay by Matthew Robbins, Guillermo Del Toro
Produced by Bob Weinstein, B.J. Rack, Ole Bornedal
Directed by Guillermo Del Toro
Running time: 105 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
There was no reason not to have tremendously high expectations for the
new science-fiction horror film MIMIC, the most costly venture of
Dimension Films since its inception, given the pedigree of talent
associated with the project.  Behind the camera was Guillermo Del Toro,
whose debut feature film was the terrifically stylish and richly
atmospheric vampire film CRONOS, which was astonishingly original and
finely well-crafted -- it easily ranks among the very best horror films
of this decade, and heralded a bright future ahead for this talented
director.  Meanwhile, in front of the camera for MIMIC was Mira Sorvino,
an extremely gifted and versatile young actress of uncommon intelligence
and poise.  To complete the triad of talent, the names bandied about as
writers on the film's screenplay was astonishingly impressive: Mr.
Del Toro, and among those performing rewrites, both John Sayles(!) and
Steven Soderbergh(!).  With a creative team such as this, one can't help
but go into MIMIC with a certain degree of anticipation.
Consequently, one can't help but leave MIMIC with an incredible degree of
disappointment.  There is virtually nothing in the film's storyline which
is at all fresh or inventive; it is a straightforward, by-the-books
generic creature film with very little resonance.  An immediate tip-off
of the impending dreariness which awaits should have been the
screenwriter credits in the striking title sequence for the film
(designed by Kyle Cooper, who also designed the title credits for SE7EN,
THE ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU, THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT -- quite a talented
guy); the glaring omission of Mr. Sayles and Mr. Soderbergh as credited
co-screenwriters should have been a clue.  (My understanding is that
although both Mr. Sayles and Mr. Soderbergh wrote rewrites, the
filmmakers ultimately returned to an earlier version of the screenplay.)
MIMIC is set in Manhattan, where the outbreak of a terrible epidemic is
depicted in suitably apocalyptic fashion. Hospital wards are filled
beyond capacity with the afflicted, with young children appearing to be
the most susceptible to the plague.  While science is unable to find a
cure, scientists Susan Tyler (Ms. Sorvino) and Peter Mann (Jeremy
Northam) have developed an indirect method of curbing the disease's
spread -- they have genetically engineered a breed of insect, deemed the
"Judas breed", which destroys the cockroaches carrying the plague.  (This
is depicted in a sequence where the duo stomp out into a testing
laboratory, dressed in gigantic oversized bio-containment suits -- you
can tell the one with the cute button noise is Ms. Sorvino -- to unleash
their creation on a bevy of cockroaches.)  With the understanding that
their Judas breed will die out after one generation -- long enough to
kill enough cockroaches to stifle the epidemic -- Susan and Peter release
their insects into the environment, and sure enough, soon all appears
well.  Three years later, though, signs appear which seem to indicate --
surprise, surprise -- that the Judas breed *did not* die out as expected,
but instead has evolved and survived.  And people are starting to go
missing ...
The film unfolds fairly predictably from this point, and while some
sequences generate moderate interest, as a whole MIMIC is less than
riveting.  The problem is that there is no human connection created
between the film's characters and the audience; MIMIC introduces a series
of characters without giving them any depth, and as a result it becomes
difficult to truly care about their plight as they battle giant insects
in the bowels of the New York subway system.  This is particularly true
for the film's bland leading characters; save for one solitary
characterization scene near the beginning of MIMIC, there is nothing that
distinguishes Susan and Peter from genre archetypes, and no particular
reason for the audience to have any vested interest in their ordeal.
As it is easy to have one's mind begin to wander during the film as
little is particularly fresh or interesting, one can spend a lot of time
during the movie playing "Count the ALIENS parallel".  While the initial
concept of having one's biological creation turn against its creator --
the familiar "Don't mess with Mother Nature" theme -- clearly harkens to
films like James Whale's FRANKENSTEIN, it is obvious that MIMIC was
greatly influenced by Ridley Scott's ALIEN and James Cameron's ALIENS
both in terms of story and atmosphere, and one can clearly see a huge
number of parallels between ALIENS, the blatant antecedent, and MIMIC.
Both eventually boil down to a group of hardy survivors struggling to
survive and destroy a hideous swarm of giant insectoid monsters in a
murky, damp labyrinth-like setting. Each has a strong, smart female lead
who understands the nature of the predators, and a noble male
counterpart.  ALIENS and MIMIC both have a wisecracking secondary male
character who bite it.  (Sadly, Josh Brolin is not nearly as entertaining
as Bill Paxton was.)  There is a strict, authority figure who initially
causes difficulties but redeems himself by bravely paying the ultimate
sacrifice on behalf of the group in both films.  The rescue of a young
child figures prominently in both films.  At a pivotal moment in ALIENS,
Ripley screams "Get away from her, you *bitch*!" at the final marauder;
likewise, in MIMIC, Susan calls out "No! You don't touch him!" (Not quite
as catchy, but whatever.)  ALIENS starred an actress named *Sigourney*;
MIMIC's star is named *Sorvino* ... 
Okay, that last point is pushing it, but surely the point is clear that
MIMIC is a direct descendent from the ALIEN trilogy (soon to become a
quadripartite). This is not necessarily a knock on it -- James Cameron's
ALIENS is one of the best pulse-pounding films I've ever seen -- but
unfortunately in every respect, MIMIC falls well short of its predecessor
in terms of generating excitement or shock, and the result is a rather
lacklustre product.
Special mention should be made of the child-in-peril in MIMIC, Chuy
(Alexander Goodwin), the autistic grandson of a subway shoeshine man,
Manny (Giancarlo Giannini), who may be one of the most annoying child
characters in recent years.  Given an inexplicable amount of screentime
to depict Chuy, a blank, expressionless look frozen on his face,
mindlessly rattle two spoons together to create an irritating
*clik-clik-clik-clik* sound and to demonstrate that he, well, knows
shoes, he constantly tests the audience's patience by indiscriminantly
inserting himself into hazardous scenarios.  At least ALIENS' Newt
(Carrie Henn) had a personality.  Watching all of the film's characters
repeatedly risk and sacrifice their lives for this kid, I kept hoping one
of the monsters would scoop him up and carry him away, never to be seen
again.  Susan and Peter were shown earlier in MIMIC to be desperate for
a child of their own, but even that fails to cover the inexplicable
attachment they have for Chuy and the lengths they extend themselves to
rescue him.  Only a saint would be able to restrain themselves from
throwing this child to the beasts.
MIMIC finally concludes with a series of scenes which comply to hokey
genre conventions (I was barely able to keep from groaning aloud at a
shot late in the film of a person diving into water).  While the visual
effects in the film are generally well done, this is not enough to
salvage the film from mediocrity.  With the talent involved with MIMIC,
it had the potential of being a superior science-fiction horror film;
what it sadly is instead is a generic giant insect movie.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Let's hurt somebody." - Aaron Eckhart, IN THE COMPANY OF MEN

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU (Touchstone - 1999)
Cast: Heath Ledger, Julia Stiles, Joseph Gordon-Levitt,
      Larisa Oleynik, David Krumholtz, Andrew Keegan
Screenplay by Karen McCullah Lutz & Kirsten Smith
Produced by Andrew Lazar
Directed by Gil Junger
Running time: 97 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   When recently asked why I continue to bother with the mostly
   disappointing influx of recent teen films, I responded that I was
   looking for the next CLUELESS.  From its broad outline and sunny
   veneer, veteran TV sitcom director Gil Junger's feature film debut,
   10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU, would appear to be a worthy successor but
   falls decidedly short of the mark.
   Like CLUELESS, which reworked the plot from Jane Austen's "Emma" and
   transported it into a modern high school setting, 10 THINGS I HATE
   ABOUT YOU is a liberal adaptation of Shakespeare's comedy "The Taming
   Of The Shrew" set in the teen scene of the 1990s.  Unlike the Amy
   Heckerling picture, which breezily redid Austen without drawing overt
   attention to itself, this picture not only winks at the Bard, but
   gives a full-out bow to its antecedent -- with characters named
   Stratford and Verona attending Padua High, dialogue excerpts lifted
   directly from his plays, sonnet writing and a peripheral character
   obsessed with Shakespeare, it's hard to miss the connection even if
   the picture's tagline wasn't "How do I loathe thee?  Let me count the
   ways."
   Using the play as a jumping point, the picture introduces Stratford
   sisters Katarina (Julia Stiles) and Bianca (Larisa Oleynik), whose
   attitudes towards the social scene are at polar extremes -- Bianca's
   bubbly and wildly popular, while tempestuous Kat is a hard-line
   feminist who's indifferent to peer acceptance.  Much to Bianca's
   dismay, both of them are forbidden to date by decree of their
   overprotective father (Larry Miller), who tweaks the longstanding
   rule at the beginning of the picture to allow her to date once her
   older sister finds a suitor as well.  "But she's a mutant!" Bianca
   cries.  "What if she *never* dates?"  Anxious to woo Bianca, two
   dueling suitors -- narcissistic model Joey (Andrew Keegan) and nice
   guy Cameron (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) -- embark on a scheme to set up
   the notoriously hostile Kat with a new boyfriend, and resort to the
   outlawish new bad boy in town, Patrick Verona (Heath Ledger).
   The reworking of the story becomes rather creaky at times, and the
   teen film formula providing the support for this revised tale is
   glaringly apparent; to the beat, we can count on the requisite
   disposable party scene, the prom sequence, and the heartwrenching
   break-up and warm fuzzy reconciliation scenes to make their
   appearances; it's all inevitable material played in routine fashion.
   10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU also mildly suffers from being preceded by
   a few months by SHE'S ALL THAT, another teen film with a familiar,
   virtually identical plot (suitor is bribed to date unpopular heroine,
   with expected repercussions).
   The film is also rather slack in its setup.  While Kat's proudly
   nonconformist nature and disdain for the teen social sphere is
   wonderfully established in her wordless opening scene, the rest of
   the characters aren't particularly well-drawn before the mechanics of
   the plot kick into action.  In terms of its narrative, there's
   nothing remotely surprising in 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU -- all of
   the characters get their just desserts, even the goofy comic relief
   sidekick (David Krumholtz), so satisfaction with the storytelling
   lies solely with how engaging and sympathetic the players are drawn.
   The rebellious disposition of outsider Patrick is especially sketchy
   and unconvincing (rumours abound that he once ate a live duck sans
   beak and feet -- umm, sure), and that his misunderstood character is
   clearly a kind and gentle soul from the outset undermines interest in
   the early scenes of courtship between the supposed mismatched pair.
   Nonetheless, it's almost certainly the romantic angle between the two
   leads which carry the film, far moreso than the broad, scattershot
   and often juvenile comedy which typifies the remainder of the
   picture.  Stiles, who has the movie's plum role as the "shrewish" Kat
   and turns in a noteworthy performance brimming with intelligence, has
   nice chemistry with the likeable Ledger, and the relationship which
   emerges between their seemingly-disparate characters is entirely
   predictable yet appealing.  After setting the wheels in motion, the
   uncompelling romantic triangle involving Joey, Bianca and Cameron
   (whom the film gives misleading prominence at the outset) fades into
   the background as the volatile courtship between Kat and Patrick
   develops.  Also solid are the always-dependable Allison Janney in a
   glorified cameo as an unconcerned guidance counselor, and Daryl
   "Chill" Mitchell, who's very funny as the literature teacher
   exasperated with Kat's biting insights.
   The picture is also supported by a terrific, jubilant pop soundtrack
   dominated by songs from Letters To Cleo which imbues much energy into
   the aggressively-likable film.  It's also a nice (and somewhat
   disorienting) coup to feature an ensemble cast in a teen movie
   comprised largely of actual teen actors -- after watching endless
   groups of early- and even late-twentysomethings assuming these roles
   in other likeminded pictures, it's a refreshing bit of casting.  10
   THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU is a high-spirited, effervescent movie full
   of life which, while not quite as touching as it's meant to be nor
   nearly as funny as it ought to be (the outtakes during the credits
   are as amusing as anything in the film itself), is a pleasant, if
   totally forgettable, diversion.  CLUELESS, it ain't, though.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"X-FILES fans come up to me in malls expecting me to be able to fill them
 in on the whole conspiracy.  Half the time I have no idea what they're
 talking about." - Martin Landau

Title
Review for Muriel's Wedding (1994)
CIBY 2000/Miramax - 1994
Starring Toni Collette, Bill Hunter, Rachel Griffiths
Screenplay by P.J. Hogan
Produced by Lynda House and Jocelyn Moorhouse
Directed by P.J. Hogan
Rated AA [Adult Accompaniment for those under fourteen] in Ontario for
        profanity and mature themes
     After a successful run in Australia last year, and with much
critical praise heaped upon it, MURIEL'S WEDDING opens into medium
release this weekend in North America.
     Muriel Heslop is a withdrawn, overweight young woman living in
Porpoise Spit, Australia.  She is often the target of her father's
frequent rants at the family, and drowns out her feelings of inadequacy
with ABBA music and fantasies of marriage.  Her self-loathing is such
that only being wed shall she prove herself to be a success; marriage
will transform her into a new person who is respected and admired.
After her four cliquey friends dump her, Muriel plots to follow them to
a resort where they are celebrating the honeymoon of one of the girls,
and MURIEL'S WEDDING unfolds from there.
     Toni Collette plays Muriel in a winning performance, conveying
both the sadness of her character and her desperate eagerness to be
accepted.  Collette gained a frightening 43 pounds in order to play the
chubby title character.  She has a natural screen presence and exudes
charisma, easily winning the audience over with an honest, painful
performance.  Collette basically carries the film, appearing in almost
every scene.
     Muriel's father, Bill "The Battler" Heslop, is portrayed by Bill
Hunter as a slick politician/developer.  While chumming around with
young fans and crowing 'you can't beat progress' (his slogan), Bill
labels his family as worthless and embarrassments.  Rachel Griffiths
plays Rhonda, who becomes Muriel's cheeky new friend in the film.  She
has good chemistry with Collette, and the film suffers when Griffiths
is off-screen.  Muriel's tormenters, played by Pippa Grandison, Rosalind
Hammond, Belinda Jarrett and Sophie Lee, are two-dimensional
caricatures, all saucy, vain and bumblingly spiteful, though that is
probably due to Hogan's scripting
     MURIEL'S WEDDING is essentially a genre teen comedy with more
intelligence and a lot of charm.  Hogan's use of ABBA tunes (which
virtually comprises the entire soundtrack) is interestingly
appropriate, although its repetitiveness tires after awhile.  Hogan's
script is right on the mark in terms of proportionately mixing comedy
with Muriel's earnest quest for acceptance, and the gorgeous scene with
Muriel window-shopping beautifully illustrates the wonder that marriage
has for her.  The glaring pastel colours worn by the performers is an
interesting touch.  MURIEL'S WEDDING features a fine performance by
Toni Collette and a charming, if a bit too straightforward and
conventional story by P.J. Hogan.  On my four star scale, I give
MURIEL'S WEDDING three stars.

Title
Review for Little Mermaid, The (1989)

THE LITTLE MERMAID (Walt Disney Pictures - 1989)
Voices by Jodi Benson, Samuel E. Wright, Pat Carroll,
  Christopher Daniel Barnes, Buddy Hackett, Kenneth Mars, Jason Marin
Screenplay by Ron Clements & John Musker, based on the story by
  Hans Christian Andersen
Produced by Howard Ashman, John Musker
Directed by Ron Clements & John Musker
Running time: 82 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   It's startling to consider that it was only a few years ago that film
   distributors would worriedly rearrange their summer release schedules
   in order to give the annual Disney animated feature juggernaut a wide
   berth.  THE LION KING had just cracked $300 million domestic in gross
   to become one of the most profitable ventures in film history,
   continuing to build on a sturdy base left by prior flicks ALADDIN and
   BEAUTY AND THE BEAST.  Since then, though, Disney's animated features
   have shown an unbroken string of diminishing returns, with
   POCAHONTAS, THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME, and this year's HERCULES
   successively proving less and less potent.  With the once
   seemingly-impregnable Disney stranglehold on the market share
   suddenly looking mighty vulnerable, and faced with their first
   serious competition in the animated film market from Fox's ANASTASIA,
   Disney has brought Xmas home early by dusting off the feature which
   sparked the modern revival of feature animation, THE LITTLE MERMAID.
   While the animation for the film is, as is typically the case for
   Disney films, unquestionably top-notch, the magic in THE LITTLE
   MERMAID is not its animation, but the wonderful innocence of its
   story and its rousingly superb music.  The film's storyline is
   fairly straightforward -- young teen falls for handsome man, father
   disapproves and assigns hapless chaperone to his daughter, teen
   disobeys father and goes to desperate lengths to win her man --
   except in this case, the chaperone is a crab, the teen is a young
   mermaid, and the object of her desire is a human prince.  What makes
   THE LITTLE MERMAID so affecting and so emotionally resonant is the
   richness and charm of its characters and the sheer clarity and honest
   simplicity of their emotions.  From the moment mermaid Ariel lays her
   eyes on Prince Eric, she's resolutely smitten, and she's such a pure
   and endearing character that one can't help but invest their heart
   with her.  This simple but touching love story, coupled with a
   healthy dose of smart humour, makes THE LITTLE MERMAID a remarkably
   captivating picture.
   One of the interesting things about THE LITTLE MERMAID is something
   which now curiously dates it: the voices cast for its motley crew of
   characters.  This film was produced just before the distracting
   concept of using celebrity voices became in vogue, which started to a
   certain degree with BEAUTY AND THE BEAST and was irrevocably
   exacerbated by Robin Williams' much-heralded turn in ALADDIN; by the
   release of THE LION KING and henceforth, the majority of characters
   in the animated films were voiced by celebrities.  While it's
   understandable that animated features lacking the name-recognition or
   drawing power of Disney (say, BALTO's use of Kevin Bacon and Bridget
   Fonda, or even ANASTASIA's showcasing of Meg Ryan and John Cusack)
   would be forced to turn to this strategy in order to hype their
   products, it's unfortunate that even Disney has embraced this policy.
   Do we really need to hear, say, Demi Moore as Esmerelda in THE
   HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME?  Is the film's entertainment value really
   augmented by hearing a recognizable voice, rather than a voice which
   best suits the role?  (I'm not exactly on the edge of my seat for
   Eddie Murphy in the upcoming MULAN.)
   Fortunately, the performers who voice the characters in THE LITTLE
   MERMAID, although perhaps more obscure, are impeccably cast.  Chief
   among them is Jodi Benson, a 1992 Tony nominee for her stage work in
   CRAZY FOR YOU, who voices the film's heroine Ariel to perfection;
   with a wonderfully expressive speaking voice full of youthful vigor,
   and gorgeous singing voice, Ms. Benson provides a most engaging
   anchor for the film.  (She's the only reason I'd even consider
   catching FLUBBER.)  Similarly, Samuel E. Wright is terrific in the
   showy role of Sebastian, the weary guardian crab.  He easily milks
   his lovable character's comic moments for all they're worth, and his
   rendering of two of THE LITTLE MERMAID's big tunes -- "Under The Sea"
   and "Kiss The Girl" -- have become the stuff of legend.  Pat Carrol
   is deliciously villainous and vampy as the evil sea-witch Ursula,
   while Kenneth Mars' booming voice conveys the stern yet affectionate
   authority of Ariel's father, King Triton.  In large roles and small
   (Edie McClurg as dotting busybody Carlotta is ideal, and Rene
   Auberjonois has great fun with his exuberant French chef), THE LITTLE
   MERMAID is impeccably cast.
   Of course, THE LITTLE MERMAID will probably be best remembered for
   its remarkable collection of songs composed by the songwriting team
   of Alan Menken (music) and Howard Ashman (lyrics), who had created
   LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS and would go on to compose BEAUTY AND THE
   BEAST and ALADDIN for Disney before Mr. Ashman's untimely death.  Not
   only are Mr. Menken's tunes unbearably catchy, but Mr. Ashman's
   charming lyrics are fully integrated into the film's storyline so
   that the songs are a virtual extension of the character's dialogue,
   and consequently work wonderfully within the context of the film.
   Mr. Menken's score for the film is equally top-notch; the sequence
   where Eric (voiced by Christopher Daniel Barnes) and Ariel tour his
   kingdom in a horse-drawn carriage becomes magical and wondrous with
   Mr. Menken's fine score.
   It appears that most people prefer the delightfully colourful
   production number for the calypso-styled "Under The Sea" as joyfully
   crooned by Mr. Wright, which won the Academy Award and Golden Globe
   Awards for Best Song -- indeed, one of the many little joys in
   screening the film during its re-release was listening to children
   scattered throughout the audience singing along with the tune -- but
   my favourite is Ms. Benson's heartfelt rendition of the ballad "Part
   Of Your World", an achingly beautiful tune of yearning and hope
   (wonderfully lyricized by Mr. Ashman) which, accompanied by the
   film's most dazzlingly polished animation sequence, packs an
   emotional wallop which literally brought tears to my eyes.  During
   the song's reprise, which builds to a crescendo with Ariel arching on
   a rock as a wave crashes in, the cumulative effect is nothing short
   of breathtaking, and one becomes acutely aware that this single
   instance is one of the finest in animation history.
   As of this writing, November 1997 has come to an end, as has Disney's
   limited 17-day re-release of THE LITTLE MERMAID.  There's no question
   that the primary motivation for, if not the film's reissue itself, at
   least its timing, was to reinforce Disney's dominance in the
   animation market and provide direct competition to Fox's costly new
   upstart animation division and their first major venture, ANASTASIA.
   In every respect, the re-release of THE LITTLE MERMAID appears to be
   a success -- the film's 1997 grosses have pushed its cumulative
   domestic gross over the magic $100 million mark; THE LITTLE MERMAID
   proved to have remarkably strong drawing power for a film initially
   released only eight years ago and in many homes on video, pulling in
   close to $10 million in its opening weekend; and although nobody
   could possibly expect THE LITTLE MERMAID to possibly defeat the
   aggressively-marketed ANASTASIA in head-to-head competition, it
   siphoned enough from the Fox film's opening weekend totals to keep
   ANASTASIA from the coveted weekend leader spot, allowing for Disney's
   odious FLUBBER to sweep in on the subsequent week and wrestle the
   family demographic market share away.
   But although Disney's motives in the reissue of THE LITTLE MERMAID
   were self-serving and protectionist, the real winner is the public.
   Any reason to put this film back into theatres is a good one, and
   it's a true joy to see this heartwarming gem back on the silver
   screen.  THE LITTLE MERMAID is the best film to come out of the
   Disney's modern animation renaissance, and one of the greatest
   animated films ever made.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Don't leave this girl alone with any handsome deaf-mutes Marty, that's my
 advice to you." - Parker Posey, THE HOUSE OF YES

Title
Review for Swept from the Sea (1997)
SWEPT FROM THE SEA (TriStar - 1997)
Starring Vincent Perez, Rachel Weisz, Ian McKellen, Joss Ackland,
  Kathy Bates
Screenplay by Tim Willocks, inspired by the short story "Amy Foster"
  by Joseph Conrad
Produced by Polly Tapson, Charles Steel, Beeban Kidron
Directed by Beeban Kidron
Running time: 115 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
Joseph Conrad's greatest contribution to cinema will undoubtedly be
his novel "Heart Of Darkness", crafted by Francis Ford Coppola into
the visionary landmark masterpiece APOCALYPSE NOW.  At long last, his
works are currently undergoing a mild cinematic revival -- last year
saw his novel "The Secret Agent", filmed earlier by Alfred Hitchcock
as SABOTAGE, make a return to the screen as Christopher Hampton's
sophomore directorial effort, and 1997 brings about a big-budget
adaptation of his novella "Amy Foster" to the silver screen, retitled
as SWEPT FROM THE SEA and helmed by Beeban Kidron.
It's understandable that the filmmakers chose to go with the title of
SWEPT BY THE SEA for their period romance over the film's original
shooting title, which retained the title of the original source --
not only is it a literal description of the early pivotal moment
which sets the film in motion, but it's inherently more cinematic and
has a greater echo of lush romanticism than the rather staid and
mannered tone implied by "Amy Foster".  The film is in any case more
intently focused upon Yanko Gooral (Vincent Perez), the solitary
survivor of a Ukrainian shipwreck who washes ashore by the rural
Cornish village of Colebrook, than it is interested in Amy Foster
(Rachel Weisz), whose premarital conception has rendered her an
outcast in said village, and whose use of silence as a defense
mechanism is perceived by townsfolk as evidence of simplemindedness.
It's a good thing that Yanko is the central character of the film,
for in SWEPT BY THE SEA, Amy Foster is a dullard -- bland and
uninteresting.
It doesn't help matters that Ms. Weisz is astonishingly flat and
lifeless in the female lead role.  Amy Foster is a character who
shields her passions behind a wall of cold remoteness, but Ms.
Weisz's performance in the majority of the film is simply
expressionless, with a mild hint of irritability; there is no
indication of any sort of restraint on the part of her character or
any sense of inner turmoil, while her handful of emotionally volatile
scenes are ineffective and lack credibility.
Ms. Weisz's performance is *so* awkward that it saps the life out of
the standard-issue romance between Yanko and Amy, and actually begins
to get in the way of the more interesting and better-developed
relationship between Yanko and Dr. Kennedy (Ian McKellen), the kindly
gentleman who first recognizes Yanko's intelligence and becomes his
mentor.  Given that SWEPT FROM THE SEA is positioned as a romantic
epic, this is near-disasterous -- one would like to hope that the
romantic relationship might be the interesting one in the film,
rather than a cumbersome nuisance.
The friendship between Dr. Kennedy and Yanko, though a familiar
retread, is nicely portrayed with a sense of warmth and compassion.
Mr. McKellen is typically strong, subtly introducing some conflict
and complexity into an otherwise saintly character, while Mr. Perez
turns in a capable performance as the ridiculously good-natured
outsider with only modest aspirations who is nonetheless subjected to
relentless xenophobic malevolence by the villagers.  SWEPT FROM THE
SEA clearly attempts to address the theme of persecution -- both of
the leads are outcasts, brought together by small acts of kindness
and compassion rarely found elsewhere in their daily existence -- but
it's handled rather heavy-handedly, and the film starts to become
increasingly absurd with Yanko's continued attempts to integrate
himself into the Cornish society by coming across as innocuous,
gamely putting forth a brave face and flashing a goofy, bizarrely
sheepish grin in the face of such loathing and hatred.
Tim Willocks' screenplay draws out the characters in SWEPT FROM THE
SEA in extremely broad strokes, with none of the characters remotely
enigmatic in their intentions or disposition.  As in most unabashedly
romantic and gushingly melodramatic films, the shallowly-depicted
characters neatly fall into one of two camps: heroic and sympathetic,
or eminently hissable, and while easily identifiable heroes and
villains are a staple for the genre, there is little excuse for Mr.
Willocks' lame, uneven plotting. The film completely lacks the
cathartic dramatic punch with Amy's redeeming acts during the
climactic third act that is sorely needed -- granted, Ms. Weisz's
unempathic performance doesn't help either -- and employs devices
throughout the film which are clearly intended to be cute or magical,
such as the scenes of Dr. Kennedy's introduction to Yanko's
chess-playing abilities and Amy's secret hideaway, but merely come
off as silly or goofy.  An early scene in SWEPT BY THE SEA is
particularly ineffective; while intended as a tender moment between
Amy and Yanko as the outsiders first meet, neither of the characters
have been sufficiently drawn out at this point for the audience to
have any vested interest in their fates, and consequently the
sequence loses its power and appears excessively cliched and
melodramatic.
Technically, SWEPT FROM THE SEA is a handsome film.  The sound work
by George Richards is superb, particularly in the shipwreck sequence
and the storm sequence, while Dick Pope's cinematography is crisp,
sharp, and striking.  However, John Barry's bleating score becomes
rather tiresome and doesn't meld well with the film.
What is perhaps most striking about SWEPT FROM THE SEA is its utter
conviction in its material; the film is terribly earnest, and plays
with complete sincerity.  While the plot of the film is familiar and
the romance is squandered, resulting in a historical saga which is at
best mediocre, it is the film's complete faith in the ardour and
fascination of its story which succeeds in sustaining viewer
interest.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Man, that was a big spider.  It was so big I thought I saw a small dog
 caught in its web.  We are talking big.  That spider could've kicked
 Charlotte's ass." - Hope Davis, THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
THE OPPOSITE OF SEX (Sony Pictures Classics - 1998)
Starring Christina Ricci, Martin Donovan, Lisa Kudrow, Lyle Lovett,
  Johnny Galecki, William Lee Scott, Ivan Sergei
Screenplay by Don Roos
Produced by David Kirkpatrick, Michael Besman
Directed by Don Roos
Running time: 105 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Several months ago, I received a note from one of my movie sage
   friends advising me to keep an eye out for Don Roos' feature film
   debut, THE OPPOSITE OF SEX.  "It's your type of film," he cryptically
   advised without elaborating further, leaving me to wonder exactly
   what this comment implied about the film, and moreover, about my
   perceived tastes in general.  As the film completed its festival
   circuit and began to roll out in limited release, I solicited further
   opinions from trusted friends in New York and Los Angeles, who all
   agreed it was a worthwhile watch.
   So I found myself settling expectantly into a theatre seat at a
   recent screening of the film, and it didn't take long -- oh, about
   five minutes -- for me to see their point: I relished the wicked
   black comedy that opened THE OPPOSITE OF SEX, which sees our lead
   character preparing for a somber funeral appearance by tweaking at
   her nipples through the fabric of her dress, followed by paying her
   final respects to the deceased by tossing her lit cigarette, rocks,
   and everything else on hand at the lowered casket.
   Our lead character is Dedee Truitt (a blonde Christina Ricci), the
   most deliciously vile antiheroine in an American film since Laura
   Dern's title character in Alexander Payne's CITIZEN RUTH.  This
   cheerfully nasty sixteen-year old doubles as both protagonist and
   self-conscious narrator (her knowing voice-overs freely admit she's
   aware that she's in a movie), and after trashing her late
   stepfather's funeral, Dedee runs away from her Louisiana home to
   impose herself on her estranged, much-older half-brother Bill (Martin
   Donovan), who leads an unassuming life as a schoolteacher.  Bill,
   who's the sort of low-key person that checks rude washroom graffiti
   for grammatical errors, is openly gay (or "homo", as Dedee puts it),
   and lives with a handsome young man named Matt (Ivan Sergei) in a
   spacious house left by Bill's previous companion, Tom (or "the dead
   guy", as Dedee puts it -- yup, she's a little sweetheart), who passed
   away from AIDS.  Tom's spinster sister, Lucia (Lisa Kudrow), who
   obviously carries a torch for Bill, teaches at the same school and
   frequently drops in on the proceedings.  Surely enough, Dedee soon
   wreaks havoc in this sleepy Indiana suburb by bullying the
   simple-minded Matt into bedding her, announcing her pregnancy, and
   promptly absconding with Bill's life savings, Matt, and Tom's ashes,
   sending Bill and Lucia in hot pursuit.
   Mr. Roos, a veteran screenwriter whose credits feature strong female
   characters in films such as SINGLE WHITE FEMALE (Bridget Fonda and
   Jennifer Jason Leigh), LOVE FIELD (Michelle Pfeiffer's
   Oscar-nominated turn), and BOYS ON THE SIDE (Drew Barrymore, Whoopi
   Goldberg and Mary-Louis Parker), predictably has a sure hand with his
   fascinating female characters in his directorial debut, but the
   film's sketchier male characters are much less interesting.  Dedee is
   a wonderfully awful creature -- the film suffers during the often
   too-long periods when she's offscreen -- and Lucia is imbued with an
   observant, lashing tongue and a semblance of actual character
   complexity; none of the men are nearly as compelling.
   The great strength of THE OPPOSITE OF SEX are the terrific nasty
   one-liners which freely zing back and forth, mostly from the mouths
   of its two major female characters, although everybody gets into the
   act to some degree.  The film's screenplay doesn't play it safe; it
   offends with utter abandon, and many of the barbs are such
   perfectly-timed, wicked little gems that one gets the feeling that
   Mr. Roos has been accumulating these clever rejoinders and memorable
   witticisms for just the opportune occasion.  Many of the lines are
   so funny that it comes as a bit of a shame that the film's plot isn't
   as sharp, particularly the final third which lacks the flair and bite
   of the opening reels and builds to a conclusion which seems unearned.
   The film is at its best during its opening half, unspooling as an
   acerbic, pitch black comic romp.
   Gleefully rotten, unapologetically rude and self-absorbed, moonfaced
   Ms. Ricci has already assembled a sizable list of similarly sarcastic
   characters in her filmography, and she's perfectly cast here in the
   showy role of bitchy sexpot Dedee.  Also impressive is Ms. Kudrow,
   who continues to emerge as an interesting actress and demonstrates
   great comic timing in a more deadpan role.  Her feature film
   performances over the past few years has been consistently more
   unique and skilled than any of her FRIENDS castmates.
   One of the more interesting aspects of THE OPPOSITE OF SEX is its
   propensity to deconstruct itself via Dedee's cynical, mocking
   narration.  "If you think I'm just plucky and scrappy and all I need
   is love, you're in over your head," she warns at the outset.  It's an
   odd narrative approach which, while occasionally grating, is often
   refreshing.  Consider her voice-over accompanying the film's
   obligatory Sad Montage, which invariably takes place at about the
   midpoint of a given movie, and in this case features a forlorn Bill
   mournfully brooding, stopping only to wistfully sniff at his lover's
   T-shirt.  Traditionally hokey stuff, to be sure -- but as Dedee
   points out, it's better than showing Bill paying his bills.

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
CONSPIRACY THEORY (Warner Bros. - 1997)
Starring Mel Gibson, Julia Roberts, Patrick Stewart, Cylk Cozart
Screenplay by Brian Helgeland
Produced by Joel Silver, Richard Donner
Directed by Richard Donner
Running time: 135 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
Brian Helgeland is currently one of the Hollywood's hottest properties.
Formerly known primarily for screenwriting the horror film 976-EVIL and
for taking over writing duties from the Wachowski Brothers (themselves no
longer to be trifled with after the industry notice and critical acclaim
for their film BOUND) for Richard Donner's ASSASSINS, Mr. Helgeland has
sinced churned out screenplays for Curtis Hanson's L.A. CONFIDENTIAL,
scheduled for imminent release as of this writing, and for the
post-apocalyptic thriller THE POSTMAN as a vehicle for Kevin Costner.
Mr. Helgeland's own directorial debut, the thriller PARKER, is scheduled
for release next year, and features no less of a star than the top A-list
Mel Gibson in the lead; it is perhaps indicative of just how successful
he has become that Mr. Helgeland is being called upon to deliver the
screenplay for the highly-anticipated fourth film in the LETHAL WEAPON
series.  The pivotal film in Mr. Helgeland's resume? -- he wrote the
screenplay for CONSPIRACY THEORY, and based upon the projects with which
his name is now being associated, one might expect a stellar, original
and inventive screenplay for the film which resulted in his career
ascention.  To some extent, he delivers -- CONSPIRACY THEORY has a
dynamite premise.  Unfortunately, that's about the only thing the film
has going for it: after the film lays down the tracks for a truly
original film with a promising setup, it promptly sinks into
uncompelling, slightly inane generic formulaism.
Have you heard a good conspiracy theory lately? Jerry Fletcher has a
thousand of them.  From the real cause of the Vietnam War (a bet between
Howard Hughes and Aristotle Onassis) to solemn cautions about the black
helicopters constantly hovering overhead (they're on whisper mode), New
York taxi driver Jerry (Mel Gibson) has a theory on just about
everything, and he cheerfully prattles on about his paranoid ideas to his
captive backseat audiences.  When they're not nervously twitching,
shifting back and forth, Jerry has his eyes lovingly focused on Justice
Department agent Alice Sutton (Julia Roberts), and when he's not gazing
through binoculars into her apartment during evenings or causing
commotions by bursting into her workplace by day, he formulates new
conspiracy theories by leafing through stacks of newspapers and archiving
his latest wild notions into a self-published newsletter (circulation:
five), "Conspiracy Theory".  One of the theories in his latest newsletter
seems to have struck a nerve; Jerry is snatched off the street in broad
daylight by an anonymous group led by Dr. Jonas (Patrick Stewart), and
taken to a secret location where he is forcefully interrogated (in a
manner which attempts to be evocative of Stanley Kubrick's A CLOCKWORK
ORANGE) about whom might be familiar with his theory, which presumably
has some actual basis in fact.  Jerry manages to pull off an unlikely
escape, but is left wounded, on the run, and wondering *which one* of his
theories is the cause for his persecution.
CONSPIRACY THEORY has a good setup with an terrific premise, and has the
potential for great intrigue, but sadly the film *is not* interested in
conspiracies at all -- what the film *is* interested in is chase scenes.
The film could have latched onto its promised premise and had, say,
Jerry backtrack through all of his assorted zany conjectures in order to
attempt to determine why he's the subject of this intense, lethal
manhunt, or at least do *something* vaguely interesting, but instead
CONSPIRACY THEORY slides into conventional pursuit thriller
mechanizations.  Virtually every unimaginative convention of the genre
appears at some point in the film: in a cat-and-mouse game, Hero
demonstrates his wily nature by outsmarting an attempted capture by
Villain; Hero has to turn to dubious and reluctant Heroine for refuge
while trying to avoid capture; initially-skeptical Heroine begins to
truly realize the grave danger that Hero (and by association, Heroine
herself) now faces; the requisite highly-destructive storming of an
abode by a ruthless heavily-armed armada which Our Heros escape by the
skin of their teeth; the car chases; the planting of seeds of doubt into
the mind of Heroine; gunbattles; cool, sinister pronouncements by
Villain; many scenes of Hero and Heroine fleeing, hand in hand, into the
night; and, of course, the most predictable -- Hero and Heroine fall in
love.
Wasted in the proceedings is a fine, jittery manic performance by
Mr. Gibson -- he is well-known for this sort of performance, often
playing wild-eyed characters such as his famous Martin Riggs role in
the LETHAL WEAPON series, but what is notable about Mr. Gibson's work in
CONSPIRACY THEORY is how distinctly eccentric and atypically unempathetic
his depiction of Jerry is (at least in the first quarter of the film);
his creation is a fascinating genuine curiosity at which to be gawked,
not merely a lovable kook (which he unfortunately becomes in the film's
final three-quarters).  Carter Burwell's big, brassy score is notable;
while I do not think that it coalesces particularly well with the tone
of the film (what that there is), it is inventive and cheery, and gives
the interesting opening title sequence additional energy.
CONSPIRACY THEORY is a frustrating viewing experience: to dangle the
promise of an engaging and original story before us and then dash it
away with generic action (and rather *unaccomplished, poorly-handled*
action, at that) is an unnecessary miscalculation.  In terms of
filmwatching, there is little more painful than seeing a potentially
strong film suddenly turn woefully feeble.  In CONSPIRACY THEORY, the
screech of just such a turn can be heard in the scene when Jerry's
wheelchair tumbles down the final flight of stairs.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Let's hurt somebody." - Aaron Eckhart, IN THE COMPANY OF MEN

Title
Review for Curdled (1996)
(Miramax - 1996)
Starring William Baldwin, Angela Jones, Bruce Ramsay, Mel Gorham, Lois
   Chiles, Daisy Fuentes, Barry Corbin
Screenplay by John Maass & Reb Braddock
Produced by John Maass and Raul Puig
Directed by Reb Braddock
Running time: 94 minutes
CURDLED is a deliciously dark and witty black comedy, but its
humour won't appeal to everyone.  To be specific, let me give
you an example.  Do you know in PULP FICTION where Jules and
Vincent go on brain detail after Marvin and his head accidentally
get separated?  If you thought that was completely tasteless and
unfunny, don't see CURDLED.
On the other hand, if you found that sequence to be pretty funny,
you have the sense of humour that CURDLED is aimed at.
Our film's heroine, Gabriela, played by Angela Jones, is a woman
obssessively curious about murder and serial killers; she even
keeps a scrapbook of news articles.  Luckily for her, Miami is
being plagued by a serial killer rampage - her scrapbook is getting
pretty big.
The killer's nickname in the press is The Blue Blood Killer, because
he preys on older rich socialite women, and he's played by William
Baldwin (this is not a spoiler).  One particularly striking M.O. on
the Blue Blood Killer is his propensity to decapitate his victims.
Gabriela is watching television one day when she spots an
advertisement for a firm whose line of work is perfectly attuned
to her interests.  She immediately quits her job, and signs on
with PFCS, which stands for Post-Forensic Cleaning Service.  No
points for guessing what they do.
Her workmates are confused by Gabriela's fascination with murder;
to them, it's just a day job.  There's a hilarious locker room
scene where they debate whether decapitated heads can talk, and
what they would say.  Gabriela's partner, Elena, played by Mel
Gorham, is particularly perturbed by Gabriela's wide-eyed fascination,
and becomes really upset when Gabriela volunteers them to clean up
The Blue Blood Killer's latest scene - they're the messiest, you see.
Unbeknownst to them, the last victim left something on the scene which
would ID The Blue Blood Killer, so he's also heading over there..
The comparison to PULP FICTION earlier on was not accidental -
Quentin Tarantino executive-produced this film, which began life
as a short film he saw at a film festival.  Apparently Tarantino
was so impressed that he helped Braddock convert this into a
feature-length film.
There are other parallels - the star of CURDLED is Angela Jones
(the top billing goes to William Baldwin, but really, Jones is
the central character), who's probably best known for her role as
Esmerelda Villalobos, the death-obssessed taxi driver in PULP FICTION.
That role was written specifically for Jones based upon her similar
character in the aforementioned short film, CURDLED JR.
Jones is great in CURDLED - she's wonderfully funny and maintains
an amusing wide-eyed naive curiousity about murder without compromising
her character's innocence or likeability.  She can express so much
with one lift of her eyebrow.  It's a great performance.
Reb Braddock's direction is extremely sharp and clever, toeing the
line between black humour and bad taste.  The best scene in the
film is an outrageously funny sequence involves Jones and dancing
- any more than that would be a spoiler.  The opening credit sequence
is also inventive and amusing.  Of course, it's impossible to really
take this stuff seriously, but then again you're not really supposed
to - Braddock knows the audience is in on the joke, and makes it a
fun little romp as a result.
The one drawback of CURDLED is that it was based on a short film, and
it feels like it; the material is just stretched too thin in order to
fulfill a feature length running time, and some parts just seem to drag.
While its running time is already a short 94 minutes, it could really
stand to lose twenty minutes or so to give it better pacing.
CURDLED seems destined to be a nice cult film for Miramax.  It'll be
interesting to see if it will appeal to mainstream audiences as well.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
ARMAGEDDON (Touchstone - 1998)
Starring Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck,
  Will Patton
Screenplay by Jonathan Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams
Produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Anne Hurd, Michael Bay
Directed by Michael Bay
Running time: 150 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   From the outset, it's impossible to take the latest Earth-in-peril
   summer flick, ARMAGEDDON, very seriously.  The newest
   testosterone-ladened conflagration from the team of director Michael
   Bay and producer Jerry Bruckheimer, this is a film which suggests
   that when confronted by a Texas-sized asteroid headed on a
   collision-course with the planet, NASA has The Right Stuff to launch
   an emergency space shuttle mission within two weeks and slingshot two
   spacecraft around the moon in order to intercept the massive
   interloper hurtling through the heavens at 22,000 mph, but is utterly
   helpless when it comes to simply digging a hole in the rock where a
   nuke will be dropped to hopefully divert the impending calamity.
   To that ends, a civilian team of crack deep-core drillers led by
   roughneck Harry S. Stamper (Bruce Willis) is hurriedly brought on
   board by stoical NASA director Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) for
   an extended weightlessness-training cram session in order to be shot
   shot into space and, of course, Save The World.  Along the way,
   legendary gems such as "Hang on!", "It's gonna blow!", "I've never
   missed a depth that I've aimed for, and by God, I'm not going to
   start now!", and of course, the venerable "Blue wire or red wire?"
   are uttered.  There's even an impromptu rendition of "Leaving On A
   Jet Plane".  Who could ask for more?  Get in line.
   "Do you think that somewhere in this world two people are doing the
   exact same thing that we're doing?" coos Harry's precious daughter,
   the doe-eyed Grace (Liv Tyler), to her hotshot oil driller beau A.J.
   (Ben Affleck) in the film's requisite (and hopelessly hokey) romantic
   subplot.  "I hope so," he responds with an admirably straight face.
   "Or what the hell are we trying to save?"  The question certainly
   comes to mind during the film's first half which introduces us to
   the assorted miscreants that make up our dubious heroes.  Presumably
   acting as counterpoint to the intellectual NASA staff, Harry's team
   is an ultra-blue collar collection of ragtag misfits that one can't
   help but liken to the CON AIR convicts -- and like that previous
   Bruckheimer-produced vehicle, each member of the drilling team is
   solely distinguished by a characteristic idiosyncrasy: Rockhound
   (Steve Buscemi) has a thing for buxom babes, Chick (Will Patton)
   wants to win back his son, and so forth.  Early exposition (opening
   with a brutal piece of would-be slapstick involving a gun-toting
   Harry chasing A.J. around an oil rig) succeeds in making this crew of
   ruffians about as endearing as the stormchasers from TWISTER -- which
   is to say that I found myself hoping the incoming "global killer"
   asteroid would smack them down first.  If these Dudes With Attitudes
   weren't already distasteful enough, when their expertise is called
   upon to prevent global annihilation, the film finds them negotiating
   for fringe benefits and incentives.  Welcome to heroism, 1990s-style.
   Make no mistake, inspirational heroism is what this effects-filled
   action film is intended to be all about, complete with at least two
   clips of our entire group of spacesuit-clad world-savers purposely
   striding towards the camera in slow motion as Trevor Rabin's
   ennobling score blares in the background.  Mr. Bay seems especially
   fond of the low-angle shot, employed liberally throughout ARMAGEDDON
   to lend stature and an imposing quality towards his subjects, but his
   rapid cutting style, already unnecessarily excessive in THE ROCK,
   seems completely out of control here.  There are countless points
   during the film's frenetic action sequences where one is at a loss
   as to exactly where certain characters are relative to others and so
   forth.  (The incoherent space station sequence is particularly
   problematic.)  The entire 150-minute film is assembled out of short
   edits which seem to run no more than a few seconds on average; I'd be
   very surprised if there are more than a handful of shots which run
   for more than twenty seconds.  The net visual effect is not quite
   enough to generate an epileptic reaction, although the threat looms
   everpresent.
   From start to finish, ARMAGEDDON is such a carefully crafted product
   abiding by bold jingoistic patriotism conventions that its biggest
   surprise comes from the list of top screenwriters (credited and
   uncredited) assembled to provide the film's backbone.  Ace Hollywood
   writers such as Jonathan Hensleigh, Tony Gilroy, Paul Attanasio (QUIZ
   SHOW, DONNIE BRASCO, ARMAGEDDON -- something looks ... out of place
   here), Ann Biderman, Scott Rosenberg (whom I can envision gleefully
   penning many of Rockhound's one-liners) and Robert Towne presumably
   picked up nice paycheques for their respective contributions to this
   by-the-numbers screenplay, but realistically any shades of subtlety
   present from the cast or script alike are utterly obliterated by the
   wildly overstated and calculated manner in which Mr. Bay presents
   each scenario.  This is the sort of film where it's not enough to
   simply have Grace weeping as her father's space-originated
   transmission cuts off; it has to have her weeping at a wall of
   monitors busily airing static as the camera slowly dollies out and
   maudlin music provides background ambiance.
   If the film is skimping on original ideas and appealing heroes, it
   does provide a lot of spectacle for two-and-a-half hours.  A meteor
   shower in the opening reel supplies plentiful destruction and mayhem
   in New York, and ARMAGEDDON becomes a dizzying series of incessant
   explosions, action and stunts once the gang goes spacebound.  In this
   respect, the film distinguishes itself from the schmaltzy treacliness
   of DEEP IMPACT, the DreamWorks / Paramount film which beat it to the
   North American market by two months -- eschewing its predecessor's
   sensitive approach, this is an action film through and through.  It's
   not an entirely unsuccessful diversion, full of energy and providing
   enough visceral stimuli to rival any music video, but in terms of
   genuine drama and suspense, ARMAGEDDON is remarkably hollow.

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
OFFICE SPACE (Fox - 1999)
Cast: Ron Livingston, Jennifer Aniston, David Herman, Ajay Naidu,
      Diedrich Bader, Stephen Root, Gary Cole
Screenplay by Mike Judge
Produced by Michael Rotenberg and Daniel Rappaport
Directed by Mike Judge
Running time: 89 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   In a marketplace where spectacle and thrills-per-minute appears to be
   the measure of audience appeal rather than coherent plotting, Mike
   Judge's live-action feature debut OFFICE SPACE makes for an unusual
   counterpoint: here's a picture which should've disposed with a story
   altogether and concentrated on stringing together bits of incidental
   humour.  Anyone who's had their spirit crushed by a day job should
   relish the film's comically-accurate depiction of the insanity that
   is office work, but after a promising opening, this occupational
   comedy begins to lose its appeal the moment its unwelcome storyline
   spins into motion.
   In not-quite-a-spoof of Fellini's 8 1/2, we're introduced to our
   heroes caught in the middle of a traffic jam.  Immediately
   establishing the aggravation of the typical workday, in rapid
   succession we meet Peter (Ron Livingston) and his anxious sidekicks
   Samir (Ajay Naidu) and Michael Bolton (David Herman), who are
   discontent drones toiling at the nondescript software company Initech
   under the command of the wonderfully insincere manager Bill Lumbergh
   (Gary Cole) and alongside such bizarre eccentrics as the blubbering
   Milton (Stephen Root), who whimpers incessantly and protectively
   guards his stapler with a vigor.  The trio hate their jobs but can't
   afford to lose them, especially with the threat of downsizing on
   their way, and a miserable Peter winds up pleading for solace from
   an "occupational hypnotherapist" -- "Every day since I started
   working, each day has been worse than the last, so when you see me,
   I'm having the worst day of my life ... is there some way you can
   just zonk me out?"  Lo and behold, Peter finds himself the recipient
   of a BULWORTHian transformation from trod-upon office peon to a
   cheerfully candid cubicle jockey who's blissfully unconcerned about
   job security and nonchalantly neglects his duties.
   The skewering of the workplace, while not particularly groundbreaking
   in the wake of the Dilbert phenomenon, is nonetheless effective and
   often very amusing in OFFICE SPACE, and the film's observational
   humour is its strength, keying in on the countless little
   frustrations and irritants regularly encountered at the office which
   amass over time into soul-deadening, sanity-threatening agony.
   Office drudges will undoubtedly feel both a sense of deja vu and
   kinship at the depiction of familiar workplace experiences gleefully
   sent-up (without being overexaggerated for comic effect, which is
   perhaps the frightening part), and what's special is that Mr. Judge
   is able to capture the latent anger festering alongside the
   exasperation and hopelessness without diminishing the humour.
   Whether it's Samir's pent-up rage exploding at regular intervals,
   Milton's meek mumbling "I could ... set the building on fire," or, in
   the piece's showcase sequence, the trashing of a piece of office
   equipment (amusingly shot as a gangsta rap video, complete with
   mock-posturing and swagger), which injects a disturbing note in its
   mirth through the destructive zeal of the participants, it's
   unmistakable that these cubicle prisoners are on the edge between
   frustration and fury, ready to either curl into a whimpering ball or
   lash out.
   The film gets so many of the little details right that at times it
   prompts disturbing flashbacks.  From the serpentine conviviality of
   manager Bill Lumbergh sidling up with a disinterested, drawn-out
   "Yeah ... so ... what's happening?" to the mind-bending chirpiness of
   the secretary inevitably within earshot to the
   where-did-they-find-this-guy of nebbish Milton, the picture adeptly
   captures the absurdity of office life.  (I was hoping that the film
   would fire a zinger at one of my pet peeves -- the manager-type who
   cracks stupendously unfunny jokes and the brown-nosers who dutifully
   guffaw at them as if new heights of hilarity had been reached -- but
   no such luck.)
   It's when the picture attempts to veer off into an actual story that
   interest begins to wane.  A misguided and tired caper plot involving
   our sympathetic trio is introduced, while Peter begins to romance a
   waitress, Joanne (Jennifer Aniston).  The film is all too happy to
   explore blue-collar and white-collar workplace dissatisfaction alike
   -- she's given her own workplace woes: a fast-food manager (played by
   Mr. Judge himself under a pseudonym) who chastises her for not
   wearing enough "flair" on her uniform (she ought've solved this
   dilemma by wearing a button reading "Perfunctory Love Interest") --
   but it's a poor substitute for the occupational inanity of Initech.
   These subplots aren't completely devoid of laughs -- I enjoyed the
   scowling faces and hardcore rap on the soundtrack incongruously
   characterizing the trio of software engineers as bad-asses as they
   executed their lame Machiavellian scheme, and the perfect prop
   placement of a mug in one of Peter's nightmares about Joanne was
   uproarious -- but they're far less engaging and effective than the
   wry observational humour of the film's first half, and ultimately
   steer the picture towards a pat, unsatisfying conclusion.
   It's only logical for filmmakers to cast their comic gaze away from
   the overmined subject matter of dysfunctional families and towards
   the eclectic, disparate personalities which make up a workplace,
   especially given that an unhealthy proportion of one's life is
   consumed on the job.  Among recent features to zing this subject
   matter, OFFICE SPACE is more broad and certainly less subtle than
   Jill Sprecher's CLOCKWATCHERS (perhaps uncoincidentally, another
   picture whose appeal plummeted upon the unfurling of a plot), but
   also far more caustically incisive and enjoyable.  It's far too
   disposable and uneven to be considered an outright success -- the
   Great Workplace Comedy has yet to be made -- but it's a reasonably
   amusing diversion.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"X-FILES fans come up to me in malls expecting me to be able to fill them
 in on the whole conspiracy.  Half the time I have no idea what they're
 talking about." - Martin Landau

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
DEEP IMPACT (Paramount - 1998)
Starring Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
  Morgan Freeman, Maximilian Schell
Screenplay by Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael Tolkin
Produced by Richard D. Zanuck, David Brown
Directed by Mimi Leder
Running time: 120 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The act of self-sacrifice is one of the most affecting things that
   can be depicted in a film, and it's something that DEEP IMPACT
   incessantly attempts to exploit throughout its running time.
   Blatantly attempting to tug on the heartstrings of its audience, the
   film wallows in the selflessness of its characters' actions to such
   an extent that it ultimately chokes upon its own nobility.
   DEEP IMPACT is the first of 1998's aspiring major summer
   blockbusters, and a distinct one in that its focus is less on wanton
   destruction and more on characterization (no surprise when
   considering that its screenwriters are Bruce Joel Rubin and Michael
   Tolkin).  The film presents us with the scenario of a
   newly-discovered comet that's headed on a trajectory bringing it on a
   collision course with Earth, promising to destroy life as we know it,
   and then splinters off into three subplots: an enterprising young
   reporter, Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), embittered by her father's
   (Maximilian Schell) divorce of her mother (Vanessa Redgrave, wasted)
   and subsequent remarriage to a much younger woman; Leo Biederman
   (Elijah Wood), a high-school amateur astronomer who's the first to
   discover the comet (which consequently bears, in part, his name), and
   his sweetheart romance with neighbour Sarah (Leelee Sobieski); and a
   joint American-Russian space mission to intercept and destroy the
   interstellar threat, manned by cagey veteran Spurgeon Tanner (Robert
   Duvall) and a team of fresh-faced, media-savvy astronauts.  Tying
   these threads together is U.S. President Beck (Morgan Freeman), who
   appears intermittently in order to make grave televised announcements
   to the public and recap what's happened in the film if you stepped
   out for popcorn.
   While it's somewhat odd to find an effects-friendly scenario
   primarily driven by character dramatics rather than visual eye-candy,
   none of the three major vignettes are particularly compelling, and
   the treacly uplifting effect clearly desired by director Mimi Leder
   isn't achieved.  The story arcs for each of the threads are
   laboriously familiar, and there are so many scenes which involve our
   characters ignoring instincts of self-preservation in order to do the
   right thing that scenes of poignancy become increasingly ineffective.
   The weakest of the subplots is that of MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner,
   who inadvertently stumbles across the news of the comet while
   investigating another story; the whole ELE political intrigue angle
   of the film is misguided and plays as a desperate plot device to move
   the story ahead.  It doesn't help matters any that Ms. Leoni's
   performance is surprisingly lifeless -- she's perpetually
   shellshocked throughout the film, making her entire thread more
   distracting than engaging.  (A scene which calls upon her to
   drunkenly cackle at someone's innocuously oblivious comment that
   "life goes on" is wretched both in its conception and execution.)
   Hinging upon the audience's involvement with the tenuous relationship
   between Jenny and her estranged father in the face of impending
   catastrophe, this subplot falls well short.
   Similarly, there's much to be desired with Leo Biederman's story,
   which encapsulates the life-and-death drama of DEEP IMPACT.  While
   President Beck informs the American public that heroic astronauts
   have been sent to eradicate the comet threat, a backup plan is
   nearing completion.  A network of vast caves have been created to
   house one million Americans and ensure their survival for up to two
   years should the comet strike the planet; as well as a list of
   predesignated personnel, a national lottery, it is announced, will be
   held to select who will fill the shelters.  In reality, of course,
   this proclamation would wind up being tied up in the courts for years
   (the clause which deems those over 50 to be automatically excluded
   from the draw in particular is a real ageism stickler), but no matter
   -- this is the movies, where people are far more altruistic; those
   who fail to be picked and are essentially condemned to death mostly
   stand outside the cave base camps and look mildly irritated.
   Where DEEP IMPACT makes a bad step is when the young astronomer Leo,
   selected to go into the caves by virtue of his co-discovery of the
   comet, proposes to dreamgirl Sarah so that, as his wife, she'll also
   be given passage to the caves and be able to survive the impending
   disaster.  Backed by a gentle musical interlude, it's a scene that's
   clearly intended to be sweet and touching, but given her opposition
   to the idea, I thought it was surprisingly extortionistic, akin to
   declaring "Marry me or die."
   The film plays the Leo / Sarah subplot in hokey manner, wavering back
   and forth on whether or not she'll join him in the survival caves,
   and hits each note in predictable fashion; in a scene where Leo races
   around on motorcycle in desperate search of his beloved, there's one
   shot where he screeches his bike to a halt and tosses his head back
   to look over his shoulder as the music heroically crescendos which is
   such a familiar staple that it almost had me groaning aloud.
   Meanwhile, Spurgeon Tanner and the crew of spacecraft The Messiah are
   given some artificial conflict of their own to deal with in addition
   to disabling the lethal potential of the comet.  The young
   astronauts, led by Oren Monash (Ron Eldard), are resentful of
   Tanner's mere presence on the mission due to his age -- this is a
   young man's game, they believe.  It's a ridiculous plot angle used
   for no other discernable reason than to spice up the subplot -- is
   there *any* doubt that the wily veteran will win the respect of his
   crewmates? -- but Mr. Duvall and Mr. Eldard do what they can to give
   it a credible spin.  There's some obligatory space-bound suspense
   involving the astronauts navigating a dangerously-unstable comet
   surface, which is staged nicely but fails to surprise in its
   aftermath.
   The one performer which comes out best in the film (other than James
   Cromwell, whose participation is essentially that of a cameo) is Mr.
   Freeman.  The role is undemanding, but his sheer onscreen presence
   and the gravity with which he's able to convey his dialogue powers
   him through questionable material.  To a large degree, Mr. Freeman is
   effective because for the most part his character doesn't interact
   with any of the film's other characters at all, but directly
   addresses the audience; essentially isolated, it's as if he's in his
   own separate (and superior) film.
   While Ms. Leder depicts a world under siege, it's a shame that DEEP
   IMPACT chose to underplay the mass chaos and lawlessness that would
   legitimately accompany the advent of such a catastrophic event.  (The
   fact that the country has been placed under martial law is touched
   upon, but with the arrival of the end of the world, that would likely
   mean little.)  The film would be a much more visceral and provocative
   experience had it dared to show society coming apart at its seams, as
   in Steve De Jarnatt's MIRACLE MILE or in THE TWILIGHT ZONE's "The
   Shelter" episode.  There's also the questionable inclusion of a shot
   of the Capitol under reconstruction -- it's obviously intended to be
   uplifting and life-affirming, but it's an odd choice to make when one
   considers that the destruction of the White House was by far the most
   popular -- nay, the *centerpiece* -- visual effects shot for Roland
   Emmerich's blockbuster INDEPENDENCE DAY which left crowds cheering in
   glee.  Since audiences clearly enjoy seeing the landmarks of the
   American establishment being shredded, one wouldn't necessarily
   expect that their symbolic reconstruction would be a crowdpleaser.
   For some reason, the film includes an early sequence in which an
   astronomer is killed in an automobile accident while scrambling to
   get the word out on the approaching killer comet.  Since the impact
   of the incident is negligible -- the data ultimately does reach its
   intended parties -- and the character is never spoken of again, I'm
   left with the nagging suspicion that it was included primarily so
   that there'd be at least one explosion during the film's opening
   hour, but the scene laid the groundwork for something more
   potentially ironic; the world was left unprepared for the comet
   because the astronomer's mail server went down.  Yeah, I know that
   feeling.
   DEEP IMPACT is certainly more of a human drama than it is a disaster
   film (likely to the consternation of the audience drawn in by the
   promise of widespread destruction and mayhem) -- indeed, there's
   essentially only the single apocalyptic sequence which has been
   heavily featured in its promotional material -- and as a
   character-driven drama, it fails on that level.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
OCTOBER SKY (Universal - 1999)
Cast: Jake Gyllenhaal, Chris Cooper, Laura Dern, Chris Owen,
      William Lee Scott, Chad Lindberg, Natalie Canerday
Screenplay by Lewis Colick, based on the book "Rocket Boys" by
  Homer H. Hickam
Produced by Charles Gordon and Larry Franco
Directed by Joe Johnston
Running time: 108 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Judging by what made it to the screen in OCTOBER SKY, it quickly
   becomes clear why Universal greenlighted a film based on the memoir
   of NASA engineer Homer H. Hickam Jr. -- if we're to believe the
   events depicted in the picture, his story as an ambitious adolescent
   trapped in a dying West Virginia coal mining town plays exactly like
   a Hollywood movie.  Other than a few touches (I can envision studio
   executives pensively musing "Now, does he *have* to be named Homer
   Hickam?"), this tale of a teenager struggling against adversity
   adheres to the conventional inspirational drama formula so closely
   that the "Based On A True Story" opening title card seems as much of
   a shield against skepticism as it does a selling point.
   In today's market, this modest film feels like a throwback: an
   unabashedly earnest, clean-cut bit of storytelling which reveals its
   colours as surely as the movie's teacher will gently chide students
   mercilessly teasing the resident science kid by drawling "He's right,
   y'all."  Set in 1957 in the relatively-isolated town of Coalwood, the
   picture follows the story of Homer Hickam (Jake Gyllenhaal), a teen
   who becomes inspired by the launch of Russia's Sputnik satellite and
   starts to build his own rockets, enlisting the help of friends Roy
   Lee (William Lee Scott), O'Dell (Chad Lindberg), and math whiz
   Quentin (Chris Owen).  Coalwood is a mining town through and through,
   where the only visible means of escape is via a football scholarship
   like Homer's older brother Jim (Scott Miles); everybody else is
   relegated to an unpromising life down in the mines.  While Homer's
   dreams are buoyed by his supportive teacher Miss Riley (Laura Dern),
   who suggests that competing in the regional science fair may net
   college scholarships and a way out for the rocket boys, he's
   dissuaded and disparaged at every turn by his stern father John
   (Chris Cooper), who tidily happens to be the town's mine supervisor
   and considers Homer's ambitions to be foolhardy.
   While director Joe Johnston employs frequent usage of the easy
   contrast between Homer's skyward aspirations and the gloomy depths of
   the mine, he also diffuses the grimy claustrophobia of the depressed
   milieu with the old-fashioned wholesomeness of the community; this is
   a place where a girl can scamper up to our young hero, bat her eyes,
   and sigh "Golly, Homer, it sure was exciting watching your rockets go
   up!" without any ironic or tongue-in-cheek connotations.  If the
   period dress and liberal use of archetypes wasn't enough to remove
   any residual doubt of its aim to depict an ostensibly simpler, more
   innocent time, the film lazily establishes the era by deluging the
   soundtrack with wall-to-wall classic rock 'n' roll.  (A montage of
   comic misfires is unimaginatively set to "Ain't That A Shame?")
   Although the utterly pedestrian OCTOBER SKY is a textbook example of
   cookie-cutter filmmaking, there's nothing much to really fault with
   Mr. Johnston's workmanlike helming or the sincere, capable
   performance of young lead Mr. Gyllenhall, but it's all so generic
   that it's easy to resist.  The story's trajectory is so unwaveringly
   apparent that there's no sense of wonder to accompany the shots of
   characters gaping at their amateur rocket blasts, and the film is
   riddled with such cardboard stereotypes and typecasting that I found
   it difficult to invest much emotion in their plights.  Just when John
   seems ready to cross the line from strict authoritarian to unfeeling
   tyrant, you can count on him to reaffirm his gruffly loving nature by
   performing a good deed, and as helpful teacher Miss Riley, Ms. Dern
   so earnestly strains to light a fire under her students that I
   expected her to pull a facial muscle.  While the picture is
   reasonably pleasant, it's narratively stupefying -- a shot of a
   disgusted John throwing a spent rocket into the trash is a given, and
   it's inevitable that an oft-mentioned legendary outsider makes a
   fleeting appearance -- and the syrupy score by Mark Isham
   condescendingly serves as an emotional guide for the audience.
   Ironically, for a picture about a boy whose hard work and ambitions
   sent him shooting for the stars, OCTOBER SKY is depressingly
   unambitious.  For all its good intentions, it's telling that the home
   video footage which closes the picture is infinitely more touching
   and awe-inspiring than the preceding hundred-odd minutes of
   celluloid.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"X-FILES fans come up to me in malls expecting me to be able to fill them
 in on the whole conspiracy.  Half the time I have no idea what they're
 talking about." - Martin Landau

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
THE WINGS OF THE DOVE (Miramax - 1997)
Starring Helena Bonham Carter, Linus Roache, Alison Elliott,
  Elizabeth McGovern, Charlotte Rampling, Alex Jennings
Screenplay by Hossein Amini, based on the novel by Henry James
Produced by David Parfitt, Stephen Evans
Directed by Iain Softley
Running time: 101 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   While the recent film adaptations based upon the works of Henry James
   -- Jane Campion's THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY and Agneiszka Holland's
   WASHINGTON SQUARE -- were mildly disappointing to various degrees,
   such is not the case with the latest James-inspired piece, Iain
   Softley's richly handsome production of THE WINGS OF THE DOVE.
   Finely observed and splendidly performed, this is a most impressive
   costume drama which is sure to draw heavy attention during awards
   season.
   The screenplay by Hossein Amini (who splendidly adapted Thomas
   Hardy's JUDE for Michael Winterbottom last year) heavily revamps
   Henry James' story, giving it a modern spin, pushing the action
   forward up eight years to 1910, and extensively rewriting the
   dialogue of the characters, but retains the novel's essence and loses
   none of its moral ambiguity.  That the audience's sympathies are
   exchanged so fluidly between its characters is indicative of THE
   WINGS OF THE DOVE's transcendence of the staidness often associated
   with the costume melodrama genre.
   At first, our sympathies belong with Kate Croy (Helena Bonham
   Carter), who serves as the focal figure and the catalyst in THE WINGS
   OF THE DOVE.  The young Englishwoman's foothold in high society is
   tenuous; her mother has recently died, her father is a penniless
   opium addict, and the only thing separating Kate from poverty is the
   patronage of her wealthy Aunt Maud (Charlotte Rampling), who's
   determined to marry Kate to someone with social stature -- perhaps
   snooty Lord Mark (Alex Jennings).  Kate's heart, however, belongs
   elsewhere -- to an upstanding man distinctly of lower class,
   struggling journalist Merton Densher (Linus Roache) -- and this
   enrages her benefactor, who forbids Kate from seeing him and
   threatens to cut off her father's meager subsistence allowance.
   Enter Millie Theale (Alison Elliott), a fabulously wealthy young
   American, of whom it is remarked "She'd be the Queen of America, if
   they had one."  She and Kate meet at a dinner party and quickly
   strike up a close friendship.  When Kate finds that Millie (who's
   unaware of Kate's clandestine relationship) has eyes for Merton, and
   learns elsewhere that Millie is stricken with a terminal illness, she
   unhatches a deceptive scheme which ultimately has unexpectedly
   powerful and tragic repercussions for all involved.
   THE WINGS OF THE DOVE smartly avoids explicitly spelling out Kate's
   devious plan for as long as possible, and while it could have stood
   to improve by omitting a unambiguous description of her plot, it's
   nonetheless effective both in underlining the stealthful complicity
   of Kate and Merton, and their unspoken reluctancy to perpetrate their
   self-serving deed.
   What's interesting here is that despite the hurtful treachery
   committed against unsuspecting Millie by Kate and Merton, their
   intentions towards her are anything but malicious; unlike in James'
   novel, it clearly comes across in the film that the lovers genuinely
   like Millie, and this brings new dimensions to what would otherwise
   be a fairly superficial depiction of green-eyed villainy.  The
   machinations are a consequently a little less ruthless, a little bit
   more compassionate in nature, and one can legitimately begin to
   consider how much of Kate's plotting serves the needs and desires of
   her ailing friend's as much as it does her own.
   Ms. Bonham Carter is very effective as Kate.  Despite her complex
   character's less-than-honourable motivations and her dishonestly
   manipulative tactics, she still manages to come across as far from
   villainous, a desperate woman whose circumstances have culminated in
   this dishonourable path to tread.  Even as we view her actions as
   abhorrent, Ms. Bonham Carter makes us if not sympathise, at least
   empathise with Kate's dilemma.
   Mr. Roache is very good as a man torn between desire and duty, and
   his character's struggle with his conscience and his own moral fibre
   is palpable.  Caught between the desire to do right by both women and
   his passion for Kate, Merton is perhaps the character who's
   ultimately affected the most; Mr. Roache's heartwrenching performance
   is key in the tumultuous emotional buildup at the conclusion of THE
   WINGS OF THE DOVE which pays off lavishly.
   Ms. Elliott is nothing short of beguiling as Millie, whose presence
   throughout the film is bittersweet.  To reconcile her distinctly
   beatific aura with her ailing mortality is heartbreaking, and her
   intoxicating demeanour and dreamy-eyed smile while sharing stolen
   moments with Merton are luminous.  The dizzying sense of passion so
   missing in WASHINGTON SQUARE is perfectly captured here with a scene
   which features Ms. Elliott up high on a church, beaming upwards,
   completely enraptured.  I've admired Ms. Elliott's work for several
   years now; her performance here is a major step forward for her and
   marks a career best.
   The supporting players in THE WINGS OF THE DOVE are solid in
   relatively minor roles.  Mr. Jennings is very good in a limited
   capacity, while Elizabeth McGovern, although fine in her supporting
   role as Millie's faithful travelling companion, seems somewhat out of
   place here in a period piece.
   THE WINGS OF THE DOVE is precisely captures emotional truths, both
   big and small.  The delicacy of the interplay between the characters
   rings true -- the encounters between Merton and Millie in scenic
   Venice, riding in the canals or walking in the perpetual rainfall are
   fraught with charged sexual tension, and the lovemaking scene between
   Kate and Merton is one of the most passionate ever put to film --
   except here, the passion shared between the lovers is not that of
   lust, but grief.  The film even has a sense of humour, with Kate
   arranging for Millie and Merton to share an awkward private moment at
   an art exhibit of nudes.  Within the context of a highly mannered
   piece, the cumulative effect of the bombardment of emotionality, both
   high and low, is a highly affecting denouement.
   This is a masterful direction job by Iain Softley, who rebounds from
   the disappointment of HACKERS and fulfills on the promise of his
   feature film debut work in BACKBEAT.  Confidently helmed, THE WINGS
   OF THE DOVE has a nice deliberate pace where every shot is efficient
   and purposeful; there are are no throwaways.  There's a particularly
   interesting shot sequence early in the film where Merton vainly
   protests with Aunt Maud's doorman, arguing that he won't leave until
   he can speak with Kate.  The shot of Kate in the window, forlornly
   gazing down upon Merton in the street with her huge smoldering eyes,
   is strategically placed to obscure her lips -- and indeed,
   communication between the two is severed at this point in the film.
   While the film could certainly excise the reiterative flashback shots
   that appear at a climactic point in the film that prove to be
   redundant and ineffective, as a whole Mr. Softley's helming of THE
   WINGS OF THE DOVE is impressively proficient.
   In fact, THE WINGS OF THE DOVE is precisely the sort of film which is
   undoubtedly bound to draw the attention of year-end award voters, and
   could conceivably snare no less than five and perhaps as many as ten
   Oscar nominations -- Picture, Actor, Actress, Supporting Actress,
   Director, Adapted Screenplay, Art Direction, Cinematography, Costume
   Direction, and Editing (there's one transition shot which is
   strikingly distracting -- you can virtually see the shot freeze --
   but it's otherwise elegantly edited by Tariq Anwar) are all eminently
   feasible possibilities.  This is a superb, moving film, easily the
   best costume drama of the year to date, and among the finest of
   recent years.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I was reminded for some reason of something Fred Kareman, my acting
 teacher, had once said: 'Most people in this business should be selling
 zippers on 7th Avenue.'" - Tom DiCillo

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
SHE'S ALL THAT (Miramax - 1999)
Cast: Freddie Prinze Jr., Rachael Leigh Cook, Matthew Lillard,
      Paul Walker, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe
Screenplay by R. Lee Fleming Jr.
Produced by Peter Abrams, Robert L. Levy and Richard N. Gladstein
Directed by Robert Iscove
Running time: 91 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The recent trend emerging from studio films arriving on the
   marketplace -- the repackaging of familiar, proven story material in
   a teen-friendly context -- is indicative of the degree to which this
   lucrative demographic is coveted.  Amy Heckerling's contemporary
   revision of Jane Austen's "Emma" provided one of 1995's most clever
   and buoyant pictures in the unexpected hit CLUELESS, and the recent
   Robert Rodriguez film THE FACULTY is simply a mishmash of THE
   INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS, THE THING, and teenagers, but in the
   imminent future, the trickle of teen updates to date becomes a river:
   on the horizon include such fare as CRUEL INTENTIONS ("Les Liaisons
   Dangereuses" plus Buffy), TEN THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU ("The Taming Of
   The Shrew" in high school), and the U.S. release of STRIKE! (spunky
   teen starlets meet "Lysistrata", to woeful effect).
   Yet another example of teen-oriented revisionism run rampant is the
   relentlessly conventional SHE'S ALL THAT, re-teaming THE HOUSE OF YES
   castmates Freddie Prinze Jr. and Rachael Leigh Cook in an update of
   the Pygmalion tale squarely aimed at the teen crowd.  Put to film
   most memorably in MY FAIR LADY, this formula is hardly unpredictable
   -- man aims to transform "ugly duckling" to princess, with unexpected
   peripheral effects -- but what's disappointing here is the lack of
   any sort of effective fresh spin; after transplanting the fable into
   a trendy Southern California milieu, R. Lee Fleming Jr.'s screenplay
   slips into auto-pilot.
   That's especially crippling in this picture, far moreso than the
   scoffable inability of horn-rimmed glasses, a bad wig, a
   paint-splattered ensemble, and a tendency of tumbling to the ground
   to mask Ms. Cook's appeal while in wallflower mode -- after all,
   similar efforts to render the radiant Audrey Hepburn as gawky were
   also spectacularly unsuccessful.  It's crucial that a tale with such
   an obvious preordained conclusion should sustain interest along its
   familiar route, yet every twist and turn in the tedious plot unfolds
   like clockwork while punchlines and comic gags thud with unforgivable
   regularity.  Although the film ramps up a notch during its final
   half-hour, it's mostly due to the performances of its leads that the
   picture broaches tolerability.
   A few necessary amendments have been implemented onto the formula in
   order to make the story more palatable to contemporary attitudes.
   Today's audiences would have be challenged to find empathy for the
   passive, demure heroines which populate these tales; consequently,
   frumpy social outcast Laney (Cook) is no shrinking violet: she's much
   tougher, sharper and more self-assured -- not only does she refuse to
   swoon at the sudden attention from hotshot Zack (Prinze Jr.), she
   outright rejects his advances and freely fires acid zingers in his
   direction.  Far from being a reclamation project, the picture takes
   on the perspective that she's the film's strongest and most complete
   character from the outset.  (Of course, she's imbued with requisite
   vulnerability -- her unremitting seriousness and angry art indicate
   her loss of youthful vigor and buried grief upon her mom's death.
   And there is the matter of that wonderfully tacky falafel hat she
   gets to wear at her part-time job.)
   Otherwise, there's a numbing lack of innovation evident in this film.
   Racking up the clichis, the typical centerpiece makeover scene makes
   its inevitable appearance, with the "not improved, just different"
   Laney descending down the staircase accompanied by a sweet love song
   on the background as Zack gapes upwards agog (though I liked that the
   filmmakers undercut the moment with some humour).  It should be noted
   that Zack's moment of epiphany is a curious variant -- a
   time-honoured staple of these sorts of pictures is the magical
   reaction shot of the guy finally recognizing the beauty buried
   beneath the glasses and the bad hair; it's usually a fleeting moment
   which occurs when she removes her ungainly spectacles, but it occurs
   here when Laney slips out of her overalls to reveal her swimsuit-clad
   figure.
   While it may be futile to point out logical faults in what's
   essentially a contemporary fairytale, the film is so rife with holes
   that it would be overly charitable to neglect them altogether.  Zack
   is depicted as such a sensitive, kind-hearted soul that his initial
   pairing with such a cartoonishly one-dimensional villainess as Taylor
   (Jodi Lyn O'Keefe) defies credibility (save, that is, for her
   physical attributes).  Frankly, he's such a flat-out nice guy that it
   becomes difficult to swallow someone so thoroughly genial could
   rocket up the cutthroat high school social ladder to the point where
   he lords over the student body, enforcing law and order with nary a
   bit of intimidation and having the soccer team at his beck and call.
   These are minor quibbles relative to Laney's behavioural
   inconsistency, leaping from incredulous (and warranted) suspicion of
   Zack's advances to reluctant acceptance of his courtship with little
   cohesion bridging the two positions.  (It feels like scenes are
   missing.)  And the velocity of perennial outcast Laney's acceptance
   into the In Crowd should give hope for social misfits everywhere.
   While the picture's focus is largely upon the budding romance between
   our class-mismatched couple, it indulges in occasional comic
   diversions (most of which crash and burn) and some brief flights of
   fancy, catapulting fully into the realm of full-fledged fantasy at
   the prom, where the seniors break out into an extended choreographed
   dance sequence.  It's a moment that's both energetic and fun to
   watch.
   Although SHE'S ALL THAT's plodding consistent vision is smartly
   softened by the genuine sincerity and affection with which it treats
   its love story, the roster of caricatures which serve as supporting
   characters is a drawback.  Among the peripheral players, which
   include a reunion of THE MIGHTY's Elden Henson and Kieran Culkin (as
   part of Laney's Outcast Brigade) and Anna Paquin (who turns in a
   bizarre interpretation of a teenager), only rubber-faced Matthew
   Lillard makes much of an impression as the comically narcissistic
   Brock.  (Not only does he sport a tattoo of himself on his bicep,
   it's also labelled "Me", lest any confusion arise.)  Brock's the sort
   of character who, on stage, would carry around a mirror to gaze
   adoringly at himself; appropriately, in the film he'd rather
   approvingly ogle his televised visage than cuddle with Taylor.
   The film's strength undoubtedly lies with the screen presence of its
   charismatic leads.  Mr. Prinze Jr. gives an easygoing, affable
   performance; his wide, disarming smile suggests that the hurtful
   cruelty inherent in the plot will be dulled.  Meanwhile, Ms. Cook
   continues to demonstrate her adeptness in front of the camera,
   navigating both her character's sullen and softer sides with ease.
   (She, along with Monica Keena, were the only bright spots in STRIKE!)
   Although her tiny, delicate frame and photogenic face is obscured by
   garish clothing and unsightly accessories for half the movie (and her
   first scene calls on her to hock up a loogie, natch), she's an
   instantly charming performer.  They deserved a better movie than
   this.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Somebody asked me what I learned from Michael Bay.  And I said,
 'nothing.'"
                    - Billy Bob Thornton

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
THE FIFTH ELEMENT (Columbia - 1997)
Starring Bruce Willis, Gary Oldman, Ian Holm, Milla Jovovich,
  Chris Tucker, Luke Perry, Brion James
Screenplay by Luc Besson, Robert Mark Kamen
Produced by Patrice Ledoux
Directed by Luc Besson
Running time: 127 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
Regarding Luc Besson's THE FIFTH ELEMENT, nobody could quite
summarize it so succinctly and so accurately as Mr. Besson's himself;
of his film, which he conceived at age sixteen, he commented:
"I was writing solely for the pleasure of it. I just put down on
paper everything that I love and see. I just like to go for it, and I
consider the serious questions later."
That this is clearly evident in THE FIFTH ELEMENT would be somewhat
of an understatement; this film seems to be a celluloid collage of a
sci-fi fanboy's wildest fantasies. You want a goon squad of
shapeshifting alien villians? You want benevolent aliens marching
about Egyptian ruins? You want a giant, virtually unstoppable clump
of Pure Evil rushing towards planet Earth, signifying the destruction
of Life As We Know It(tm)? You want a battered Everyman (it's not by
accident he's a taxi driver, the cinematic signifyer that This Is An
Average Joe - see HEAVY METAL for a similar futuristic equivalent),
pretty waif in tow, struggling against a sinister meglomaniac and his
army of mercenaries to Save The Planet(tm) in a prototypical battle
of Good vs. Evil? Boy, have you come to the right movie.
Mr. Besson throws striking sequences one after the other onscreen,
and while they hardly coalesce in any sort of cohesive manner, in an
odd way THE FIFTH ELEMENT sort of works; it's loud, bizarre, and
remarkably silly, but to its credit the film never takes itself
seriously in the least, and we are bombarded by so many audacious
images and sights that it never becomes boring.
Not exactly high praise, to be sure, but THE FIFTH ELEMENT isn't
exactly a great film. Its greatest strengths are its visuals; the
sets and costumes are astonishing. Save for a fifteen-minute
prologue, the film is set in 23rd century Earth, and Mr. Besson's
view of it is a staggering one: multi-levelled congested traffic from
flying automobiles zipping about, towering skyscrapers stretching
above the smog on the surface beyond the reaches of the eye,
plummeting elevators screaming down rails, and, of course, that
Universal constant, McDonalds. The scenes in which we explore this
strange new world through the eyes of Leeloo (Milla Jovovich), our
genetically re-engineered heroine, are a visual feast, and a triumph
not only for Mr. Besson's vision, but for the effects team at Digital
Domain. Even that staple of the uninspired action film, the chase
scene, takes new life in THE FIFTH ELEMENT; it's really something to
watch Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis), our taxi-driving hero,
desperately weave through three dimensional traffic in order to
attempt to lose the police. Dan Weil's award-worthy production design
is terrific, particularly the magnificent auditorium scene in the
off-Earth resort complex.
THE FIFTH ELEMENT is filled with sequences and effects which should
be a sci-fi fanboy's delight: the onscreen meticulous genetic
reconstruction of Leeluu, from a scrap of recovered DNA to a
scantily-clad, orange-haired pixie; the demonstration of evil Zorg's
(Gary Oldman) powerful homing gun, which is never again used in the
film. Why does Mr. Besson show us this stuff in the film? Why,
because (in my best fanboy voice) it looks really really cool!
(fanboy voice off) They're along the same lines as the gratuitous
nothing other than to impress.
Tossing every wild idea that comes your way, though, can result in a
lot of unnecessary onscreen junk which rather clearly fails to serve
any purpose. I really couldn't think of any reason as to why the
tentacled blue alien diva had to be tossed into the mix, other than
so that Mr. Besson could perform a lot of cross-cutting between her
wailing and the action going on elsewhere in the resort complex. For
that matter, other than for sheer audacity, was it really even
necessary for the resort complex to be halfway across the galaxy?
At this point I come to the most blatant of the unnecessary elements
(no pun intended) of the film; the prancing, perpetually-screeching
over-the-top Ruby Rhod (Chris Tucker) character. Why, oh why? He
seems to be there sheerly for comic relief, but given all of the
other comedic elements in the film (Ian Holm's hapless, bumbling
priest Cornelius, Gary Oldman's scenery-chewing Zorg), was it even
necessary? The Ruby Rhod character never works and is extremely
grating, and by the time the film reached its denoument I had the
sinking feeling that he was introduced simply so that there'd be an
obligatory fourth person around in order to activate The Fifth
Element.
Coming off the best in THE FIFTH ELEMENT is Milla Jovovich, as the
wide-eyed Leeluu, who's so wonderfully expressive in her performance
that I had to ground myself by noting that she had virtually no
dialogue in the film. Ian Holm was also effective as the good-hearted
but incompentant priest (no world saver is he). Gary Oldman is one of
today's best actors, but his over-the-top performance in Mr. Besson's
earlier film, the terrific THE PROFESSIONAL (a.k.a. LEON), is dwarfed
by his bizarre villanous turn here - granted, it does make for
interesting viewing, particularly when one considers the
pointlessness of his role. Bruce Willis' performance in THE FIFTH
ELEMENT, however, is unremarkable; surrendering to the gargantuan
scope of the film's set pieces and its mythological struggle of Good
vs. Evil, he's merely along for the ride.
THE FIFTH ELEMENT is a hodgepodge of individual sequences, visual
effects and set pieces, some of them wonderfully inspired, and others
misfiring badly. It doesn't all work out together, but on the basis
of the effective spectacle of Mr. Besson's wonderously bizarre vision
alone, the film is worth seeing, and the other strengths in THE FIFTH
ELEMENT (of which there are, believe it or not, a few) are icing on
the cake.

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   I was incredulous when I first heard that MGM was planning a sequel
   to their 1995 science-fiction flick SPECIES.  Squandering an
   intriguing premise, the original film turned out to be a dreadful
   mess, widely disliked by both audiences and critics alike -- and
   nonetheless still somehow succeeded in becoming a financial success,
   raking in over $60 million domestic during the competitive summer
   season despite a distinct lack of star power in its cast (Ben
   Kingsley's a splendid actor, but a marquee name he ain't).
   Miraculously dodging the bullet with the first film, I doubted that
   they'd dare tempt fate and go for another round.
   So here comes SPECIES II, with a new creative team (director Peter
   Medak and screenwriter Chris Brancato step in for Roger Donaldson and
   Dennis Feldman, respectively) that fails to improve the series one
   iota -- like its predecessor, SPECIES II fails to capitalize on a
   potentially promising kernel and instead runs the gamut from
   ridiculously silly to unmitigatedly stupid.
   The film follows the exploits of a young man, Patrick Ross (Justin
   Lazard), whose sole focus is on cruising along the streets in order
   to pick up women, loitering in strip clubs, and generally trying to
   bed as many different ladies as he possibly can.  In other words,
   Patrick is like a lot of guys; these activities could describe the
   everyday routines of a huge percentage of men his age, but there's a
   catch -- he's an astronaut who recently returned from a seemingly
   successful mission to Mars, and who's now infected with alien DNA.
   Patrick's overriding compulsion: to mate and sire countless numbers
   of gooey little alien offspring.  And when he becomes aware of Eve
   (Natasha Henstridge), a half-human, half-alien clone of the monster
   from the first film being studied in a government lab, Patrick's
   primary focus turns to her -- "if these two were to mate, the
   resulting pure strain of offspring would be unstoppable" warns Dr.
   Laura Baker (Marg Helgenberger, gamely reprising her role) with
   admirable conviction.
   SPECIES II opens with the Mars mission, and the space scenes are
   remarkably unconvincing and hokey-looking, even splicing back to
   dated, grainy footage of actual spacecraft activities -- they really
   skimped on production values this time around.  However, this all
   looks positively inspired when compared to the first appearance of
   the evil alien goo which ultimately infests Patrick; watching as it
   slinks around the command module of the spaceship, any question as to
   whether or not this is a cheesy B-movie is quickly answered.
   Mr. Brancato's original screenplay is filled with outrageous lines
   which often leaves the audience in stitches.  Like the first film
   (and perhaps in homage to it), there's a real penchant for dialogue
   which underlines the obvious.  Last time around featured the
   hootworthy line uttered by Forest Whitaker's psychic empath character
   upon entering a bloodsoaked room -- "Something bad happened here."
   This time, Laura gets to stand over a fresh, shredded corpse with its
   entails ripped out and mutter "This is awful."  And she's not even
   empathic!
   And when a psychotically horny Patrick accosts a supermarket shopper
   and drags her kicking and screaming behind the building in a
   woefully-paced suspense sequence, Eve, who's telepathically linked to
   her alien/human-hybrid counterpart (whatever), helpfully tells our
   alien-hunting protagonists, "He's going to rape her."
   While SPECIES II is often unintentionally hilarious, at least it
   occasionally demonstrates a sense of humour of its own.  There's an
   amusing, tongue-in-cheek bit of product placement (which doesn't
   really make much sense, but I appreciated the sentiment), as well as
   some supermarket-related hijinx ("He's in Aisle 1!" informs Eve).  If
   the film maintained this sort of light-hearted tone, it would have
   been much more charming and enjoyable to watch, but, to its
   detriment, it instead takes its silly plot far too seriously and
   barrels along to a bloody, effects-ladened anticlimactic conclusion.
   Much of the film fails to make a whole lot of sense, and there are
   such gaping plot holes that it's terribly difficult to contain any
   suspension of disbelief.  The implausibilities are endless: what
   about the toxic bomb in Eve's brain?  Why are the guards armed with
   guns when they already know firearms are ineffectual?  My favourite
   was the slow-motion sequence in the film where Eve, sporting
   superhuman strength, is shown tossing aside guards who are attempting
   to contain her with what look like body blocks.  This is the sort of
   movie which leaves you holding your head in amazed disbelief,
   incredulous that it's being foisted upon the public.
   Returning headlines Michael Madsen (who reprises tough guy Press
   Lennox) and Ms. Helgenberger do what they can with this goofy
   screenplay, but there's realistically only so much one can do with
   this script as a basis.  Mykelti Williamson (portraying astronaut
   Dennis Gamble) churns out an all-too-familiar spin on a generic
   brash-mouthed character, and fine character actors George Dzundza
   (playing Colonel Burgess and looking ridiculous in the process) and
   James Cromwell (Patrick's neglectful father, Senator Ross) are
   utterly wasted in the film.  Mr. Lazard gives his character an
   appropriately shifty-eyed look, while returning vixen Ms. Henstridge
   is actually given the opportunity to act in one scene (and acquits
   herself nicely), but is mostly relegated to reprising her familiar
   role of parading about in skimpy clothing (or none at all).
   Ms. Henstridge recently commented on how some female audiences have
   expressed appreciation for her character in the first entry of the
   SPECIES series, claiming that "she's so empowered."  A lethal
   half-alien in heat who dispatches of her sexual partners in grotesque
   fashion -- now *that's* what I call empowerment.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Sometimes, I have an overwhelming temptation to grab someone by the throat,
 head-butt them, leave them bleeding in the corner, saying 'That is my
 critical response to you.'" - NSFC award-winning director Mike Figgis

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
TRUE CRIME (Warner Bros. - 1999)
Cast: Clint Eastwood, Isiah Washington, Denis Leary,
      Lisa Gay Hamilton, James Woods
Screenplay by Larry Gross and Paul Brickman and Stephen Schiff
Produced by Clint Eastwood, Robert D. Zanuck and Lili Fini Zanuck
Directed by Clint Eastwood
Running time: 127 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Clint Eastwood's latest picture, the death-row drama TRUE CRIME, is a
   carefully deceptive one; given its core elements -- a man condemned to
   die for a murder he denies committing, a stubborn reporter hot on the
   trails of "discrepancies" in the case -- the obvious expectation is
   that of an urgent high-octane mystery thriller, and indeed, we're
   subjected to all the generic trademarks of the film genre: the
   meaningful shots of ticking clocks, the final walk to the death
   chamber, the lingering image of the direct line to the governor.
   Still, under Eastwood's characteristic quiet authority, the film
   distinguishes itself from the pack by being decidedly more of a
   character study than a potboiler, and despite its beat-the-clock
   scenario, the movie seems almost defiantly leisurely-paced.
   The central characters, journeyman newspaper reporter Steve Everett
   (Eastwood) and convicted murderer Frank Beachum (Isiah Washington),
   are introduced in parallel storylines kept so determinedly separated
   that they encounter each other but twice throughout the entire film.
   Nonetheless, there's a certain intimacy created as the picture closely
   observes their minutiae over the span of a fateful 24 hours.
   A somber dread permeates Beachum's narratively familiar storyline,
   which follows the doomed inmate through the hours leading up to his
   scheduled execution.  Convicted for the murder of a pregnant
   convenience store clerk, a hollowed Beachum steadfastly maintains his
   innocence but seems resigned to his fate.  While the scales are tipped
   a bit too far by painting him as a selfless born-again Christian, the
   thread is sufficiently poignant and affecting, and Beachum's final
   farewell scenes with devastated wife Bonnie (Lisa Gay Hamilton) and
   especially his confused little daughter are powerful and moving.
   Meanwhile, upon the untimely demise of a colleague, Everett inherits
   her piece.  Assigned to interview Beachum for the so-called "human
   interest" beat, he's immediately convinced that something's amiss with
   the capital case, and to the protests of the paper's editor-in-chief
   (James Woods) and exasperated city editor (Denis Leary), insistently
   delves into the story.  What follows is largely a routine
   investigatory procedural, as Everett visits the scene of the crime,
   wades through old case files, interviews witnesses and leeringly
   insinuates "But how could you see over the potato chips?"
   All standard fare for the typical clock-is-ticking thriller, to be
   sure, but where TRUE CRIME departs from the formula, and where, I
   suspect, Eastwood's interest truly lies, is with the loving
   construction of wily Everett as a fully-realised three-dimensional
   character with all his flaws and idiosyncracies intact; this is a
   picture whose fascination with character outweighs intrigue with its
   story.  Few have played flawed heroes more regularly than Eastwood,
   and he's in familiar territory as Everett, an aging womanizer and
   recovering alcoholic whose self-destructive behaviour inflicts
   suffering to those around him.  A washout as a husband and a father,
   and with a tendency to get on the bad side with his editors, Everett's
   life is a complete mess, punctuated by an endless series of casual
   (and not especially discreet) infidelities, broken promises and
   familial neglect.  We've seen this sort of character before, but
   rarely in a film which freely diverts from the storyline to indulge in
   illumination his ruefully thoughtless manner so attentively, and never
   in a thriller which gladly stops dead in its tracks to depict our hero
   racing carelessly through the zoo with his young daughter (Eastwood's
   own adorable child, Francesca Fisher-Eastwood) so that he can rid
   himself of her companionship.  While there's an obvious parallel
   between the film's two leading characters -- both of them have special
   relationships with their daughters and are in need of redemption --
   Eastwood makes the point with trademark subtlety.  With a refreshing
   novel-like emphasis on rich characterization, the film's appeal lies
   with observation of Everett's own personal struggles.
   While the film isn't afraid to address ethical issues involving
   capital punishment -- it's a conceptual challenge to develop a film
   where the hero has to rescue a man from death row which remains
   apathetic to the material -- it's not overly concerned with the topic
   either.  While leaning towards an anti-death penalty position, we're
   not browbeaten with rhetoric -- indeed, a surprisingly gentle and
   sympathetic eye is cast on the kindly prison guards and compassionate
   warden, who carry out their duties with stoicism and professionalism.
   If anything, what's vilified in the picture is narcissism; all of the
   dislikeable characters in the film are essentially self-serving, and
   the most unpleasant one reveals himself by the way he attends to his
   coif.
   Eastwood elicits typically solid performances from his ensemble cast,
   particularly from Washington, who turns in a reserved performance
   vastly different from his work as a violent would-be rapist in OUT OF
   SIGHT; he lends Beachum a nobility and dignity that renders his
   momentary emotional lapses especially stirring.  As always, it's great
   fun to watch Woods in action, but his gesticulating and animated
   facial expressions produce an energy level which are at odds with the
   tone of the rest of the film; something more subdued would be in order
   here.
   Loose but never slack, TRUE CRIME feels like a throwback to
   old-fashion filmmaking, before the days when testosterone narrative
   jolts replaced inexorbable accumulation of tension.  Eastwood oversees
   the proceedings with a cool confidence and, being the jazz fan that is
   he, freely riffs the picture with interesting moments which appear
   narratively cryptic but, in their own quiet way, reveal a great deal.
   There's an ostensibly pointless scene of a vagrant pestering female
   pedestrians with lewd behaviour.  In most pictures, the hero would
   knock some sense into the crude lowlife; TRUE CRIME is the sort of
   movie where the hero gives him ten bucks.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"X-FILES fans come up to me in malls expecting me to be able to fill them
 in on the whole conspiracy.  Half the time I have no idea what they're
 talking about." - Martin Landau

Title
Review for Return to Paradise (1998)
RETURN TO PARADISE (Polygram - 1998)
Starring Vince Vaughn, Anne Heche, Joaquin Phoenix, David Conrad,
  Jada Pinkett Smith
Screenplay by Wesley Strick and Bruce Robinson
Produced by Alain Berheim, Steve Golin
Directed by Joseph Ruben
Running time: 109 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The moral dilemma in RETURN TO PARADISE looms everpresent throughout
   the picture's middle hour, inextricably tightening a noose around its
   protagonist's neck.  More ethical examination than suspenseful
   potboiler -- its sparse location usage and reliance upon persuasive
   conversation to facilitate the high drama result in a nagging
   resemblance to a filmed stageplay -- this is a sober morality play
   told in shades of gray.
   In earlier days, where rectitude in the movies was as subtle as the
   black and white ten-galloners worn in westerns, the course of action
   would be automatic: if the lead had the means to spare a condemned
   man's life by owning up to his involvement in the crime and turning
   himself in, by God, he bit the bullet and did the time.  It's the
   sort of selfless display which plays as suitably noble in a
   simplified world but is implausibly straightforward for a brooding
   take of modern realism.
   Sheriff's (Vince Vaughn) quandary is even more deliciously sticky.
   As informed by advocate Beth (Anne Heche), Lewis (Joaquin Phoenix) is
   scheduled to hang in eight days as a drug trafficker, but a deal has
   been struck to spare his life if his two cohorts return to Malaysia
   and accept their culpability -- three years imprisonment each if they
   both surrender, but six years should only one decide to face the
   music.  Sheriff, of course, doesn't want to see Lewis die -- but,
   then again, neither does he particularly want to rot in a jungle
   prison; wouldn't it be less messy if Tony (David Conrad) went back to
   do the honours instead?
   It's an ethical predicament made all the more delicate by the set of
   circumstances: the male trio only vaguely know each other, having met
   during a fleeting comradeship two years ago.  Sheriff's indirectly
   responsible for Lewis' death sentence -- the discovery of his
   sloppily-discarded brick of recreational hash pushed Lewis over the
   legal limit, designating the crime as trafficking rather than mere
   possession -- but still, the instinct of self-preservation is strong
   enough (especially in a New Yorker) that it's difficult to make this
   sort of sacrifice for a close friend, let alone a long-ago associate.
   While the film doesn't browbeat -- the filmmakers are smart enough to
   realize that while the audience wants Sheriff to do the right thing,
   it may very well be a hypocritical sentiment -- it's not exactly
   subtle with its characterizations.  Even a virtuous man put in this
   dilemma would have second thoughts, so to depict Sheriff as an
   amoral, looking-out-for-Number-One character is unnecessarily
   heavy-handed.  Not only is he not the nice-young-professional sort
   that Tony is (who even has a sweet fiancee -- talk about tipping the
   scales), but Sheriff's also apparently the kind of shifty guy that
   gets confronted in restaurants by angry ex-lovers and even prompt
   fathers to expect the worst.  Sheesh.
   Sheriff's character arc, then, is tidily well-defined and
   consequently apparent from the outset: initally directionless, the
   crisis prompts him to experience a personal awakening, stirred from
   his moral reverie by the growing realisation of his own
   self-involvement and the love of a good woman.  This last element, in
   particular, struck me as superfluous; the love story, though
   thematically appropriate, is narratively jarring and lends little
   catharsis to the film.
   Still, despite the scenario's obvious setup, the lack of any evident
   urgency (the days are counted down with occasional onscreen
   subtitles, but even a permanent running chronometer wouldn't add
   enough tension to overcome the lackadaisical pacing), and the
   inevitable outcome (though its antecedent -- it's based on the 1990
   French film FORCE MAJEURE -- often teases at a more oblique course),
   it nonetheless sustains interest as the cerebral chess game of
   pursuit and evasion develops between Sheriff and Beth; beneath their
   posturing, their arguments often seem to be as much to convince
   themselves as they are to sway their intended parties.
   The picture falls apart in its final reel, full of melodramatic
   revelations and twists unworthy of the preceding intrigue, but the
   actors do what they can to salvage it.  This is a particularly
   well-cast film -- Jada Pinkett Smith's characteristic verve is nicely
   channelled into controlled insistence as an ambitious news hound,
   while Mr. Phoenix turns in a vivid performance as the martyr Lewis;
   beneath his menacing features, he conveys the same innate sweetness
   as exhuded in his impressive breakthrough performance in Gus Van
   Sant's TO DIE FOR.  Ms. Heche, splendid actor and uncanny
   presidential barometer (she starred in WAG THE DOG when tensions
   increased in the Gulf and L'Affaire De Lewinsky first broke, and now
   appears here in a film dealing with a man coming to terms with taking
   responsibility for his past actions and submitting himself to
   inquisition -- boy, I can't wait to see what happens when her PSYCHO
   hits theatres) is in fine form with a quiet, focused intensity.
   At the end of the day, though, it all feels a bit slight.  RETURN TO
   PARADISE is terribly earnest and well-intentioned, but it doesn't
   quite achieve the degree of gravity or profundity that it strives
   for; it's an agreeable 110 minutes which involves for the duration,
   but vaporizes from the mind shortly thereafter.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Title
Review for Thousand Acres, A (1997)
A THOUSAND ACRES (Buena Vista - 1997)
Starring Michelle Pfeiffer, Jessica Lange, Jennifer Jason Leigh,
  Jason Robards
Screenplay by Laura Jones, based on the novel A THOUSAND ACRES by
  Jane Smiley
Produced by Marc Abraham, Lynn Arost, Steve Golin, Kate Guinzburg,
  Sigurjon Sighvatsson
Directed by Jocelyn Moorhouse
Running time: 105 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
As one might expect from a film featuring a cast including some of
America's greatest active actresses, Jocelyn Moorehouse's A THOUSAND
ACRES, based upon the Pulitzer Prize-winning novel by Jane Smiley,
benefits from customarily outstanding central performances.  Sadly,
the fine performances by Jessica Lange and Michelle Pfeiffer are in
service of a particularly overwrought screenplay by famed Aussie
screenwriter Laura Jones which fails to live up to the standards set
by their work.
As has been well publicized, A THOUSAND ACRES is a modern adaptation
of Shakespeare's tragedy, "King Lear", in which the benevolent
monarch is eventually driven to madness and death by the scheming and
conniving of his two evil daughters Goneril and Regan after his
proposal to divide his kingdom up three ways -- to Goneril, Regan,
and the youngest and favourite daughter, Cordelia.  However, the Ms.
Smiley's novel, and Ms. Moorehouse's film, stands "King Lear" on its
head while transporting it to the modern American Midwest -- here,
Ginny/Goneril (Ms. Lange) and Rose/Regan (Ms. Pfeiffer) are the
sympathetic protagonists, while Larry Cook/Lear (Jason Robards) is
antagonistically portrayed as the abusive farmer who proposes to
split his prized thousand-acre Iowa farm between daughters Ginny,
Rose, and Caroline/Cordelia (Jennifer Jason Leigh).
It's a fine idea and a solid premise to attempt to reinvent the plot
by embracing (and, where needed, embellishing upon) the perspective
of a different set of characters in the story, and A THOUSAND ACRES
is initially very faithful to this concept.  The problem is that it's
simply *too* faithful -- seemingly hampered by the unnecessary
inclination to touch upon every major plot point in "King Lear" from
its alternate perspective, the film's narrative flow suffers,
lurching back and forth and resulting in inconsistent
characterization and erratic behaviour in service of the plot.
The early scenes in A THOUSAND ACRES are particularly problematic, as
characters seem to change their behaviour depending upon which way
the wind is blowing.  Featuring an absurd amount of unnecessary and
extraneous voice-over by narrator Ginny, the first hour of the film
seems more like a sequence of vaguely interrelated scenes rather than
a cohesive introduction, and while they clearly aspire to be moving
-- Richard Hartley's stirring score, virtually omnipresent at the
outset, at times obscures the dialogue -- there's ultimately no real
payoff, and it's easy to become distanced by the sudsy storyline.
A THOUSAND ACRES takes an irrevocable turn about halfway through the
film, effectively demonizing Larry, and by association, his
supportive daughter Caroline, and canonizing Ginny and Rose.  It's at
this point where the film begins to collapse in on itself, as all
subtlety inferred in the familial relationships is lost, and where
stunning revelations fraught with heavy doses of melodrama become par
for the course.  The film quickly loses interest in Larry and
Caroline and focuses upon the sisterly relationship between Ginny and
Rose; it's telling how inconsequential Larry and Caroline become that
their eventual fates are left as a throwaway piece of narration.
And yet, due to the performances and the handsome cinematography by
Tak Fujimoto, it all almost works.  Ms. Lange and Ms. Pfeiffer turn
in superb performances as the film's leading characters; Ms. Lange
portrays great depth and thoughtfulness in her moving turn as Ginny,
whose pleasant nature masks her struggle with long-buried repression,
while Ms. Pfeiffer is equally mesmerizing as the blunt, forthright
Rose.  She demonstrates an emotional volatility and edginess rarely
seen in any of her other film performances (ironically, reminiscent
however to Ms. Lange's previous work), and Ms. Pfeiffer's icy,
unblinking stares convey a torrent of spiteful emotion.  Ms. Lange
and Ms. Pfeiffer have great screen chemistry, and these performances
are indeed so strong that they serve to emphasize the weaknesses in
the film; one is so impressed with their individual performances that
they are left wondering how much more effective they would be had
they been in service of involving characters in a film less cumbered
by artifice and not nearly as intent on tugging heartstrings.
The remainder of the cast is quite capable. Ms. Leigh and Mr.
Robards, both underused in A THOUSAND ACRES, share an easy affable
chemistry onscreen -- no surprise: where do you think she got the
name 'Jason' for her stage name, after all?  The remainder of the
more-prominent male characters have little depth.  Keith Carradine is
fine as Ginny's dignified husband Ty (correlating to "King Lear"'s
Duke Of Albany), while Kevin Anderson is again fairly wooden and
quite uninteresting as Rose's destructive husband Peter.  Colin Firth
is uncompelling as Jess Clark, but he's not given much material with
which to work -- his superfluous character adds nothing to the film
(Ginny could have easily been stirred out of her stupor in another,
more effective manner than through the use of his character) -- and
frankly seems extraneous to the story, save for the ill-conceived
need to remain near-religously faithful to the original source
material.
Ms. Moorehouse reportedly was extremely displeased that her final cut
of A THOUSAND ACRES was discarded in place of the one currently seen
on the finished product, and threatened to go the Alan Smithee route
by removing her name from the project.  As can be seen by the
direction credit, she was eventually appeased, but I, for one, would
be curious to see how her cut of the film plays.  If it's any easier
to become involved with these characters and their dilemmas, it'll be
an improvement, but the problem ultimately lies with Ms. Jones'
unfocused, vastly-overwritten screenplay; consequently, any
improvements would be minor, incremental ones.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Man, that was a big spider.  It was so big I thought I saw a small dog
 caught in its web.  We are talking big.  That spider could've kicked
 Charlotte's ass." - Hope Davis, THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS

Title
Review for Full Tilt Boogie (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
In late January 1996, Miramax released an odd little hybrid film from
their genre label Dimension Films.  FROM DUSK TILL DAWN, a gloriously
campy crime thriller/vampire horror B-film, based on Quentin
Tarantino's first screenplay and directed by Robert Rodriguez (of EL
MARIACHI and DESPERADO fame), marked the first feature film of TV
heartthrob George Clooney since skyrocketing to fame with the
popularity of the hit medical drama ER, and surprised the film
industry by exploding onto the market, scoring an unexpected $13.2
million domestic in its opening week and heralding Mr. Clooney as a
rarity -- an actor with the genuine screen presence to successfully
bridge the gap between TV-based fame and a prominent film career.
FULL TILT BOOGIE, the directorial debut of Sarah Kelly, is a
behind-the-scenes look at the filming of FROM DUSK TILL DAWN, but it
differs from typical "Making Of Film X" documentaries in that its
primary focus is the daily activities on a film set, as opposed to
the creative filmmaking process, and consequently a great deal of
screentime is devoted to members of the film crew usually overlooked
in films of these sorts -- the ADs, the caterers, the drivers, the
gaffers, the key grips, the personal assistants, and so on.  The film
not only serves as a document of the struggles and ordeals
encountered during the filming of FROM DUSK TILL DAWN, but also as a
basic introduction to the mechanics of a film production.
John Carpenter once remarked that, contrary to what one might
believe, there is usually more of a festive mood on the sets of
horror films than most other types of movies.  Such was certainly the
case during the shoot of FROM DUSK TILL DAWN, which at times
resembles a ten-week frat party as much as it does a film production;
despite occasional setbacks during filming, such as an
overly-ambitious explosion resulting in heavy damage to the Titty
Twister set and a blinding dust storm causing the postponement of the
day's shoot, the cast and crew seem to be having a smashing good
time.  Ms. Kelly, who first met Mr. Tarantino during the shoot of
Rory Kelly's SLEEP WITH ME (she was credited as key set production
assistant) and is clearly on friendly terms with both he and Mr.
Rodriguez, was given seemingly near-unlimited access to film both on-
and off-set activities, and much of FULL TILT BOOGIE shows the cast
and crew at play: beer-ladened hotel parties in the evenings (the
provision of free alcohol seemed to receive an inordinate number of
mentions as a favourite fringe by the interviewed crew), the
principal cast kicking back at a karaoke bar in Barstow, Texas (where
Juliette Lewis belts out her rendition of 4 Non Blondes' "What's Up?"
-- "Nice voice," remarks a surprised bar manager), and a mischievous
contest for "Best Butt" on the set.  During shooting, Mr. Clooney is
seen as eminently approachable, winning over the crew with his
playfulness and down-to-earth charm, and is frequently caught
flirting with the female crew members.  Mr. Rodriguez seems to be
directing the film with his guitar perpetually strapped over his
shoulder, relaxingly strumming between takes.  Ms. Lewis is more
guarded, but is clearly enjoying herself, and Mr. Tarantino is seen
amiably flittering about around the set.  FULL TILT BOOGIE depicts
the FROM DUSK TILL DAWN shoot as remarkably friendly and great fun,
with the only complaints being the generic ones: long hours and bad
food.  (Ms. Kelly was worried at one point that she'd be unable to
dredge up any negatives at all from the high-spirited crew.)
FULL TILT BOOGIE also skillfully handles the more-familiar aspects of
filmmaking documentaries.  The filming of scenes from FROM DUSK TILL
DAWN are included, such as the fiery stunt sequence at Benny's World
Of Liquor as well as the shooting of the subsequent explosion, and
candid interviews of the filmmakers and many of the cast are featured
in Ms. Kelly's film.  Unlike other behind-the-scenes documentaries,
where interview segments come off as carefully rehearsed and
impersonal, there is a casualness and spontaneity apparent as Ms.
Kelly conducts her interviews, which results in more revealing and
certainly more entertaining sound bites.  Her weeks on the set,
creating trust and a sense of familiarity with her subjects,
certainly pay off in this respect -- the interviews play off more as
friendly conversations than standard recitations of key pat phrases.
It however did apparently not work with Harvey Keitel, who chose not
to participate in the making of the documentary as noted in a sour,
obviously bitter title card midway through the film.  Smarmily noting
that Keitel claimed to be on the set to film FROM DUSK TILL DAWN
exclusively, and not to additionally participate in the making of
FULL TILT BOOGIE, this petty sniping is a low point in the film, and
the decision for Ms. Kelly to carry her spitefulness into her
documentary is a wrongheaded one which leaves a bitter aftertaste.
Perhaps the most interesting section of FULL TILT BOOGIE deals with
the politicized issues faced by FROM DUSK TILL DAWN's filmmakers
during their tumultuous shoot.  FROM DUSK TILL DAWN used a non-union
crew during production, and consequently were targeted for strike
action by IATSE, who threatened to shut down filming.  The political
maneuvering is intriguing and brings some drama to the film, although
FULL TILT BOOGIE's perspective of the situation is sadly a bit
one-sided: FROM DUSK TILL DAWN producer Lawrence Bender and Mr.
Rodriguez discuss their reactions and opinions of the union threat at
several points in the documentary, but unfortunately IATSE head Lyle
Trachtenberg, when finally tracked down by Ms. Kelly and her crew in
an investigative reporting-styled blitzkrieg on the IATSE union
convention (which amusingly was shown to have subsequently made
headlines in Daily Variety) refused to speak on camera with her due
to Ms. Kelly's perceived "associations" with the FROM DUSK TILL DAWN
production.
With the exclusion of the coverage of the IATSE conflict, FULL TILT
BOOGIE is not a solemn, formal, staid documentary about the FROM DUSK
TILL DAWN shoot; it's exuberantly cheerful and often very funny.
Much of the high spirits and cheerfulness on the FROM DUSK TILL DAWN
shoot comes across in Ms. Kelly's documentary, and she also playfully
stages a particularly amusing introductory scene where Mr. Clooney
and Mr. Tarantino, in costume as Seth and Richard Gecko,
respectively, wander the halls in search of the set and are accosted
by geeky autograph-seeking fanboys.  ("I quit school for you!"
squeals one.)  While trashing the fanboys with sneers, shoves and
disdain, Mr. Clooney and Mr. Tarantino later encounter and
affectionately embrace an autograph-seeking fangirl.
Strangely enough for a documentary dealing with the shooting of a
feature film, previous familiarity with FULL TILT BOOGIE's subject,
FROM DUSK TILL DAWN, is helpful, but not at all imperative.  (The
documentary does open with the outrageous full theatrical trailer for
Mr. Rodriguez's film, which is already beginning to seem dated -- the
joke in the "Interviews. No vampires." tag may be lost to those who
have already understandably forgotten about Neil Jordan's INTERVIEW
WITH THE VAMPIRE.)  FULL TILT BOOGIE is a joyous (almost *too* joyous
-- the group cavorting sequence is a bit too happy and sunny) and
often interesting document on the rigours of shooting a film and the
close bonds developed by tight-knit teamwork, and should be of
particular interest to those curious about filmmaking.  While it
doesn't capture the tedium associated with shooting a film, Ms.
Kelly's film superbly captures the experience of being on a film set.
I wonder if a similar documentary is in the works for the planned
prequel to FROM DUSK TILL DAWN?
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Man, that was a big spider.  It was so big I thought I saw a small dog
 caught in its web.  We are talking big.  That spider could've kicked
 Charlotte's ass." - Hope Davis, THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS

Title
Review for Bastard Out of Carolina (1996)
(1996)
Starring Jennifer Jason Leigh, Ron Eldard, Glenne Headley, Lyle Lovett,
   Jena Malone, Dermot Mulroney, Christina Ricci
Screenplay by Anne Meredith, based on the book by Dorothy Allison
Produced by Amanda DiGiulio
Directed by Anjelica Huston
Running time: 97 minutes
For more than a decade, Anjelica Huston has been one of America's
finest actresses.  In her directorial debut, BASTARD OUT OF CAROLINA,
based upon Dorothy Allison's largely autobiographical book on child
abuse and poverty in the South, Huston displays impressive proficiency
behind the camera as well.
The film tells the story of Ruth Anne Boatwright, nicknamed Bone by
one of her uncles at birth, in post-World War II South Carolina.
Through voice-over (narration done by Laura Dern), we find that she
nearly didn't survive birth, as her single mother Anney, played by
Jennifer Jason Leigh, was thrown through the windshield during an
automobile accident.  That's just the beginning of her troubles.
Bone is deemed illegitimate on her birth certificate, a social stigma
which her mother and her large poor family obsesses over for years
to come.
Anney meets and weds Lyle, a kind man and good stepfather whom gives
Bone a baby sister before dying in an automobile accident.  Anney's
brother Earle, played by Michael Rooker, introduces her to Glen,
played by Ron Eldard, a co-worker at the mill.  Glen, the black
sheep of a wealthy family ("When are you gonna make your daddy proud?
I'll tell you when - never!" he's told) and filled with bitterness,
courts Anney and eventually wins her, despite warnings of a violent
temper.  When Anney miscarries with his much-prized baby boy, Glen loses
his capability to supress his violent outbursts and begins to direct
them at Bone, beating and abusing her, while the love-dependent Anney
tries to turn a blind eye and justify his behaviour.  Things turn for
the worse when Glen loses his job and the family of four sink into
impoverishment.
While set several decades ago, this story remains completely relevant
in today's society, where abused wives return to their husbands, and
abuse committed against children by one spouse is routinely overlooked
by the other.
The real star of this domestic drama is not top-billed Jennifer
Jason Leigh, but child actress Jena Malone, who plays Bone in a
wrenching and wholly impressive debut performance.  Her work is
of award-calibre, and in this age in which a preponderence of
superb child performers have emerged (Kirsten Dunst, Tina Majorino,
Anna Paquin, Natalie Portman, Christina Ricci, Elijah Wood), Malone's
performance stands up well.  Leigh's performance in BASTARD OUT OF
CAROLINA is fine, although she's not really given much to do, and
Ron Eldard work is very solid, skillfully manouvering his character's
moods in and out of explosive rage.  One can always sense that
underneath his Glen is a pressure-cooker ticking away.  Of the
supporting cast, special note must be made of the criminally
underrated Michael Rooker's performance.
There's a bit too much generic formulaism in the screenplay for my
taste, from the various characters spouting off country bumpkinisms,
to the familiar sight of a dried-up uptight wise old Granny (played
by Grace Zabriskie) sitting on the porch rocking chair, to impassioned
soliloquies better suited for a stage performance.  Still, it cannot
be denied that Anne Meredith's screenplay contains a wallop of
emotional power.
Huston's direction of the film is surehanded and impressive, giving
the film good pacing and eliciting good performances from her cast,
particularly the young Malone.  Her sequences of child abuse are shot
in a hard-hitting emotional, rather than graphic, manner, and are
very effective.  Huston's talent with camera positioning is wonderful,
from a visually striking shot done through a fan, to an extended
sequence in the front seat of an automobile.
The film has the toned-down feel of a television production; BASTARD
OUT OF CAROLINA was originally composed and cut for broadcast on the
TNT cable station, who ended up declining the film due to sentiments
that scenes of abuse and rape in the film were too disturbingly
realistic for their audience.  Perhaps some sequences of the film
may be unpleasant, but as a whole BASTARD OUT OF CAROLINA adds up
to a powerful viewer experience worth seeing.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
THE X-FILES (Fox - 1998)
Starring David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau,
  Armin Mueller-Stahl, Blythe Danner, William B. Davis, John Neville
Screenplay by Chris Carter
Produced by Chris Carter, Daniel Sackheim
Directed by Rob Bowman
Running time: 120 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   I feel obliged to begin by clarifying that I'm not exactly an ardent
   follower of THE X-FILES, the acclaimed Fox sci-fi television series
   which began its run five years ago as a bottom-dweller in the Neilsen
   ratings only to steadily gain momentum and evolve from a beloved cult
   fave into a outright mainstream phenomenon and bonafide international
   hit.  I've watched about a dozen episodes of the TV show in full --
   easily less than the typical rabid fan, but sufficient to be familiar
   with the histories and adventures of FBI agents Scully and Mulder.
   (Additionally, one of my current occupational hazards finds me privy
   to amusingly avid, earnest discussion and reverential dissection of
   the storylines for such TV series as THE X-FILES, STAR TREK: VOYAGER,
   and BABYLON 5 -- in short, I couldn't get away from the show if I
   tried.)  In all fairness, Chris Carter's creation is probably one of
   the most imaginative of today's television shows, and has
   demonstrably struck a chord with the highly-coveted 15 - 24
   demographic, making it an optimal candidate for translation to the
   big screen.
   However, as a film THE X-FILES (the FIGHT THE FUTURE subtitle
   featured so prominently in its marketing campaign incidentally
   appears nowhere during the title credits) faces some unique
   challenges.  As with all television series-turned-cinematic events,
   it's required to present sufficient backstory in order for newcomers
   to get up to speed while still remaining palatable to the faithful.
   The situation here, however, is even more of a precarious balancing
   act -- as a rare TV series to make the leap to the silver screen in
   the midst of its ongoing run, it's faced with the obstacle of
   unraveling its intricately-woven storyline to a point where a
   satisfying film conclusion can be achieved, yet is obligated to leave
   enough plot points unanswered in order to keep fans hooked for the
   upcoming television season.
   As such, the film fares about as well as can be expected.  Familiar
   regulars of the series such as The Lone Gunmen (Dean Haglund, Bruce
   Harwood and Tom Braidwood), The Cigarette-Smoking Man (William B.
   Davis), The Well-Manicured Man (John Neville), and assistant FBI
   director Walter Skinner (Mitch Pileggi) are trotted out for their
   obligatory appearances, while the film infuses prodigious veteran
   talents like Martin Landau, Armin Mueller-Stahl and Blythe Danner in
   newly-conceived roles.
   Ultimately, however, the addition of new blood matters little, for
   THE X-FILES is most assuredly a vehicle for the continuing mythos of
   agents Dana Scully (Gillian Anderson) and Fox Mulder (David
   Duchovny) as they strive to uncover the truth behind the sinister
   government conspiracy to discredit evidence pertaining to the
   existence of extraterrestrial life here on Earth.  Resuming where the
   '97-'98 TV season cliffhanger left off, the film finds our intrepid
   duo struggling against a powerful faction of master manipulators to
   overcome roadblocks thrown up from every direction as their own
   gravely somber interpersonal chemistry continues to evolve.  (One
   rather disingenuous subplot falls victim to the awkward circumstances
   constraining the film -- while it's always a stretch to envision one
   of the protagonists surrendering the good fight, it's virtually
   impossible to swallow here given that the character threatening to
   quit is the same one we'll see on the tube in September when the
   series resumes.)
   It's perhaps inappropriate to dismiss the film as simply a
   larger-scaled version of one of the TV episodes given the presence of
   strikingly atypical elements which are clearly aimed to broaden its
   mainstream appeal.  Unlike its dour tube counterpart, THE X-FILES is
   notably more jokey, with Scully and Mulder trading the occasional
   tongue-in-cheek quip and droll one-liner.  (The rooftop scene which
   introduces our heroes is particularly self-conscious, calculatingly
   playing riffs almost as if directly out of a buddy movie.)  The sense
   of humour isn't particularly clever and not exactly welcome, although
   I did appreciate the light-hearted jab at Mr. Duchovny's legendary
   expressive qualities.
   Where the film differs the most from the TV series is in its usage of
   extravagant set pieces, including the bombing of a Dallas federal
   office tower (in shades of the infamous 1995 Oklahoma City event), a
   cat-and-mouse helicopter chase through cornfields (an obvious homage
   to NORTH BY NORTHWEST), and even an action finale in the snowy
   reaches of Antarctica.  These showy sequences, competently staged in
   the film, are virtually impossible to pull off under the budgetary
   and time constraints of a TV series but fit quite nicely within the
   scope of a summer event film.  Whether or not they properly coalesce
   with a piece like THE X-FILES, however, is a matter of debate.
   The show has always been at its best as an enigmatic, paranoiac
   meditative with a pervasive atmosphere of mistrust, and consequently
   it seems a bit off-kilter to witness the film as opened-up to such a
   degree.  The small-scaled, low-key approach employed in the TV series
   is most effective in conveying its grim, creepy tone; it's no
   coincidence that the scenes in the film which remain most truthful to
   the spirit of the series -- the shady exchanges between Mulder and
   Dr. Kurtzweil in the darkened alleys -- are the most effective.  With
   THE X-FILES, bigger is not necessarily better.
   It's also a bit disconcerting to witness how gleefully THE X-FILES
   embraces the slam-bam mentality of the typical Hollywood action
   flick.  The novelty of the television series is that it's a show
   propelled by ideas and imagination, and yet in the film we're reduced
   to watching Mulder heroically charging through the snow like a
   scrawnier, dapper Arnold Schwarzenegger clone to come to the rescue
   of imprisoned damsel-in-distress Scully, a perturbing step backward
   from the equal status the partners unquestionably share as TV
   characters.  If joining the Hollywood brethren on the big screen
   implies that THE X-FILES is going to hereinafter *emulate* them at
   the cost of its foreboding signature style, perhaps it's best to stay
   on its home turf.
   Bridging the fifth and sixth seasons of the TV series, the film
   version of THE X-FILES ultimately resolves very little of its
   outstanding mysteries, as it logically must.  As the film concludes,
   in many ways we've traveled shockingly little from where we were as
   the opening credits rolled, and yet it's not a dissatisfactory watch,
   liberally sprinkling adventure, conflict, and verve into its mix of
   aliens, conspiracies, and overcoats.  Given the involved nature of
   its storyline, it likely plays plays best to those who have invested
   much into its characters.

Title
Review for Ponette (1996)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
It is certain that the lion's share of attention that Jacques
Doillon's film, PONETTE, has drawn is due to the acclaim heaped upon
the performance by the film's lead, Victoire Thivisol, who grabbed
headlines and turned heads when she was awarded the Best Actress
prize in a unanimous decision in September 1996 at the prestiguous
Venice Film Festival. The kicker is that Ms. Thivisol was *four
years old* when PONETTE was filmed.
I have always considered it condescending and somewhat insulting to
differentiate quality of any type of work based solely upon age
(random example: "that film review was pretty inept, but *he's only
a teenager*, cut him some slack"), so it should be pointed out that
Ms. Thivisol's performance is not simply excellent *for a child
actor* or excellent *for a four-year old* -- her performance is
simply excellent *period*, no qualifiers necessary. It's a truly
incredible piece of work -- bold, poised, and completely
true-to-life without seeming remotely forced or artificial. Ms.
Thivisol demonstrates a remarkable sense of ease in front of the
camera with astonishing emotional volatility, and glimpses in her
phenomenal work in PONETTE are perhaps the definitive cinematic
portrayal of grief.
It is important that Ms. Thivisol is superb in the title role of the
film, since the nature of PONETTE virtually demands her to be nothing
short of excellence; her performance is absolutely critical to the
success of the film. PONETTE's storyline is a fairly straightforward
one - young Ponette, left with a broken arm from an automobile
accident, is told by her father that her mother has died in the
crash, and spends the remainder of the film coming to terms with this
loss. PONETTE focuses intently on Ms. Thivisol, who has a daunting
amount of screentime, and anything short of a superb performance by
her would have shattered the aura of authenticity permeating the film
and resulted in a work which would have seemed more contrived and
melodramatic.
While I was captivated by the wonderful performance of little Ms.
Thivisol and her castmates (child performers Matiaz Bureau and
Delphine Schiltz, playing Ponette's cousins who try to help in her
healing process, are also nothing short of outstanding), I was also
acutely aware that very little was occuring onscreen -- the film
tends to become somewhat repetitive in the second act, rehashing the
same motifs. This material seemed to be overextended for a
feature-length film, even one that has a relatively short running
time of 92 minutes, and could have been much more powerful had it
been trimmed down significantly.
Mr. Doillon, perhaps aware of the lack of material in PONETTE and
enraptured by the performance coaxed from Ms. Thivisol, consequently
spends a great deal of time with lingering close-ups of her. Too much
of the film involves grief-stricken Ponette bursting into tears,
which is always affecting but begins to lose its emotional impact
when repeated incessantly.
The ultimate resolution of PONETTE is inevitable from the outset of
the film, but I question whether or not it was wise for Mr. Doillon
to approach it in such a literal fashion -- on its own, independent
of the rest of the film, it works well, as Marie Trintignant and Ms.
Thivisol play well off each other and demonstrate an easy fluidity
(although in terms of pacing their scene could stand to be
shortened), but given the naturalistic tone of set by the preceding
scenes in PONETTE, it seemed vaguely out of place within the context
of film. I am also unconvinced that Mr. Doillon successfully
extracted the raw emotional power of the film's final scene,
resulting in a conclusion which is only halfheartedly cathartic.
Many of the film's great moments involves the interplay between
Ponette and her cousins Matiaz and Delphine, and later between the
three children and the other youngsters at the boarding school. It is
fascinating to watch them naively and guilessly discuss and attempt
to grasp such involved, challenging abstractions as death, heaven,
God, and reincarnation, stripping down many of the theological
discussions to their basic elements in the manner that only young
children, free from preconceptions or prejudices, are able to do.
Perhaps the most remarkable aspect of Mr. Doillon's PONETTE, other
than the astonishing way in which he elicits outstanding performances
from his predominantly young cast, is how he easily infiltrates the
mind of a young child, and immerses the film in elemental simplicity
to such an extent that the audience is coerced into observing the
proceedings though unsullied eyes, with childlike perception.
Watching PONETTE harkens back to an easier, more innocent time, where
issues and concepts of complexity could be satisfactorily addressed
with seemingly crystal clarity by simple answers.

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
200 CIGARETTES (Paramount - 1999)
Cast: Ben Affleck, Casey Affleck, David Chappelle, Guillermo Diaz,
      Angela Featherstone, Janeane Garofalo, Gaby Hoffmann,
      Kate Hudson, Catherine Kellner, Courtney Love, Brian McCardie,
      Jay Mohr, Nicole Parker, Martha Plimpton, Christina Ricci,
      Paul Rudd
Screenplay by Shana Larsen
Produced by Betsy Beers, David Gale and Van Toffler
Directed by Risa Bramon Garcia
Running time: 101 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Industry cynics and detractors of the recent groundbreaking agreement
   between Columbia and top WGA screenwriters need only consider Risa
   Bramon Garcia's feature film debut 200 CIGARETTES to be persuaded of
   the necessity of a good script.  Shana Larsen's tepid, exasperating
   screenplay is so consistently witless that even the gifted ensemble
   cast on display here is largely helpless to salvage much of
   consequence from this mess.
   In this case, it's a remarkable assemblage of thesps: the list of
   players reads like a roll-call of some of Hollywood's most promising
   and appealing young actors.  Among them include Martha Plimpton, a
   consistently underappreciated talent; Janeane Garofalo, who
   invariably can be counted upon to walk in and steal the scene in
   everything she does; Paul Rudd, such an affable presence in CLUELESS
   (and who survived the lame THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION); Courtney
   Love, whose beguiling turn in THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT was a
   revelation; Christina Ricci, now clearly among the top actors of her
   generation; and both Affleck brothers (Casey provided particularly
   strong support in TO DIE FOR).  These are performers whose mere
   presence in a film would merit minor interest -- package them all
   into one movie, and my curiosity is piqued.
   Crushingly, the cast is wasted in a tawdry collection of would-be
   comic pratfalls, paired off in meandering threads to preen and
   screech and volley lousy dialogue back and forth.  The whiny
   characters are so thoroughly and relentlessly obnoxious (save for
   Kate Hudson's poised, prim young lady, who naturally become the butt
   of the picture's running gag and gets to spend half the movie
   wandering through scenes with dog excrement liberally smeared on her
   jacket -- yes, this is indicative of the film's level of humour) that
   none of the subplots are remotely engaging.  The rambling multiple
   storylines weave and ultimately intersect during the
   seemingly-interminable running time, but I'd hesitate to describe the
   overly-cluttered 200 CIGARETTES as Altmanesque: here's a film where
   the destination is not only inevitable, but it's no fun getting
   there, either.
   Set in New York City's East Village on New Year's Eve, 1981, the
   theme of the film is, of course, love -- or at least its distant
   cousin, sex.  On their way to a party, in rapid succession we
   regretfully meet our dozen-odd characters: longtime pals Kevin (Mr.
   Rudd) and Lucy (Ms. Love), who may or may not take their friendship
   to the next level; neurotic party host Monica (Ms. Plimpton) and
   ex-flame Eric (Brian McCardle), who analyse their failed
   relationship in pseudo-comic fashion; Val (Ms. Ricci) and Stephie
   (Gaby Hoffman), who (in the movie's most ineffectual subplot) teeter
   around in high heels and constantly squabble with ridiculously
   unauthentic accents while in frantic search of the festivities;
   Bridget (Nicole Parker) and Caitlyn (Angela Featherstone), scrambling
   to find some male companionship of the one-night stand ilk before the
   stroke of midnight, and so on.  Ambling through the threads is Disco
   Cabbie (Dave Chapelle), suavely doling out sagelike advice like a
   Venus Flytrap on wheels.
   Although the ostensible destination is Monica's year-end bash, amidst
   the overbroad slapstick it remains clear that the plot-thin picture's
   interest lies with the humour-tinged dissection of the convoluted
   nature of relationships amongst the self-absorbed twentysomething
   crowd depicted here: in this respect, it's a bit like a Kevin Smith
   script -- albeit without clever dialogue, wryly astute observation,
   endearing characters and Star Wars references, which doesn't leave it
   with very much.  Love can be funny, in all sense of the word, but
   with these repugnant characters run through such startlingly unfunny
   scenarios, it's all too easy to not give a hoot about their romantic
   fates.
   The only thing this excruciating picture has going for it is its
   retro soundtrack, chock-ladened with pop hits of the era -- some 49
   in total -- which run throughout the entire film to evoke the period
   (although the gaudy costume work is more than enough to consequently
   negate this).  Befitting a casting director in her helming debut, Ms.
   Garcia has filled the picture with much talent -- I have to assume
   that the cast was largely drawn to this venture because of her
   relative clout (casting credits include such big-budget Hollywood
   spectacles as TWISTER, THE PEACEMAKER, SPEED 2, and HARD RAIN) --
   only to maddeningly see it go to waste.  For the most part, the cast
   are real troupers and dutifully wade through this morass of tripe
   (Ms. Garofalo arguably comes off the best, although Ben Affleck goes
   through the picture with a vaguely pained expression with which I
   could empathise), but are understandably unable to surmount the level
   of this material.  A superior showcase for Kate Hudson, Casey Affleck
   and Christina Ricci would be the upcoming Morgan J. Freeman film
   DESERT BLUE -- but then again, this isn't too difficult of a feat.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"X-FILES fans come up to me in malls expecting me to be able to fill them
 in on the whole conspiracy.  Half the time I have no idea what they're
 talking about." - Martin Landau

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
GODZILLA (TriStar - 1998)
Starring Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria
Screenplay by Dean Devlin & Roland Emmerich
Produced by Dean Devlin
Directed by Roland Emmerich
Running time: 138 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   After months of speculation, the secret is finally out.  The team
   behind GODZILLA have gone to extreme lengths to keep the revamped
   look of the new monster under wraps for the past ten months, even
   obligating cast and crew to sign strict confidential agreements.  The
   teasers and trailers have deliberately revealed precious little, as
   well -- a scaly foot here, an enormous eye there.  Well, to much
   media frenzy, the eagerly-awaited film has finally been unveiled, and
   the truth can be revealed.  It's big.  It's green.  It's reptilian.
   I mean, come on, this is Godzilla -- what *else* is it supposed to
   look like?
   The appearance of the mighty behemoth is the least of the concerns
   for the filmmaking team of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin, who
   previously brought forth the 1996 smash hit INDEPENDENCE DAY.
   Working from a story they conceived along with Ted Elliott and Terry
   Rossio, GODZILLA has an utterly hackneyed, inane screenplay -- but
   with a film like this, perhaps that's as it should be; anything with
   a shred of legitimacy would probably only serve to underline just how
   ridiculous the premise of a giant lizard stampeding through a
   metropolitan center truly is.
   The original 1954 Japanese film, GOJIRA (released domestically as
   GODZILLA, KING OF THE MONSTERS) was at its heart a cautionary tale
   about the dangers of nuclear escalation.  This new production doesn't
   carry such lofty messages -- and perhaps wisely so; poorly handled,
   and it'd be SUPERMAN IV: THE QUEST FOR PEACE all over again -- but it
   remains faithful to its predecessor in respect to the beast's origin
   as an unforeseen side effect of nuclear testing.  Incorporating
   actual footage of the Abel, Baker, and Castle Bravo test blasts of
   the early 1950s in an inspired, moody opening, Godzilla's inception
   here is from an reptile egg irradiated by fallout from French nuclear
   testing in the South Pacific.
   It doesn't take long for the big guy to get into action.  Sinking a
   Japanese fishing ship with the greatest of ease, only glimpses of the
   amphibious monster are revealed during the attack, and it's not until
   it reaches its final destination that the reinvented beast is
   completely revealed.
   In the meantime, we're introduced to Howdy Doody hero Dr. Niko
   Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick), a biologist from the U.S. Nuclear
   Regulatory Commission who studies effects of radiation leakage.
   Whisked away from his Chernobyl earthworm studies (I am not joking)
   by the military in order to examine the irradiated wreckage of the
   Japanese vessel, he repeatedly encounters mysterious Frenchman
   Philippe Roache, who, accompanied by a small entourage of fellow
   countrymen (all of which are amusingly named Jean-something), may or
   may not be a mere insurance company representative.  (My bet would
   be: not.)  Mr. Broderick imbues his character with such flagrant
   ingenuousness that a scene where a pull-back reveals him obliviously
   standing in the depths of a gargantuan footprint, intended to strike
   awe into the hearts of the audience, only serves to make his
   character appear like a floundering idiot.
   Our other two protagonists are found in New York City, "the city that
   never sleeps" according to Sinatra and the text crawl which
   introduces the bustling metropolis -- given the ominous aesthetic Mr.
   Emmerich aims for, it might have been better described as the city
   where it never stops raining.  In an insipid thread, Audrey Timmonds
   (Maria Pitillo) is spinning her wheels as assistant to egotistical
   hotshot TV news anchor Charles Caimain (Harry Shearer).  Stifled in
   her attempts at career advancement to full-fledged on-air
   correspondent, she spends much of her time bemoaning her woes to a
   sympathetic Victor "Animal" Palotti (Hank Azaria), a rough-'n-tumble,
   ready-for-anything TV cameraman.  Luckily for the frustrated Audrey,
   she just so happens to be the former flame of Nik, which
   automatically means by the end of this film, she'll have fulfilled
   her career aspirations in triumphant fashion, and outwrangled her
   oppressive, villainous superior to boot.
   Although the film's four protagonists are human, the real star of the
   show is Godzilla, and when it finally makes its bow in the
   waterlogged Big Apple, it's quite a sight to behold.  The shots of
   the monster are suitably impressive, if not quite awe-inspiring; it's
   not a CGI effect that hasn't been seen before in the JURASSIC PARK
   pictures -- it's only bigger.  In fact, the creature's sheer
   magnitude is somewhat problematic in that it's vaguely offputting --
   it's *too* big.  Size *does* matter, but when the beast towers over
   the city to the degree that it does here, it becomes increasingly
   distant and uninvolving, and Godzilla loses some of its indescribable
   charisma -- an important factor here, since the filmmakers are
   clearly aiming for the audience to sympathize with the giant reptile,
   at least to some degree.  Gone is the cheerfully malevolent Godzilla
   of old, toppling buildings left and right as it stomped its way
   through anything in its path -- our new-age Godzilla is much more
   tidy, accidentally leaving in its wake a path of destruction as it
   thoughtfully navigates up and down city streets and boulevards.  And
   this fearful Godzilla actually flees from its minuscule human
   attackers!  Where have you gone, Godzilla Senior?
   Predictably, I found myself rooting for the marauding Godzilla rather
   than our heroes -- not because the filmmakers were successful in
   winning audience empathy for the beast ("It's only an animal," whines
   sensitive, ecologically-minded Dr. Tatopoulos), but by default, since
   all of the human characters are so inept that it's impossible to
   cheer for them.  The military, in particular, is woefully pathetic;
   they're suffering from stormtrooper-itis, unable to hit a target 200
   feet high.  I felt like running up with a can of red paint and
   marking a giant bullseye on Godzilla's back in the hopes that it
   might help.
   Dr. Tatopoulos hypothesizes that Godzilla has traveled to New York in
   order to lay its eggs; the military dismisses this as preposterous
   and refuses to heed his warning, so by default you know that he's
   right.  Consequently, while the armed forces lick their wounds and
   prepare for a rematch with the big green guy, Tatopoulos and Roache's
   team, trailed by newshungry Audrey and Animal, inflitrate the
   evacuated city in search of Godzilla's nest, eventually finding
   hundreds slimy eggs within the devastated confines of Madison Square
   Garden.  (What, no Yankee Stadium?)  While fumbling Audrey and Animal
   finally reveal their presence, Roache's squadron set out to destroy
   the nest with explosive devices, while Ripley torches the eggs with
   her flamethrower.  Whoops, wrong movie.  And when an irate Godzilla
   itself stumbles onto the scene, we're set for an action-packed finale
   where our four protagonists confronts the giant lizard.  "Mommy's
   very angry," whispers one character as the reptile bellows in rage.
   Whoops, wrong movie.
   While the film is often inconsistent with respect to Godzilla's
   abilities (how can the beast outrace attack choppers in one chase
   scene, yet is unable to keep up with an old clunky automobile in
   another?  I guess its fish diet binging hampered its mobility), some
   of the action sequences are entertaining.  The cat-and-mouse game
   with the infant 'zillas in Madison Square Garden is old hat after
   similar sequences in the Spielberg JURASSIC PARK pictures, but
   they're sufficiently well-executed by Mr. Emmerich to be exciting.
   For Gothamites, there's much to cheer about as various familiar city
   landmarks are depicted in various states of disarray in the wake of
   Godzilla's destructive path; in a scene which ends with the
   exclamatory instruction to destroy MSG, I wouldn't be surprised to
   learn that New York prints of the film have applause cues here.
   The monster scenes are adequate, but any time people are onscreen
   instead of the creature, there's an overwhelming compulsion to give
   the film the MST3K treatment.  The character development is anemic,
   and the gags and one-liners are outright pathetic (even the Siskel &
   Ebert spoof is milked a bit too far; I wonder if Ebert minded,
   though, since the Gene character was his subordinate).  None of the
   human characters are remotely engaging, and the dialogue is utterly
   banal.  In fact, the human side of the story, with its various inane
   subplots, is so blissfully hackneyed that it begins to take on a life
   of its own.  It's so ridiculously weak that I could barely contain
   myself from chortling anytime anyone said anything.  GODZILLA is a
   film best approached if you're prepare to laugh; otherwise, you'll
   just end up groaning a lot.
   Of course, one might have hoped for a bit more than just a good bad
   movie from a project budgeted at $120 million.  With regards to the
   genre, Mr. Broderick commented, "You have to care about the people
   being chased by aliens or monsters for the movie to work.  Otherwise,
   it's just a bunch of explosions and special effects."  Exactly.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
STARSHIP TROOPERS (TriStar - 1997)
Starring Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake Busey,
  Neil Patrick Harris, Clancy Brown, Seth Gilliam, Patrick Muldoon,
  Michael Ironside
Screenplay by Ed Neumeier, based on the novel by Robert A. Heinlein
Produced by Jon Davison, Alan Marshall
Directed by Paul Verhoeven
Running time: 129 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   I screened STARSHIP TROOPERS at a theatre in Ottawa that, to me, had
   a rather unusual policy -- while an earlier-scheduled screening ran,
   ticketholders for a later screening of the film were queued *directly
   outside* the screening room, in the lobby, until the completion of
   the current screening.  (For all I know, this may be standard
   practice elsewhere, but I've never encountered this before -- usually
   they don't allow you to loiter in the theatre, based on my
   experience).  Consequently, I patiently waited along with a growing
   queue of patrons outside the screening room for STARSHIP TROOPERS,
   where the last fifteen minutes of the film could be heard echoing
   throughout the hall -- all that I could make out were nonstop alien
   insectoid squeals and roars, the shouting of troops under siege,
   sporadic bursts of gunfire, and a suitably heroic anthem playing.
   This aural experience essentially encapsulates the latter (and,
   disturbingly enough, superior) half of Paul Verhoeven's STARSHIP
   TROOPERS, which in spirit is essentially a B-film with a mega
   A-budget (a reported $120 million).  The film's final action-packed
   hour is complete carnage, as the human troops do battle with gigantic
   alien insects of all shapes and sizes on the planet of Klendathu.
   While the bug battle scenes are neither fresh nor inventive, they are
   relatively exciting to watch, and the visual effects are spectacular.
   It's the first half of STARSHIP TROOPERS which is the most unbearably
   excruciating to endure.
   Although both are science-fiction films, in a sense STARSHIP TROOPERS
   is a literal antithesis of Andrew Niccol's GATTACA, released two
   weeks earlier: while the latter film is more cerebral in nature,
   concerned more with ideas than special effects, and has an icy sheen,
   STARSHIP TROOPERS is loud, noisy, and throbbing with comicbookish
   machismo.
   Yet STARSHIP TROOPERS is not a mindless film merely depicting giant
   beasts to be slain in heroic fashion.  The film has a subtext which
   is strictly militaristic, and depicted in tongue-in-cheek fashion by
   Mr. Verhoeven.  In this totalitarian society of the future, the
   esteemed title of "citizen" is earned through a rite of passage in
   military duty, while "civilians" are looked upon condescendingly.
   STARSHIP TROOPERS' gung-ho protagonists are remarkably bloodthirsty
   --consider that in this film, unlike most sci-fi films, it's the
   humans who are the invaders, and witness the relish in his voice and
   charged bloodlust in his eyes as the aptly-named Johnny Rico (Casper
   Van Dien) directly addresses the camera with "I say we kill them
   all!" or the sheer excitement of the recruits as the outbreak of war
   is declared.  STARSHIP TROOPERS pokes fun at the war-is-fun,
   ultra-macho killing mentality by wholeheartedly embracing it -- it
   has a goofy rah-rah jingoistic feel that would do Roland Emmerich
   proud; the scene where our protagonists proudly pose with their new
   "Death From Above" tattoos emblazoned on their biceps speaks volumes.
   Indeed, what can one say about a film where a declaration of "It's
   afraid!" is greeted by a chorus of cheers?  (I'm not even going to
   touch thetopic of the Nazi-style uniforms sported by the troopers,
   most prominently by Carl Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris).)
   That this undertone will likely be lost to the majority of STARSHIP
   TROOPERS' audience is not due to subtlety; the film hardly buries
   this theme, and is often blatant in its representation.  It's simply
   that this message is being pitched in a context where its usage is
   mostly ineffectual and in some cases even appears apt.  While shots
   of little children cheerfully stomping on insects will cause
   chuckles, scenes of the troopers' homicidal tendencies being stirred
   up prior to engaging in battle will have the effect of similarly
   enticing the us-versus-them, xenophobic mentality of many in the
   audience.
   The film opens with a teaser sequence on the alien planet as chaos
   and mayhem ensues, and the bodycount skyrockets courtesy of the
   bloodthirsty insects overrunning and essentially decimating the
   human contingent.  Much has been made of the film's violence, which
   is admittedly brutal but not overly so -- it's much along the same
   aesthetic as Mr. Verhoeven's ROBOCOP, which featured blood spurting
   out of wounds; here, we have impalement by insectoid pincers,
   decapitations, and bodies torn apart limb from limb, but none of it
   is excessively gory as STARSHIP TROOPERS spends little time to linger
   or dwell upon it, instead determinedly charging forward.
   The action gives way as STARSHIP TROOPERS employs the groanworthy
   "One year earlier" device, and we rejoin the film's protagonists in a
   more peaceful setting -- high school graduation day, Earth.  (Buenos
   Aires actually, although before it was revealed in the film, I would
   have never guessed -- I thought it was Beverly Hills.)  Yes, our
   heroes are fresh-faced youngsters, and for the first half of the
   film we're to endure their dopey generic tribulations: amorous
   rivalry, parental strife, and so forth.  It's so remarkably campy
   and simple-minded that it makes the cliched, paper-thin characters
   of INDEPENDENCE DAY look like inspired screenwriting.  STARSHIP
   TROOPERS' first hour is complete cornball material -- with these
   youthful pretty faces, it's like having the cast of MELROSE PLACE
   serving as our grizzled warriors against the alien marauders.  (New
   troopers introduced later in the film seem to be have been enlisted
   straight out of SWEET VALLEY HIGH and drafted from THE BABYSITTERS'
   CLUB.)  I shun television so I can avoid corny, eye-roll-inducing
   melodrama like this, so an hour's worth of it in a feature film
   doesn't exactly inspire high marks with me; are we supposed to care
   at all about these characters and their silly love lives?  (I later
   learned that much of the young cast have indeed appeared in the
   various Aaron Spelling TV productions -- egad.)  There's an exchange
   between Johnny Rico and fellow trooper Ace Levy (Jake Busey) where
   Ace sympathetically clucks, "They want to be friends after they tear
   your guts out."  Johnny sadly retorts, "I *deserve* to get my guts
   torn out."  In the audience, I silently agreed -- surely somebody
   other than those in the audience deserved to suffer for the
   aggravating first hour of STARSHIP TROOPERS.  It's exasperating
   enough to make one stifle an anguished scream.  Barely stifle.
   After an interlude which features perhaps the worst use of Mazzy
   Star's "Fade Into You" that one can possibly imagine and some
   obligatory nude scenes from self-professed breast fetishist Mr.
   Verhoeven, our protagonists find themselves in fierce battle with
   spectacularly-rendered giant insects on a barren alien world.  The
   insectoid marauders look terrific, although the manner in which they
   are ultimately dispatched is familiar stuff and their
   indestructibility and ferociousness varies depending upon the
   necessity of the plot.  Nevertheless, the sight of thousands of
   computer-generated insects scurrying forth in attack formation is
   breathtaking, while the space battle scenes in orbit around Klendathu
   is solid if not outstanding work.
   After the first attack by the troopers has been thoroughly trounced
   by the defending aliens, they conclude that there must be a a "smart"
   bug masterminding the insectoid military strategy, and STARSHIP
   TROOPERS ultimately focuses on the protagonists targeting this unseen
   entity.  That this bug is deemed "smart" because the human
   interlopers were simply too stupid to bomb down the planet before
   pulling their commando-style raid seems to have been overlooked --
   hasn't anything been learned from the Gulf War?  (The bug also
   appears to be "smart" because it enjoys brain milkshakes and
   literally absorbs knowledge from its victim -- how inventive.)
   While I haven't seen much of Paul Verhoeven's Dutch film output from
   the 1970s and early 1980s, I've seen nearly all of his
   English-language work and his 1987 film ROBOCOP is my favourite from
   his oeuvre -- a fine sci-fi action film which works both as pure
   visceral entertainment, and also on a more philosophical level.  (I
   admittedly haven't seen his SHOWGIRLS, but I feel fairly safe in
   assuming that it won't challenge for the top spot on his resume.)
   STARSHIP TROOPERS marks somewhat of a reunion for many of the key
   players in the making of ROBOCOP: prolific Basil Poledouris composed
   an anthemic score which vaguely echoes that for the 1987 film,
   cinematographer Jost Vacano's photography is crisp and sharp, and
   screenwriter Ed Neumeier once again sprinkles various amusingly
   satiric news/propaganda insert clips throughout the film which
   depict the state of this future society -- it's striking and telling
   how much these blurbs resemble old WWII propaganda footage in tone
   and spirit.  Hey, I'd buy that for a dollar!
   Barring these satiric interludes, this is not a great screenplay,
   full of cornball B-film cliches, such as an impossible heroic
   survival of an attack which leaves the rest of the cast presuming
   that he's perished, and noble deathbed gestures and proclamations.
   This is the kind of script where when a character declares, "I'd
   expect any one of you to do the same for me", you know it's because
   someone will have to, and where when you see Johnny Rico perform
   a triple flip in a football game, it's merely a matter of time
   before the same maneuver is used at a fortuitous moment in the film.
   Among the cast, Michael Ironside (who appeared in Mr. Verhoeven's
   TOTAL RECALL) and Clancy Brown are the two brights spots as
   characters they often play elsewhere, and play well -- Mr. Ironside
   as the humourless, tough-as-nails Lieutenant Rasczak, and Mr. Brown
   as drill sergeant Zim (echoing his best performance in Frank
   Darabont's THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION as the tough screw prison guard).
   None of the rest of the cast makes much of an impression (although
   Mr. Van Dien is, as of this writing, now getting seven-figure deals
   for future projects), though Denise Richards acts in the film as if
   she's auditioning for a toothpaste commercial.
   Standing outside that screening room in Ottawa, I observed the
   reactions of the patrons exiting -- most had a little goofy grin,
   glazed eyes, and a slightly dazed expression on their face.  There
   was, however, one guy who burst through the screening room doors
   shouting to anyone who would listen, "It sucks!  It sucks!"  Although
   I would neither be that dramatic nor severe, I could somewhat see
   his point -- particularly if he had burst out of the theatre after
   an hour, instead of two.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I'll never forget you.  You're too weird."
        - David Krumholtz, ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES

Title
Review for Shooting Fish (1997)
SHOOTING FISH (Fox Searchlight - 1998)
Starring Dan Futterman, Stuart Townsend, Kate Beckinsale
Screenplay by Stefan Schwartz, Richard Holmes
Produced by Richard Holmes, Glynis Murray
Directed by Stefan Schwartz
Running time: 109 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   What *is* it about Burt Bacharach these days?  His banal, decades-old
   handiwork seems to be invading contemporary cinema at an alarming
   rate for some reason or another.  We had a plethora of Bacharach
   tunes used in memorable fashion by P.J. Hogan in MY BEST FRIEND'S
   WEDDING, and ol' Burt himself even made a cameo appearance in Jay
   Roach's supremely silly AUSTIN POWERS: INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY.
   So, after a successful 1997 run in the United Kingdom, here comes
   Stefan Schwartz's zany comedy SHOOTING FISH, serving as yet another
   homage to Bacharach -- the soundtrack is dominated by his music, the
   film's protagonists have a jukebox shrine to the popmeister in their
   bizarro home, and there's even an impromptu spirited rendition of "Do
   You Know The Way To San Jose?"  I don't know what Mr. Bacharach is up
   to, but whatever it is, it's working.
   Meanwhile, SHOOTING FISH is an effervescent comic romp with charm to
   spare which finally spins out of control in its third act.  The
   film's protagonists are the young team of sleek, smooth-talking Dylan
   (Dan Futterman) and awkward technical wizard Jez (Stuart Townsend),
   along with their new temp Georgie (Kate Beckinsale), and after an
   amusing prologue which depicts Dylan and Jez's innate characteristics
   as fully formed while mere little tykes growing up in respective
   orphanages, we open to find Dylan in a boardroom confidently
   demonstrating a new voice-recognition capable computer to an
   impressed business executive.  Claiming that the machine has a
   vocabulary of 80 000 words (this figure is upped on successive
   pitches), Dylan astonishes his potential customers by
   conversationally speaking to the computer, which politely responds in
   turn.  (The machine physically resembles a TRS-80, enabled with an
   appropriately tinny, HAL-like speaking voice).  It doesn't take long
   it to sink in that Dylan and Jez are con artists (as for the talking
   computer, visualize the *most* silly way in which this feat can be
   pulled off), and soon the trio are gleefully fleeing the office
   complex to the safety of their parked vehicle, advance payment
   cheques in hand.
   The two young men are scammers, all right, but they're likeable,
   relatively harmless ones that consider themselves present-day Robin
   Hoods ("Thin fish", Jez whispers to Dylan when a potential target
   turns out to be an elderly lady that can ill-afford to be ripped-off;
   they respectfully retreat.)  As for Georgie, she's initially not sure
   what to make of all of this, but after she's reassured that the
   proceeds of their spoils are going to orphans (a claim which isn't
   *entirely* inaccurate), she agrees to along with their exploits.
   SHOOTING FISH subsequently rockets through their series of misdeeds,
   and therein lies the principal weakness of the film.  It barrels
   along at such a breakneck pace that it's often a struggle to keep up
   with the developing plot.  There are points, particularly in the
   film's latter half, where one is left so dizzied by the frantically
   energetic plot zinging by that it becomes increasingly difficult to
   attempt to piece things together.  While the film has some very
   amusing elements, its wicked pacing leaves much to be desired; the
   primary narrative is maintained, but minor elements are often not
   immediately clear upon first consumption, to the detriment of the
   comedy.
   This is an unabashedly silly, light-hearted film, but it does
   occasionally run out of palatable comic ideas -- you know that when
   you're resorting to old inflatable doll sight gags, you're scraping
   the bottom of the barrel.  Still, the madcap hijinx of our heroes are
   generally droll and inventive, and the film has a sort of breezy and
   whimsical feel to it that helps to quash a more cynical perspective
   of the proceedings.
   Predictably, SHOOTING FISH is compelled to throw a love triangle into
   the mix, and a subplot deals with both Dylan and Jez vying for
   Georgie's affections.  While Dylan's the more photogenic and suave of
   the pair, Jez's feelings for Georgie are more genuine and heartfelt;
   it's no surprise whom Georgie ultimately sides with.  (Besides, the
   come-on line employed when Georgie's taken on a date to a nightclub
   isn't typically a successful one.)  The courtship's all played out
   well enough, and the characters are likeable, but there's no real
   resonance in the relationship; it's rather unengaging.
   What drives this film are the winning performances by its appealing
   trio of actors.  Mr. Futterman, with an assured manner and
   mischievous gleam in his eye, demonstrates good leading man
   potential, while Mr. Townsend is quite sympathetic as the awkward,
   soft-spoken Jez.  And Ms. Beckinsale, who positively exudes star
   qualities, successfully breaks type as a period piece mainstay in
   delightful fashion; lively and high-spirited, she's remarkably
   captivating.  SHOOTING FISH benefits tremendously from its impressive
   young cast.
   While its comedy is somewhat hit-and-miss and all of its elements
   don't satisfactorily gel in the final act, SHOOTING FISH is an
   irreverent little comedy that makes for an often pleasing lark.  The
   film's gags aren't exactly sophisticated, but with its simplistic,
   innocent comic outlook lies much of its charm.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY (Fox - 1998)
Starring Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller
Screenplay by Ed Decter & John J. Strauss and Peter Farrelly &
  Bobby Farrelly
Produced by Frank Beddor, Michael Steinberg, Charles B. Wessler,
  Bradley Thomas
Directed by Peter Farrelly & Bobby Farrelly
Running time: 118 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   "There's something about Mary," croons comic troubadour Jonathan
   Richmond by way of explanation at one point in the remarkably silly
   film of the same name, which prompts one to take inventory: as
   portrayed by Cameron Diaz, perpetual object of desire Mary Jenson is
   gorgeous, kindly, wealthy, sunny and altogether charming.  She has
   the propensity to change clothes while standing in front of open
   windows, and even watches SportsCenter, which, needless to say,
   induces one to ponder what's *not* to like about her?  Well, okay,
   she's a golf aficionado -- nobody's perfect.
   The ridiculously idealized Mary is the eye of the vortex in THERE'S
   SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, an assemblage of zany bits of scatological
   humour themed around -- err, stalking.  Unlike the sugar-coated
   nastiness of last year's ADDICTED TO LOVE, though, this year's
   summer stalking comedy (a most improbable genre, one would have
   thought) has a bright, bubbly core; amidst all the crude sight gags,
   the decidedly-politically incorrect witticisms, and lowbrow
   raunchiness, the film has such an infectiously cheerful, carefree
   spirit that its offensive material comes across as mischievous rather
   than malicious.  Indeed, the sibling filmmaking team of Peter and
   Bobby Farrelly clearly take such glee in stretching the limits of
   good taste that it's nigh well irresistible to simply toss decorum
   aside and revel in the bawdiness.
   The film's (semblance of a) plot is a basic underdog tale structured
   around a lovelorn geeky guy named Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller) and
   his earnest attempts to woo the seriously-out-of-his-league goddess
   Mary while competing for her affections against a bizarro,
   ever-expanding collection of misfits, chief of which is the caddish
   Pat Healy (Matt Dillon), the private eye whom Ted hired to track Mary
   down.  In its outline, then, it's a tried-and-true, well-worn formula
   which leaves no doubt where the film is headed, though familiarity
   isn't much of an impediment given that the narrative essentially
   serves as a framework for a series of gags.
   There's little doubt where the film's greatest strengths lie; there
   are moments in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY which are as funny as
   anything that's been released to theatres this year.  And, as per the
   reputation of filmmakers, the humour isn't exactly sly and subtle --
   the comedy is brazen and in many cases quite literally in-your-face,
   all gross sight gags and frenetic slapstick.  In its best moments,
   the silliness is so abundant that one can't help but choke with
   laughter; there's one scene where the audience is lulled into
   complacency by madcap discussion of a certain uncomfortable
   circumstance that when the brothers Farrelly fling the image onscreen
   (in a zoom shot, no less), filling the frame in all its
   wince-inducing glory, it's hilarious not only in its absurdity and
   grotesqueness, but also for its sheer unexpectedness.
   "I can't believe they *showed* that!" murmured someone behind me
   during one of the film's big comic moments.  "That's *so mean*!"
   gasped the woman next to me.  (The guy in front of me was too busy
   howling with laughter to comment.)  The film's humour is so broad and
   unabashedly confident that it often provokes not only laughter, but
   bonafide audience reaction; at the screening I attended, one prime
   sequence left the crowd buzzing so loud and long that the dialogue in
   the entire subsequent scene couldn't even be heard.
   However, this didn't prove to be a problem, and here lies the down
   side of the film.  THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is deliriously
   scatological, tossing practically every sick joke in the book at the
   screen in its attempts to elicit laughs, with a rather iffy success
   rate; its big moments are explosively funny, but more often than not,
   the gags sputter and fizzle, and in between comic crescendos the
   whole thing gets rather dreary.  As a result, the film seems to run
   far too long -- some liberal trimming could have be conducted with
   negligent effect to the narrative while improving the overall pacing.
   In addition, the film curiously seems to consider its romantic angle
   far more sweet than it actually plays, frequently lending a sense of
   sincerity to scenes that isn't really merited.
   Still, while wildly uneven, the film is a hoot, replete with a
   handful of memorably audacious moments.  It left me considering which
   was preferable -- a carefully-modulated picture of consistent
   amusement, or an agreeable one peppered with instances of hilarity,
   like THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY.  While in general I find myself
   leaning towards the former, I can't help but appreciate a film which
   takes the tired Good Times montage endemic to the romantic-comedy
   genre, and gives it a special hook.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Title
Review for Gummo (1997)
GUMMO (Fine Line - 1997)
Starring Jacob Reynolds, Nick Sutton, Jacob Sewell, Darby Doughtery,
  Chloe Sevigny, Carisa Bara, Linda Manz, Max Perlich
Screenplay by Harmony Korine
Produced by Cary Woods
Directed by Harmony Korine
Running time: 88 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Along with Antonia Bird's PRIEST, the film which stirred up the most
   controversy in 1995 was undoubtedly Larry Clark's KIDS, an
   unflinching portrayal of youth alienation which rocked the
   establishment and provoked much heated debate on whether the film was
   an important social commentary on the state of youth in America
   (publications no less than the New York Times screamed "A wake-up
   call to the world!"), or merely an exploitative, sensationalistic
   piece of work.  KIDS, originally a Miramax release (which by that
   time had been acquired by the Walt Disney Corporation), stirred up so
   much trouble for its parent company that upon receiving the dreaded
   NC-17 rating from the MPAA, a one-shot spinoff distribution arm,
   Excalibur Films, was created by Disney solely for the unrated
   domestic release of the film.
   While the film was helmed by photographer Larry Clark, the vision for
   KIDS was that of Harmony Korine, who wrote the screenplay for the
   film while still in his teens.  Mr. Korine, now 23, makes his return
   with his feature film directorial debut of GUMMO, an indulgent,
   highly experimental piece of work once again centered around
   disaffected, lower-class youth in America.
   Mr. Korine has proclaimed that film is the ultimate collage artform,
   and his adherence to this sensibility is in clear evidence in GUMMO;
   the film lacks any sort of conventional narrative structure, and is
   instead a virtual kaleidoscope of varying images and sequences.
   Without a central viewpoint, GUMMO is essentially a mishmash of
   outrageous material which is clearly intended to shock and provoke
   its audience.
   As far as one can piece together, GUMMO is set in Xenia, Ohio, a
   conservative town devastated by a 1974 tornado -- this is alluded to
   in the film by some grainy handheld, presumably amateur footage of
   the storm in action which bookends GUMMO -- which is depicted as an
   amoral, impoverished, low-class neighbourhood perhaps only a tiny
   step or two above trailer park territory.  Parental guidance and
   authority figures are ineffectual, misguided, or altogether absent,
   and the youth of the town are essentially given free rein to do as
   they please.  The film introduces the audience to the repellent yet
   oddly compelling daily activities of various adolescents one would
   typically make conscious efforts to avoid in reality, and while GUMMO
   plays out as a series of generally unconnected vignettes, three
   groups of recurring characters come to the forefront of the film:
   three bleached blond sisters Dot (Chloe Sevigny, who also acts as the
   film's costume designer), Helen (Carisa Bara), and Darby (non-actor
   Darby Dougherty), who aimlessly kill time with such bizarre exercises
   (which presumably aspire to be titilative) as attempting to enhance
   their areolae through repeated applications of electrical tape onto
   their breasts; a strange, aphonic skateboarder called Bunny Boy
   (non-actor Jacob Sewell) who suitably sports a headpiece sprouting
   rabbit ears and lingers on the outskirts of the action; and Solomon
   (Jacob Reynolds, genuinely frightening-looking) and Tummler
   (non-actor and reforming paint sniffer Nick Sutton), two nightmarish
   boys who prowl around on their bicycles like latter-day dementedly
   twisted versions of Tom Sawyer and Huckleberry Finn, in search of
   stray cats to kill and sell to the local butcher in exchange for
   solvents to inhale or money to give to Cole (Max Perlich), a local
   who pimps his retarded sister out of his suburban home.
   An early scene in GUMMO perfectly encapsulates the film's aesthetic.
   The vignette introduces Bunny Boy lingering at a fenced highway
   overpass: with his giant set of pink bunny ears and his blank,
   youthful appearance, he seems very much like an innocent cypher, an
   anomalous presence amongst the bleak, drab concrete backdrop.
   Suddenly, in an unprovoked paroxysm which is in part startling and
   admittedly bemusing in its audacity, we see him in turn spitting onto
   passing automobiles, violently kicking at the protective fencing in a
   bout of primal destructiveness, urinating from the overpass onto the
   highway below, and dangling precociously from the overhead fencing.
   Mr. Korine's GUMMO is evidently a reactionary piece against the
   conforms of traditional filmmaking technique.  While the film defies
   a conventional narrative and generally lacks a central frame of
   reference, it also dares to combine 35mm, video, and Super 8 footage
   and Polaroid photographs in its visuals, and its sound mix is pushed
   up to a point where the film occasionally becomes physically painful
   to listen to: a prolonged sequence where two preteen boys are
   screaming a bevy of astonishing worldly profanities at a prone,
   "dead" Bunny Boy is almost unbearably uncomfortable to endure.
   In attendance with his film at the 1997 Venice International Film
   Festival, Mr. Korine caused a stir when he proclaimed that he hated
   actors only to reverse himself minutes later: "Never mind, I like
   actors."  A few days later, at the 1997 Toronto International Film
   Festival, he apparently changed his mind again, asserting "I hate
   actors."  Whatever his sentiment towards professional actors may be,
   Mr. Korine's use of amateur actors and his childhood friends in GUMMO
   is occasionally effective in capturing the aura of authenticity the
   film generally strives for, but all too often his performers appear
   exceedingly conscious of the camera during inopportune naturalistic
   moments, and tend to focus their performances towards showmanship.
   The ability to improvise can be a difficult task even for seasoned
   actors, and for the most part the non-professionals are woefully
   inept when called upon for spontaneity; Mr. Korine himself is a chief
   offender in a terribly awkward scene which arbitrarily results in him
   pouring a bottle of beer upon himself.
   While there can be no doubting that GUMMO profiles a stunning
   collection of deviant characters -- indeed, there are no customary
   'normal' characters to be found -- and features outrageous acts of
   casual violence and depravity which are sure to offend some (cat
   lovers beware), the film is sporadically raucously funny and never
   becomes dull.  The sheer temerity in the behaviour of those depicted
   in GUMMO is often hysterical -- a particularly memorable moment is
   when a group of men take leisure in beating the hell out of a metal
   chair -- but it is all too clear that we are meant to gawk at, not
   empathise with, the characters in the film.
   Given GUMMO's distinct lack of commercial elements and its inherently
   controversial, vaguely disturbing nature, some may end up wondering
   why Cary Woods and Fine Line commissioned the film, even at its
   reportedly modest budget of $1 million.  The answer would seem to be:
   Harmony Korine, who remains a much-coveted property as a
   screenwriter, with two projects already on tap.  While $1 million may
   eventually prove to be a small price to pay to establish a long-term
   relationship with a talent like Mr. Korine, one would have to
   conclude that it's unlikely that another similarly indulgent film
   would be condoned in the future. 
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"The separate forms of social behaviour that we associate with film and
 television are also starting to break down..." - Jonathan Rosenbaum, 1979

Title
Review for Twelfth Night: Or What You Will (1996)
(Fine Line - 1996)
Starring Helena Bonham Carter, Richard E. Grant, Nigel Hawthorne,
   Ben Kinglsey, Mel Smith, Imelda Staunton, Toby Stephens,
   Imogen Stubbs
Screenplay by Trevor Nunn, based on the play by William Shakespeare
Produced by Stephen Evans and David Parfitt
Directed by Trevor Nunn
Running time: 125 minutes
The onslaught of film adaptations based upon Shakespeare's plays in
recent years (among them being RICHARD III, OTHELLO, and the upcoming
HAMLET and ROMEO & JULIET) continues with Trevor Nunn's first feature
in ten years, TWELFTH NIGHT, a comedy of mistaken identities and
genders. Despite a cast with impressive credentials, the end result is
a dreary film, punctuated with stacattos of bemusement.
After a shipwreck off the coast of fictional country Illyria separates
twins Viola (Imogen Stubbs) and Sebastian (Stephen Mackintosh), Viola
is distraught.  Mistakenly believing her brother to be dead, she
disguises herself as a young man and enters the services of Duke Orsino
(Toby Stephens), and on his behalf attempts to court Countess Olivia
(Helena Bonham Carter).  Confusion reigns as Olivia instead falls for
the disguised Viola, who's now going under the name "Cesario", while
Viola herself becomes enamored with Orsino. Meanwhile, boozing Sir
Toby Belch (Mel Smith) and wacky Sir Andrew Aguecheek (Richard E. Grant)
mischievously torment Olivia's repressed manservant, Malvolio (Nigel
Hawthorne), with a forged love letter.
Despite the classic material, the film seems to lose the comedy in the
circumstances, and most of the laughs instead come from various reaction
shots from the characters to the unfolding situations.  The subplot
involving Sir Toby Belch, Sir Andrew Aguecheek, and Malvolio proves
to be both overlong and completely disinteresting, and is saved only
by a wildly amusing performance by Nigel Hawthorne from sinking the film.
The other bright spot in the film is a solid lead performance by Imogen 
Stubbs as Viola/Cesario.  Possibly best known in North America for her
performance as Lucy Steele in Ang Lee's SENSE AND SENSIBILITY (1995),
here Stubbs invests a great degree of pluck in her character, making her
performance eminently watchable.
The film's pacing suffers greatly from the subplot; after investing much
time in setting up the situation and introducing the various characters,
the film's momentum screeches to a halt midway through as the subplot is
played out, before picking up again to the film's inevitable merry
conclusion.  TWELFTH NIGHT's look is surprisingly dark and cold
considering the general tone of the material.
Commercial prospects for TWELFTH NIGHT are probably modest.  The film
lacks A-list star power, and will likely not generate the raving
word-of-mouth required to convert this film into a mainstream hit.  As
such, TWELFTH NIGHT would probably expect a successful run in arthouse
theatres.
TWELFTH NIGHT is a passable and relatively faithful adaptation of
Shakespeare's classic play.  However, it fails to exploit the inherent
comedy of the situation, and one would expect more, particularly from
a cast of such calibre given such source material.  On my four-star scale,
I give TWELFTH NIGHT two stars.

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Among my fanatical ticker tape-worshipping friends, there's one who
   happens to share the same philosophy espoused by the central character
   in Darren Aronofsky's darkly original PI: the entire stock market can
   be reduced to nothing but a series of patterns which, through
   analysis, will produce information to accurately forecast future
   behaviour.  (An example of the mentality involved: if the stock price
   goes up like this, and then down like that, and then sharply up this
   way, it then will go *this* way.)  While I freely admit that I know
   less than nothing about the market (knowledge check: prices up --
   good; prices down -- bad; most of the time, at least) and hence really
   couldn't comment with any authority, it's always nonetheless struck me
   as an incredibly naive oversimplification of an astonishingly complex
   system (and besides, if it were that simple, no doubt somebody
   would've already figured it all out).  The difference in this case is
   that while my colleague (an otherwise assuredly realistic individual)
   truly believes in this in and of itself as a valid forecaster, PI
   uses this ideology as a device with which to investigate its
   character's psychosis.  It's also vastly more convincing with its
   argument.
   "Mathematics is the language of the universe," insists genius
   protagonist Maximillian Cohen (Sean Gullette) in a cool, mantra-like
   voice-over which repeats throughout the picture.  Since nature can be
   expressed in numbers, and there are patterns everywhere in nature, he
   reasons with eminent logic that finding the patterns will allow him
   to predict anything -- the ups and downs of the stock market, how
   many games the Yankees will win this year, the flavour of jam I'm
   going to put on my toast tomorrow morning.  Obsessed with finding the
   proverbial key to the universe, Max lives in paranoid, self-imposed
   solitude in a seedy NYC Chinatown apartment, single-mindedly toiling
   away with his monstrous homemade computer system.  Sullenly withdrawn
   and plauged by debilitating migraines, the elusive pursuit of a
   mysterious 216-digit number his machine spits out one day is driving
   him into madness.
   The story, then, is basically an eccentricity, but it's a clever,
   astute eccentricity, perceptively zeroing in on the modern mistrust of
   mathematical reductionism; in an age where a dominant societal phobia
   is one's individualism being replaced by a series of numeric
   identifiers, Max's all-consuming penchent for numbers at once creates
   a lingering, unsettling mood.
   It helps matters that he's not a particularly likable protagonist.
   All attempts of friendliness from neighbours are curtly rebuffed by
   Max, a spindly, neurotic-looking individual who hasn't the time to
   indulge in pleasantries.  For a film which puts its lead character
   front and center (Mr. Gullette appears in virtually every scene), PI
   takes a refreshing and effective approach in avoiding conventional
   aesthetics; because of our ambivalence with Max, we're not so much
   avidly rooting for him to triumph with a moment of epiphany as we're
   following him through this plot with a sense of mixed dread and morbid
   fascination -- it's more disturbing journey than quest.
   Still, we do care about Max's fate.  Teetering on the edge of
   dementia, he winds up being pursued by two different groups which want
   to pick his brain, both fronted by deliciously perky, resolutely
   cheerful representatives with inevitably duplictious intentions.  As
   we know, in films where paranoia is a dominant element (see THE
   TRUMAN SHOW's Laura Linney character), or for that matter, in real
   life, it's always the ones who never stop smiling at you and are
   overly friendly that are the ones of which to be wary.
   PI, a film that addresses patterns, itself intentionally adheres to an
   identifiable pattern cycle -- headache scene; important revelation or
   bit of plot development; pill-popping montage; hallucinatory nightmare
   (with decidedly Cronenberg-esque undertones -- few other directors are
   as equally adept in bridging unsettling concepts and body-themed
   horror); nosebleeding reality.  The repetitiveness, far from being
   tedious, is effectively maddening; more than anything, the picture
   aims to get under our skins and take in events from Max's
   claustrophobic perspective.
   In this regard, it wildly succeeds due to Mr. Aronofsky's striking
   direction.  It's a rarity that a film so completely immerses itself
   into a protagonist's warped perspective of his surrounding, and high
   contrast black-and-white cinematography combined with constant usage
   of extreme close-ups lend a heightened sense of paranoia to the
   proceedings.  (In some scenes, the stark composition in conjunction
   with the lumbering approach by Mr. Gullette make his character
   curiously resemble a latter-day Max Schreck, from NOSFERATU.)  Using
   savage, jittery lensing and rapid cuts to create a sense of
   disorientation, the picture is often dizzying to behold, and Max's
   effective isolationism is emphasized by shots from the so-called
   Snorri Cam, which keep him in plain focus while the environment races
   by in blurred bursts.  PI's raw, aggressive visuals are reminiscent of
   David Lynch's early work (in particular, ERASERHEAD).
   The film's sinister tone splashes onto the screen immediately with a
   dazzling opening credit sequence ably backed by a sly electronic
   score by Clint Mansell, and gradually increases in intensity.  Still,
   amidst all its Kafkaesque qualities and overall dispassionate mood, PI
   does occasionally display a sense of humour.  At one point, Marcy
   Dawson (Pamela Hart, great fun) entices Max with the offer of an
   invaluable treasure: a one-of-a-kind ... computer chip.  "Isn't it
   beautiful," she coos.
   A showcase for Mr. Aronofsky's technical virtuosity (made for
   $60 000, it's since gone on to capture acclaim at the 1998 Sundance
   Film Festival), PI is an intriguingly cerebral story which,
   ironically, is perhaps the most purely visceral film of the year.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS (Touchstone - 1998)
Starring Harrison Ford, Anne Heche, David Schwimmer,
  Jacqueline Obradors
Screenplay by Michael Browning
Produced by Ivan Reitman, Wallis Nicita, Roger Birnbaum
Directed by Ivan Reitman
Running time: 101 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS is one of the summer's early disappointments,
   an utterly pedestrian effort which plays it so safe that the stunt
   actors wind up taking more risks than the screenplay does.  It's an
   uninspired rehash of the old Bicker-Bicker-Bicker-Smooch formula, and
   even if the smooch here comes in the form of an homage to the famous
   FROM HERE TO ETERNITY beach clinch, the film's escapist plot barely
   contains enough viable material to sustain interest.
   Establishing scenes quickly introduce Robin Monroe (Anne Heche), an
   ambitious young associate magazine editor who's whisked away from
   Gotham for a romantic South Pacific vacation by her amorous beau
   Frank Martin (David Schwimmer).  After happily accepting a moonlight
   marriage proposal, Robin is summoned to oversee an emergency one-day
   photo shoot in nearby Tahiti and commissions laid-back charter pilot
   Quinn Harris (Harrison Ford) to take her there in his beat-up
   DeHavilland Beaver.
   Miracle of miracles, Robin and Quinn happen upon an unexpectedly
   vicious storm while en route, and are forced to crash-land the plane
   on a deserted tropical island after a lightning strike fries the
   aircraft's electrical system.  Stranded with no means of
   communication to the outside world, the squabbling pair are left to
   fend for themselves, while back at the hotel, Frank and Quinn's
   sultry young girlfriend Angelica (Jacqueline Obradors) fret, worry,
   and make eyes at each other.
   An unabashedly formulaic adventure-comedy backdropped by noteworthily
   lush scenery, the film is written at a TV sitcom-level and features
   individual scenes which play breezily and make for cute,
   trailer-ready excerpts, but fail to gel as a whole.  Our protagonists
   aren't confronted by sufficiently challenging or ingenious obstacles
   in order to pique viewer attention on the adventure front (it's
   telling that the two inexplicable appearances by pursuant pirates
   seems almost arbitrary), while the flirty banter zinging back and
   forth between the duo falls far short of being endearing, registering
   as cute at best.  And the less said about the vapid Frank / Angelica
   subplot, the better.
   Credit the agreeable presence of the film's two leads for salvaging
   the production to the point of watchability.  Mr. Ford and Ms. Heche
   share an easy, unforced chemistry, and are best as Quinn and Robin
   inevitably gradate from quarreling antagonists to mutual admiration.
   Mr. Ford has a pleasant charm about him; it's fun to watch him
   contort his deadpan face and dryly utter a sarcastic witticism, and
   Ms. Heche makes for a pleasantly feisty combatant.  The star power
   present easily surpasses the quality of the film's material.
   "Aren't you one of those Guy guys?" Robin demands of Quinn as they
   survey their bleak situation.  "You know, one of those guys who they
   send out in the jungle with a Q-Tip, and come back and build a
   shopping mall?"  And while Quinn rolls his eyes and demurs, it's a
   given with this sort of film that the hero ultimately does
   demonstrate some MacGuyver-like aptitude.  SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS
   handles this obligation with a hootworthy plot development in its
   homestretch -- the discovery of a handy piece of equipment so
   preposterous in its convenience that it deflates any sense of
   investment one may have built for the dilemma faced by our heroes.
   To unfairly drop a hokey pat solution from out of the blue places the
   entire proceedings in a dubious light.
   Michael Browning's screenplay for SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS faithfully
   abides by genre conventions, vaguely aping conflicts and scenarios
   from such predecessors as ROMANCING THE STONE and THE AFRICAN QUEEN
   (also, an early scene which sees Quinn prepping his creaky bucket of
   bolts and assuring Robin of its flightworthiness interestingly echoes
   to Han Solo doing likewise in STAR WARS), but for the most part, the
   snappily suggestive dialogue is forgettable and the strong narrative
   drive is lacking.  To its detriment, it's got all of the shadings of
   similarly-themed earlier works, but none of the spark.
   Director Ivan Reitman does what he can, treating the audience with
   panoramic tropical visions and keeping the proceedings moving along
   briskly.  It's surprising that such a big-budget Hollywood production
   features some startling artificial visual effects works, such as that
   of the storm sequence.
   Ultimately, SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS suffers because of its eagerness
   at palatability, its resolute target of mainstream appeal.  Absent of
   any flair or genuine excitement, the film trods through the
   conventions of a tired formula with little except the winning
   performances of its lead actors to garnish much attention.  "I want
   my life to be complicated," confesses Quinn at one point.  If only
   the film shared similar sentiments.

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)

THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE (Warner Bros. - 1997)
Starring Keanu Reeves, Al Pacino, Charlize Theron, Jeffrey Jones,
  Judith Ivey, Connie Neilsen, Craig T. Nelson
Screenplay by Jonathan Lemkin and Tony Gilroy, based on the novel by
  Andrew Neiderman
Produced by Arnold Kopelson, Anne Kopelson, Arnon Milchan
Directed by Taylor Hackford
Running time: 144 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Given current popular sentiment, it's almost a cliche to depict
   lawyers as the underlings of Satan, but such is the case in Taylor
   Hackford's THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE, a delightfully glorious romp that
   begins with a simmer and culminates with a devastatingly impudent
   climax, only to ultimately boil over with a disappointingly
   unsatisfying conclusion.
   The protagonist of THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE is young defense attorney
   Kevin Lomax (Keanu Reeves), who seems to have everything going for
   him at the film's opening: a beautiful wife Mary Ann (Charlize
   Theron), and perhaps most importantly from his perspective, a
   thriving and successful practice.  Kevin's courtroom record is
   unblemished, and it doesn't take long to understand why in an
   audaciously funny opening sequence which sees him defending a
   schoolteacher charged with molestation.  As victimized schoolgirl
   Barbara (Heather Matarazzo, perfectly cast as the hapless, awkward
   witness -- I kept waiting for the jury to burst into a spontaneous
   chorus of "Wiener Dog!") recounts her accusation, any question Kevin
   may have of his client's innocence vaporizes when the defendant
   virtually salivates in arousement at her tale.  Nonetheless, Kevin
   puts aside any moral qualms to ruthlessly cross-examine Barbara and
   ultimately win his client's acquittal.
   Kevin's good, but there's only so far he's going to go in
   Gainesville, Florida.  Fortunately, a bigger fish has been keeping a
   watchful eye on his progress, and soon enough Kevin is lured by a
   flatteringly generous offer and lushly exorbitant new Fifth Avenue
   digs to New York, where he joins the powerful firm of Milton,
   Chadwick and Waters.  Falling under the wing of enigmatic senior
   partner John Milton (Al Pacino), Kevin is put on the fast track to
   the top with a series of difficult and intriguing defense cases and
   becomes single-mindedly devoted to his work, oblivious of Mary Ann's
   slow meltdown.
   Although it's not explicitly revealed until the end of THE DEVIL'S
   ADVOCATE, it's quite apparent from the outset (and the promotional
   trailers for the film make no attempts to hide this fact) that Milton
   is the Devil.  Even Milton himself performs little subterfuge to
   disguise his alter-ego, continually emphasizing his demonic qualities
   with his wild-eyed stares and gleeful looks -- I particularly liked
   the scene in the restaurant where he adjusted his dress shirt collar
   up to resemble the traditional devil's cloak.  While in this respect
   THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE is fun in its recklessness, I wonder how the
   film would have played out had it been more coy with its
   machinations.  Due not only to the promotion of the film, but of the
   horrific hallucinations undergone by Mary Ann relatively early on,
   there's no real sense of intrigue and no involvement required in
   order to decipher what's occurring in the film; it's simply nothing
   more than a thrill ride.  As the conclusion of THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE
   nears, only Kevin is in the dark with respect to Milton's true
   nature, and his ignorance comes across more as incredulous than
   sympathetic.
   Still, Mr. Pacino makes the devilish role his own, and this is a
   terrific piece of casting for THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE.  While a few
   actors come to mind as possessing the sort of look and acting chops
   to portray the Prince of Darkness -- Jack Nicholson, for one, and I
   could certainly envision a demonic Jeremy Irons -- Mr. Pacino is
   perfect in the part because he makes The Devil so much, for lack of a
   better word, fun.  This is the perfect outlet for the scenery-chewing
   which has been plaguing many of his recent performances; here, such
   an over-the-top approach is entertainingly beneficial, as opposed to
   a hindrance.  By the end of the film, I was basking in wicked delight
   at Milton's unrestrained theatrical rants, and blasphemously rooting
   as much for Mr. Pacino's witty Antichrist as I was for Mr. Reeves'
   bland hero.
   Mr. Pacino seems to relish every minute of his role, and delves into
   the part with great enthusiasm.  He's way over the top with his
   now-customary bellowing, grandiose gestures, and plenty of demonic
   grins galore, while Mr. Reeves, despite a Southern accent which
   wavers into every third reel and then abruptly disappears, does some
   of the best work I've ever seen from him.  His physical performance
   severely outclasses his line delivery -- he often recites his
   dialogue with distractingly little conviction -- but he's not a
   liability here.
   Ms. Theron's attempt at a Southern accent is far better (particularly
   considering she's from South Africa), but it's disappointing that
   she's saddled with such a generic and uninteresting role: the
   obligatory wife who cries neglect (although at least in THE
   DEVIL'S ADVOCATE she gets to combine this with the person-in-the-know
   staple).  She often has a startling resemblance to Ashley Judd, which
   is perhaps emphasized all the more in that her performance in the
   film echoes back to some of Ms. Judd's earlier work -- Ms. Theron's
   scene in a church is eerily similar to Ms. Judd in NORMA JEAN &
   MARILYN, while Ms. Theron's portrayal of her character's breakdown
   is brings back memories of Ms. Judd's emotional volatility in John
   McNaughton's NORMAL LIFE.
   Judith Ivey's role, as Kevin's mother, is even more frustratingly
   generic: a bible-thumper whose purpose it is to serve on the polar
   opposite axis to all of the film's demonic aspects.  You dread her
   solemn recitation of some gravely-worded scripture-referenced
   warning, because you know she's ultimately going to be proven
   correct.  Still, as insufferable as her character is, it's worth it
   for a deliciously funny scene where Mrs. Lomax and Milton awkwardly
   share an elevator ride.
   THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE builds up to a wonderful, if excessively
   visually extravagant, conclusion which is deliriously operatic in
   nature and genuine high camp in style.  I was stunned and thrilled by
   the sheer fearless temerity of the film's climax -- no American film
   had delivered such a similarly nihilistic knockout blow which left me
   as thunderstruck since David Fincher's SE7EN -- so I was consequently
   crestfallen that the film badly drops the ball and kicks it away with
   a final coda which can only be classified as condescending and
   absurd.  After teasing at a provocative and daring conclusion, THE
   DEVIL'S ADVOCATE buckles under and provides an epilogue which lacks a
   fraction of the bite.
   Technically, THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE is terrific to look at: Andrzej
   Bartkowiak's cinematography is superb, and the much-ballyhooed
   production design by Bruno Rubeo is extremely impressive, from the
   spectacular rooftop scene to the inventive design of Milton's office.
   The film is cast remarkably well, although I'd have liked to see
   Delroy Lindo (curiously unbilled as a animal-sacrificing voodoo
   practitioner whom Kevin defends) and Craig T. Nelson (as Alexander
   Cullen, a smarmy real-estate tycoon whom Kevin defends on a murder
   charge) swap roles.
   Mr. Hackford's helming on THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE is generally solid,
   although the film's build-up is a bit too long.  There are too many
   scenes which involve Mary Ann complaining about neglect and Kevin
   defending himself, and a sequence where Jeffrey Jones' Eddie Barzoon
   character on the run from Milton is particularly ineffective, given
   that his fate is a foregone conclusion.  Mr. Hackford also goes a bit
   overboard with the use of time-lapse photography to generate an
   ominous atmosphere, showing days and nights on each other's heels as
   storm clouds zip through the sky.  Once or twice is enough, but after
   this technique is reused over and over, I felt like I was watching a
   7th grade science class film, and was hoping that he might insert
   time-lapse footage of a seedling sprouting from the earth and
   blooming into a flower or something of that sort.
   All the same, THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE is good fun for the most part and
   it's highly amusing to watch Mr. Pacino run rampant in a film which
   provides the proper context for his unbridled theatrics.  There's a
   scene where alluring Christabella (Connie Nielsen) interrupts a
   gleeful Milton rant with an unamused "Shut up.  You talk too much."
   What, and lose the most entertaining element of the film?
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Don't leave this girl alone with any handsome deaf-mutes Marty, that's my
 advice to you." - Parker Posey, THE HOUSE OF YES

Title
Review for Dream with the Fishes (1997)
DREAM WITH THE FISHES (Sony Pictures Classics - 1997)
Starring David Arquette, Brad Hunt, Kathryn Erbe, Cathy Moriarty
Screenplay by Finn Taylor
Produced by Johnny Wow, Mitchell Stein
Directed by Finn Taylor
Running time: 97 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
It's rather easy to start tuning out after about twenty minutes of
Finn Taylor's first feature film, DREAM WITH THE FISHES, when the
plodding, tedious opening sequence finally pays off with a potentially
provocative setup.  Any hopeful expectations, however, are soon
vanquished as the film settles upon being an uninvolving
mismatched-buddy movie which is rarely as funny as it aspires to be
nor nearly as affecting as it eventually strives to be in the film's
latter half.
The film's central characters are Terry (David Arquette), a depressed,
lonely voyeur who claims to be despondent since the death of his wife
in an automobile accident, and Nick (Brad Hunt), a carefree young
street tough later revealed to be terminally ill.  Nick lives in the
apartment building across from Terry, who spies on the trysts between
Nick and girlfriend Liz (Kathryn Erbe) with his trusty set of
binoculars, but the two young men first formally meet at the Bay
Bridge where a half-drunk Terry precariously teeters upon the edge,
unconvincingly vowing suicide.  Nick casually asks for Terry's
wristwatch, and eventually cons Terry into a trade - the watch for a
bottle of pills.  Of course, Terry finds that the pills do not end up
having the presumed lethal effects, and he angrily sets out to find
Nick in order to retrieve his watch.  Learning of Nick's condition
(he only has a handful of weeks left), Terry's compassion kicks in,
and the two eventually come to a distinctly peculiar arrangement -
Terry will agree to bankroll the dying Nick's lifelong fantasies, and
Nick will fulfill Terry's death wish by killing him.
This is a promising premise, and Mr. Taylor's film could have gone any
number of ambitious ways from this point, but he instead chooses to
capitalise upon the obvious inversion of the characters (Terry is a
repessed, mournful character who wants to die, while Nick is a free
spirit with a joie de vivre who is dying but wants to live) and takes
the easy route out by turning DREAM WITH THE FISHES into a typical
lark where the two characters engage in a series of generally dull
exploits, and where the straight-laced character learns to enjoy and
ppreciate life when hooked up with a quirky character.  This is
by-the-numbers plotting, buddy movie/road movie redux.
However, DREAM WITH THE FISHES is most hampered not by its uninspired
storyline, but by the characters which carry the story - it helps in
such a film to have at least one of the protagonists be at least
somewhat empathetic, if not likeable.  Unfortunately, that is not the
case here, where both of the film's leading characters are thorougly
uninteresting and annoying, giving the audience very little to
sympathise with their respective plights, and even less reason to
want to follow their onscreen exploits.  Far from a romp, this fatal
flaw makes DREAM WITH FISHES more like a chore to endure than a
playful jaunt, and undermines the attempts at emotional resonance in
the latter stages of the film as the two men begin to bond.
Mr. Taylor's dialogue sporadically falls flat in DREAM WITH THE
FISHES - while attempting to capture a quirky and clever tone, it too
often comes across instead as hopelessly contrived (witness such
lines as "You should have asked something more interesting, like 'Do
you enjoy the pain?' - See, that's provocative, leaves room for
further questions.")  The film enjoys a few inspired moments - the
urn scene, a session of nude bowling, the policeman joining in on
Terry and Nick's acid trip - but unfortunatetely these instances are
few and far between, and for the most part the humour in DREAM WITH
THE FISHES registers more as attempts rather than actual successes.
This occurs particularly often during the film's opening sequence -
as Terry is wrestling the bedridden Nick for his watch in the
hospital, I'm realising that this is *intended* to be funny, although
nary a smile crept upon my lips - which is probably due to the
obvious fact that it's painfully clear to the audience from the outset
that Terry is going to be thwarted in his initial suicide attempts,
sapping any element of surprise or amusement from Nick's scheme of
tricking him; this is not a film which has the wherewithal to kill
off its leading star in the opening ten minutes.  The entire sequence
is, then, clearly an exercise for character exposition, with attempts
at humour terribly diminished by utter predictability.
Among the cast, coming off best is David Arquette, the current master
in the portrayal of meek, squirming, stammering fresh-faced characters
- he would have been terrific as the lead for George Huang's SWIMMING
WITH SHARKS - who gets to apply his adeptness for timidity as Terry.
Mr. Taylor ambitiously employs an interesting visual technique, where
the portions of the film set in an urban environment have been
processed to appear extremely grainy and heavily saturated, as
opposed to a bright, crisp look for the smalltown scenes.
The charge of DREAM WITH THE FISHES's protagonists being wholly
unempathetic is a bit of an odd one coming from me; I seem to have a
predilection for films with unlikeable characters, and indeed, in many
cases have I been in the minority, supporting films which have been
condemned as interminable due to the difficult, audience-unfriendly
nature of their characters. For DREAM WITH THE FISHES, though, I did
find myself on the flip side of coin, often hoping that the film
would quickly conclude, and that the Nick character would just hurry
up and die.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"At one point when berated and bloodied by her male military superior,
 Moore screams out a guttural invitation to him to enjoy partaking in the
 absorption of a certain anatomical member." - Dan Cox, VARIETY, on G.I. JANE

Title
Review for Mrs. Brown (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
The film MRS BROWN, directed by John Madden, focuses on a little-known
chapter in the history of the British monarchy, and in retrospect it is
somewhat surprising that it has taken so long for this story to be
depicted onscreen: it has all the requsite elements -- an uplifting
story arc, grandiose, larger-than-life characters, a deep friendship
overcoming class boundaries, the majesty of royalty (to quote Richard
Harris from UNFORGIVEN), and the fact that it is based upon obscure
truth -- that would make it appear to be an eminently feasible film
project.
Given the source material, it would be really difficult for Mr. Madden to
make an uninteresting film out of this, and MRS BROWN does indeed work,
gaining momentum particularly during the film's second half, yet his
helming does not succeeed in ascending the film beyond the limitations of
the material; it is somehow guarded and vaguely distant.  Rather than
being a great *film*, the impression is left that MRS BROWN is a polite,
decent adaptation of a *great story* -- the distinction is subtle, yet
noticeable.
The film's title is an interesting one, for there is no Mrs. Brown in the
film in a literal sense, and yet it is "Mrs. Brown", and the connotations
of this title, which truly delves into the heart of the picture.  The
lady in question is actually Queen Victoria, generally considered to be
the greatest British monarch of the modern era, and the film is set in
1864, after the death of her beloved husband Price Albert from typhoid
fever.  Inconsolably grief-stricken, Her Majesty (Judi Dench) retreats
from public life into a state of cyclic mourning, much to the concern of
the British Court and government, particularly the Prince of Wales
(David Westhead) and Prime Minister Benjamin Disraeli (Antony Sher).
The popularity of the Crown is waning, and it seems that nothing can be
done to resuscitate Victoria from her sorrowful stupor.  In an act of
desperation, Crown secretary Henry Posonby (Geoffrey Palmer) summons
Scottish highlander John Brown (Billy Connolly) from the Balmoral
estate, in the hopes that the spirited nature of her late husband's
riding partner might revive the Queen's spirits.  This he does, with a
demeanour which shocks the British Court -- rather than dealing with
Victoria in submissive subservience, Brown is cheerfully brash and
forthright with her, never mincing words -- and so begins a relationship
between the Queen and her servant which grows to be deep and fierce,
scandalizing Great Britain and resulting in the more bold and brazen to
mockingly refer to Her Majesty as "Mrs. Brown".
MRS BROWN shares a great deal in common with Nicholas Hytner's THE
MADNESS OF KING GEORGE in that both films address the shaky status of
the monarchy with the British government and the people during episodes
of extreme turmoil with the monarch.  With Victoria's extended withdrawal
from her public duties as Queen during her mourning, liberals are
clamouring for the disestablishment of the monarchy, which understandably
frightens the Prince of Wales and royalist Prime Minister Disraeli.  To
turn the tide against increasing public apathy for the position of the
Crown in society, it becomes imperative for them to goad the Queen from
her lament, but when Brown is all-too-successful in the task, leaving
Victoria happy to spend out her days with his companionship, away from
the public eye, the Prince and the Prime Minister are forced to attack
the problem from different tacts.  The political schemes behind the
scenes in MRS BROWN are fascinating, played out like an analytical
chess match, and in particular, Mr. Sher gives a very nicely done, oily
performance as the eloquent, clever Prime Minister.
While the political manoueverings in MRS BROWN provide the intrigue, the
heart of the film involve the bond which forms between Victoria and
Brown.  The development of the relationship is a bit forced -- there is
a rather noticable leap in the friendship between when the pair come to
an uneasy understanding to when the Queen is confiding her innermost
thoughts to her faithful servant and friend -- but the depiction of the
eventual depth and warmth of the relationship is well done.  Ms. Dench
is marvellous as the film's lead, with an imposing screen presence which
is truly evocative of royalty.  Her careful, stoic performance is subtle,
bringing forth the portrayal of a woman whose rigid, mannered upbringing
results in the repression of a flurry of emotions stirring just under the
surface.  Mr. Connolly's performance is a bit one-note, and not
particularly accomplished -- it really is more of an onscreen physical
presence than a portrayal per se -- but is sufficiently capable for the
less emotionally-strenuous scenes of his Brown character.
While MRS BROWN employs a number of clearly fictional embellishments to
heighten the emotional punch of its story (which work to varying
degrees), I have come to understand that it is remarkably truthful to
fact.  It does go without saying that Queen Victoria did return to her
royal duties, and MRS BROWN includes the obligatory sequence of her
triumphant return to her adoring public, but it is perhaps indicative of
the success of the film in creating a strong emotional connection
between its characters and the audience that these scenes are suitably
stirring.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Let's hurt somebody." - Aaron Eckhart, IN THE COMPANY OF MEN

Title
Review for Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle (1994)
Fineline
Starring Jennifer Jason Leigh, Matthew Broderick, Campbell Scott,
         Jennifer Beals, Peter Gallagher, Andrew McCarthy,
         Wallace Shawn, Martha Plimpton, Sam Robards, Lili Taylor,
         James LeGros, Gwyneth Paltrow, Heather Graham, Stephen Baldwin
Written by Alan Rudolph and Randy Sue Coburn
Produced by Robert Altman
Directed by Alan Rudolph
Rated AA [Adult Accompaniment] in Canada for brief nudity and 
   coarse language
     After opening exclusively in New York in late November 1994, the
new Alan Rudolph film, MRS. PARKER AND THE VICIOUS CIRCLE is
beginning to get a wider, if somewhat restricted, distribution, and has
opened here in Toronto during the Xmas weekend.
     Filmed in Montreal, MRS. PARKER is a loosely biographical film
dealing with the writer Dorothy Parker, who entertained America in the
1920s  with her sharp tongue and witticisms, and her follies with what
became known as the Algonquin Round Table, a group of friends and
colleagues who would dine daily at the Algonquin in New York and trade
verbal barbs and amused chatterings.  This group would encompass some
of the most influential figures on American culture of their time.
     If you're looking for an upbeat feel-good comedy, this is likely a
film you would want to stay away from.  As Dorothy Parker's life is
revealed through a series of flashbacks, swapping between her youth and
her old age, it is revealed that behind her banter and sly wit lay
sorrow, despair, self-consciousness and perpetual depression.  We
cringe in the audience as we watch Parker desperately enter futile
relationship after relationship, thus perpetuating the cycle of her
misery, and we morosely watch the elderly Parker, a shadow of her
former self, react with regret and grief on actions unfulfilled and
love unconsummated.
     The young ensemble cast is very solid in MRS. PARKER in their
limited roles, but the three major characters featured in the film are
Dorothy Parker (Leigh), Robert Benchley (Scott), and Charles MacArthur
(Broderick).  Broderick is fine as one of Parker's loves, and Campbell
Scott is outstanding in a potential break-out performance as Parker's
confidant and soulmate--physically, in this film he mildly resembles a
dapper Patrick Bergen--but by and large, this film is a vehicle for
Jennifer Jason Leigh, who is in virtually every scene.
     Much has been said in the press and the newsgroups about how
Leigh's rendition of Parker's slurred, grating voice has rendered much
of her dialogue incomprehensible, but honestly, I did not encounter
this problem at all.  It may be a function of the theatre speakers and
background noise (i.e., viewers talking) that may compound the difficulty
for some, but in general her words are understandable, if mildly
challenging.  In any case, her version sounds so true to the original
that one must give her points for trying.
     Dorothy Parker, as depicted in this film, is a well-suited entry
in Leigh's catalog of downbeat, dark, and quirky characters, and while
she is capable in the role, it is a mild disappointment that, save for
the inflection, she did not stretch much further for it.  Many of
Leigh's own characteristic performance ticks can be seen in the film,
but it may due to the character's lack of range in the screenplay that
this becomes obvious.  Nonetheless, Leigh will probably get serious
Oscar consideration, since this is one of very few high-profile
dominant female roles of the year, and her other work has been
critically accepted.
     MRS. PARKER suffers from some significant pacing problems and at
times seems too choppy and uneven.  The film lurches between the two
timelines, and while what's depicted on-screen is done well, it only
gives the audience a voyeuristic glance into scenes from Parker's life,
and doesn't flesh out the characters sufficiently.  The conclusion of
the film seems to come rather abruptly, and some scenes in the movie
tend to be a bit overlong in bringing their significance to point.  The
humour is a hit-and-miss affair; some points are roaringly funny, while
other jabs provide nary a chuckle.  The costumes (by John Hay) and
production design (by Francois Seguin) are first rate, and the period
score, though appropriate, is slightly overprominent and becomes
grating at times.
     Though the screenplay could have probably undergone a bit more
revision, it is nonetheless very effective in its ultimate portrayal of
Parker as a tragic figure.  While those with no familiarity or interest
in Dorothy Parker may be disenchanted, the combination of this
unfortunate soul in American history with an excellent ensemble cast
makes MRS. PARKER AND THE VICIOUS CIRCLE a haunting little film.  On
my four-star scale, I give this a two-and-a-half.
Note:  There is one scene that is shown after the credits have begun to
       roll, so one may want to remain for that scene to complete before
       leaving.  Incidentally, Leigh's half-sister, Mina Badie, has a
       minor speaking part in this film.

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
8MM (Columbia - 1999)
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Joaquin Phoenix, James Gandolfini, Peter Stormare
Screenplay by Andrew Kevin Walker
Produced by Gavin Polone, Judy Hofflund and Joel Schumacher
Directed by Joel Schumacher
Running time: 119 minutes 
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   A film revolving around subject matter as morally repugnant as the
   mythic snuff movie is not one which will exactly inspire a lot of
   affection; not only will many find the material so thoroughly
   distasteful that a typical knee-jerk reaction is to reject the entire
   project outright, but even the more tolerant will find themselves
   immersed in a harrowing world of debauchery.  Equally contentious is
   that the vague undercurrent of hypocrisy involved in condemning
   sadistic voyeurs while neglecting to indict the audience's own
   complicity in partaking this inherently voyeuristic tale.  In short,
   this is the sort of edgy, unpalatable material which one would expect
   to find tackled in a more daring independent film, not addressed in a
   big-budget studio production starring Nicolas Cage. However, despite
   giddy overtures to the contrary, it eventually becomes clear that
   8MM, a picture which finds detective Tom Welles (Cage) and newfound
   sidekick Max California (Joaquin Phoenix) in search of a teenage girl
   seemingly murdered in an old 8mm reel, is unwilling to explore the
   iniquitous subject head-on and instead uses it as a basis for rote
   thriller sequences.
   8MM is the newest entry in an oeuvre of mostly unfortunate vigilante
   pictures by the Internet's most-maligned director, Joel Schumacher,
   whose effectively provocative FALLING DOWN was more than offset by A
   TIME TO KILL and his notorious BATMAN films.  (There's some irony in
   that 8MM, with Cage's grim, obsessive leather-clad hero and Phoenix's
   brash, wisecracking sidekick, captures the ethos of the Dark Knight
   legend far better than either of his two pictures in the Warner Bros.
   franchise.)  While it's difficult to defend his recent track record,
   it should be accounted for that Schumacher was working from
   screenplays by longtime collaborator Akiva Goldsman -- not the most
   promising of starting points.  (I'm not sure that even the greatest
   director alive could've made anything worthwhile out of the insipid
   BATMAN AND ROBIN screenplay.)
   In this picture, Schumacher instead works from a script from SE7EN
   scribe Andrew Kevin Walker, and while many comparisons can be drawn
   between the David Fincher picture and this one (in particular,
   Walker's morbid fascination with the grotesque), from a narrative
   standpoint 8MM is largely indebted to Paul Schrader's HARDCORE, which
   followed George C. Scott in a father's dogged search of his daughter
   into the depths of the underground sex world; similarly, in the
   Schumacher film Welles finds himself delving into the seedy
   underground pornography scene in order to track down the elusive girl
   in the dated film footage.  There's less of a personal tie here --
   Welles is essentially a mercenary figure -- but the story is given a
   paternal angle through an affecting performance by Amy Morton as the
   missing girl's mother, and imbued with emotional shadings through
   Welles' transformation into an avenging angel.
   The film's early sequences depicting Welles as an adoring family man
   with wife Amy (Catherine Keener) and a baby daughter carry immediate
   significance -- 8MM is less interested in establishing a background
   of normalcy than it is setting up his downfall, hence the cuddling,
   kissing and I-love-yous give way to uncomfortable silences and
   increasingly infrequent phone calls from the road as the film
   progresses.  With Amy as his metaphoric lifeline, Welles' deepening
   disaffection and hardening is revealed by his cold and distant manner
   as he spirals into the nightmarish abyss.  It's not very profound nor
   particularly subtle -- there are even overly explicit lines of
   dialogue like "There are things that you're gonna see that you can't
   unsee: they get in your head and stay there" and "If you dance with
   the devil, the devil don't change, the devil changes you" -- but it's
   nonetheless effective to contrast the stony-faced Welles blankly
   staring at lurid acts of sexual torture with the one whose loathing
   of violence is so pronounced that his screening of the girl's filmed
   slaughter prompts exaggerated cringing and horrified shudders.
   Curiously, Welles' screening of the snuff film, clearly one of 8MM's
   most crucial sequences, is far less effective than it ought to be,
   largely due to the failure to build an ominous mood of dread leading
   into the scene.  It's also not helped by Mychael Danna's percussive
   predilection -- if ever there was a picture which cried out for a
   moody Howard Shore score, it would be this.
   While the procedural vignettes which follow are competent if
   unconvincing -- Welles doesn't come off as nearly resourceful enough
   to trace the girl's path so handily, though clues and breaks in the
   case clearly pop up in order to expedite the storyline -- the
   picture hits its stride when it shifts locales to Hollywood and links
   Welles up with Max, a punky adult store clerk who guides him through
   the Los Angeles underground sex scene.  The film's strength is in its
   seedy, revulsive depiction of this shadowy world, in no small part
   due to the sets and lighting; in stark contrast to the almost
   wholesome, cheerful version of the mainstream pornographic world
   drawn out in bright colors in BOOGIE NIGHTS, 8MM uncovers the flip
   aspect of its hidden, seamier side, taking the film into damp, dark
   basements bathed in cold, clinical neon light.  There's a palatable
   sense of danger in these gritty scenes, and the frequent glimpses of
   miscellaneous S&M footage (surprisingly graphic for a studio picture,
   though no moreso than in, say, David Cronenberg's VIDEODROME) in
   conjunction with the bombardment of disturbing perversions help to
   create a thoroughly unsettling ambiance fraught with tension.  While
   Schumacher does not capture the same atmosphere of helplessness and
   despair as Fincher in SE7EN, this film is even more consistently
   gloomy -- it may not be perpetually overcast, but it's not nearly as
   jokey and only sporadically dabbles in humour.  During its
   exploration of this depraved underworld, the relentlessly bleak
   imagery of 8MM is effectively disquieting.
   Unfortunately, the picture slips gears shortly thereafter as it seems
   to lose its nerve and transforms into a fairly routine thriller,
   employing standard chase and fight scenes in a disappointing move
   which feels like a commercial concession.  Aside from an overbroad
   performance by Peter Stormare as "the Jim Jarmusch of porn" and the
   Scooby Doo-like revelation of a surprise villain, it's mostly solidly
   staged -- there's a sequence which momentarily rivals Clarice
   Starling's breach into Buffalo Bill's lair in THE SILENCE OF THE
   LAMBS for tension, and another which momentously hinges upon a
   decision, similar to the climax of SE7EN -- but it squanders the
   sordid tone in favour of familiar cathartic slam-bam heroics and
   vengeance.  The inclusion of self-psychoanalysis by the villains was
   also an unwelcome choice; while occasionally gripping (the villain's
   rant in the Fincher picture worked on sheer acting prowess), it's
   usually just goofy, and in 8MM's case, unintentionally laughable --
   when one unmasked villain meaningfully readjusted his appearance and
   launched into a speech about the banality of evil, I almost groaned
   aloud.  When Welles screamed "Why?" at his tormentors, I wasn't
   counting on such an elaborate and detailed explanation.
   Though 8MM's conventional latter half is substantially less
   enthralling than the scenes leading into it, the strong visual work
   of the picture is still reasonably successful in evoking a creepy and
   foreboding atmosphere.  Ultimately, the most disturbing thing about
   the film is how close it comes to becoming something truly memorable
   before veering back into safer territory.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"X-FILES fans come up to me in malls expecting me to be able to fill them
 in on the whole conspiracy.  Half the time I have no idea what they're
 talking about." - Martin Landau

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
THE FULL MONTY (Fox Searchlight - 1997)
Starring Robert Carlyle, Tom Wilkinson, Mark Addy, Lesley Sharp,
  Emily Woof, Steve Huison, Paul Barber, Hugo Speer
Screenplay by Simon Beaufoy
Produced by Uberto Pasolini
Directed by Peter Cattaneo
Running time: 91 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
As the summer films begin to dwindle in numbers at theatres, it
becomes increasingly clear that in 1997, only two films have been
able to breach the gulf between specialty theatres and the mainstream
to become indisputable crossover successes -- Victor Nunez's family
drama ULEE'S GOLD and Peter Cattaneo's striptease comedy THE FULL
MONTY, both of which in recent months improbably made appearances in
weekend domestic Top 10 box office totals, typically dominated by
mainstream fare.  (One could also make a case for John Madden's
historical drama MRS BROWN and Masayuki Suo's uplifting SHALL WE
DANCE? as similar crossover successes; neither of them were able to
crack weekend box office Top 10 listings, but they have both had
long, relatively successful runs.)
As has been well publicized, the focus of THE FULL MONTY is a group
of unemployed men who, inspired by the success of a visiting troupe
of Chippendale dancers, form a striptease act in order to scrape up
some money.  The kicker is that our protagonists are not the hunky
beefcakes which typify a lineup for the Chippendale dancers -- one is
decidedly overweight, two are scrawny, and the only two which know
how to perform anything resembling dance aren't exactly in the prime
of their youth anymore.  Uh oh.
The opening reels of THE FULL MONTY sets up the basic framework for
the predicament our heroes face in order to arrive at their
striptease solution.  Set in Sheffield, proudly proclaimed in a
sardonic 1970s promotion reel as a thriving, healthy "City On The
Move", we cut forward in time -- indeed, this may be the first film
I've seen where a title card reading "Twenty five years later"
precedes any live-action footage -- to a city rife with unemployment,
where the town's steel mills, its primary industry, have been shut
down.  Gaz (Robert Carlyle) and best friend Dave (Mark Addy) frequent
the local unemployment centre, ostensibly to write employment inquiry
letters, but spend most of their time instead playing cards.  Even
their priggish former steel mill foreman, Gerald (Tom Wilkinson), has
been released, humiliatingly putting him on equal terms with his
ex-employees.  It's an all-too-familiar situation in the contemporary
reality of working-class towns, where an aura of resigned
hopelessness, broken dreams, and wounded pride permeates the
environment.
However, THE FULL MONTY is such a determinedly cheerful film, full of
levity and upbeat moments, that there's no real sense of despair or
gloom in the characters' situation of unemployment; it's really a
superficial depiction of their dilemma.  Admittedly, given that the
film is a comedy, it would probably be inappropriate for THE FULL
MONTY to deeply delve into the characters' plights in a mournful and
downcast fashion, but the film is so jovial and spirited in nature
that the artifice of the construct of THE FULL MONTY is blindingly
clear and mildly distracting -- everything is centered around and in
service of the striptease storyline.
Simon Beaufoy's debut screenplay, save for the wickedly funny
premise, is a rather bland one.  THE FULL MONTY's protagonists are
essentially a group of collected idiosyncratic individuals who make
for unlikely pals, but the film gathers them together in a trite
manner which fails to fully exploit its full comic potential, and the
three principal characters are given would-be touching personal
subplots which are too familiar in nature (Gaz is threatened with
loss of shared custody for his obligatorily cute son due to his
inability to afford child support; Dave's insecurity with his
appearance results in a faltering relationship with his spouse;
Gerald, too ashamed to tell his wife about his lack of employment,
bravely continues a charade of heading off to work every morning) to
be as affecting as aspired.  THE FULL MONTY's characters are
consequently likable, but lack real depth and aren't particularly
compelling.
While THE FULL MONTY seems to explore aspects of social realism in a
halfhearted manner, there is a detectable momentum built up towards
the film's dance scenes, which are very funny indeed.  The scenes
where the uncoordinated men are being taught how to dance by Gerald
-- himself intuitively not the most obvious instructor for a
striptease endeavour, given that his dance repertoire seems to
consist primarily of amateur ballroom dancing; hardly suitable
credentials to school on the art of gyrating pelvises, one would
think -- are terribly amusing (two great scenes in this vein are
where one whips off his belt, lashing the fellow next to him, and
where Gaz twirls his leather jacket over his head, pelting onlookers
with spare change from his jacket pockets), while the group lineup
dance in the unemployment office to Donna Summer's "Hot Love", as
revealed in the film's trailers, is a real scream, an unadulterated
burst of infectious, joyous energy.
The ensemble cast in THE FULL MONTY is invariably solid, with the
standout performance coming from chameleonic Mr. Carlyle, who in a
role completely different from his most famous turn as the
temperamental Begbie in Danny Boyle's TRAINSPOTTING, shows great
expressiveness and demonstrates the ability to be irrepressibly brash
and unrestrainedly free-spirited while remaining empathic.  He makes
a fine central character in THE FULL MONTY, and shows promise as an
unconventional, down-to-earth leading man.
THE FULL MONTY is a feelgood crowd-pleaser, and inevitably, after the
film reaches its low point at the end of its second act, there is a
build up towards the big nightclub stripping performance which serves
as the film's showcase.  All loose ends are dutifully resolved in a
suitably upbeat manner, and in front of a full house, the boys
finally hit the stage to the strains of "You Can Leave Your Hat On".
They, of course, do not.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I'll shoot for the Queen, and you can shoot for, well, whomever."
                               - Richard Harris, UNFORGIVEN

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
COP LAND (Miramax - 1997)
Starring Sylvester Stallone, Harvey Keitel, Ray Liotta, Robert De Niro,
  Peter Berg, Janeane Garafalo, Robert Patrick, Michael Rapaport,
  Annabella Sciorra, Noah Emmerich, Cathy Moriarty
Screenplay by James Mangold
Produced by Cary Woods, Cathy Konrad, Ezra Swerdlow
Directed by James Mangold
Running time: 105 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
I have always believed that Sylvester Stallone had the ability to turn
in a good acting performance -- after all, one doesn't turn in such a
subtle, nuanced performance as he did in his film ROCKY simply by
chance.  He has not, however, given a performance of note in recent
years, nor has he faced any sort of role which would test his acting
chops; save for the odd foray into comedy (such as OSCAR and STOP! OR
MY MOM WILL SHOOT), Mr. Stallone has been restricted to the role of
Action Star, where characterization typically surrenders to stunts and
effects sequences.
Mr. Stallone makes his much-heralded return to "serious" acting in James
Mangold's police drama COP LAND, where he plays his first recognizably
humanized character in well over a decade.  Gone are the
larger-than-life, testosterone-soaked superheroics -- Mr. Stallone's
Freddy Heflin character is an agreeable, half-deaf, overweight sheriff
of the town of Garrison, New Jersey.  Supporting Mr. Stallone in COP LAND
is an impressive ensemble cast of remarkable talent -- iconic actors such
as Harvey Keitel and Robert De Niro, surrounded by capable actors like
Ray Liotta, Peter Berg, Michael Rappaport and Janeane Garafolo.
James Mangold's first film was a character drama called HEAVY, which I
have not seen as of this writing.  I have, however, read Mr. Mangold's
corresponding screenplay, which was superb -- rich with characterization
and incisive dialogue, with a series of compelling plots rife with an
undercurrent of sadness.  The same can be said for Mr. Mangold's
COP LAND, and it quickly becomes apparent how his second project has
managed to gain the interest and attention of such an astonshingly
varied group of talented actors -- COP LAND juggles several subplots
simultaneously, and is filled with numerous meaty roles which all figure
prominently into the film's storyline; there are very few throwaway
supporting characters of little consequence to COP LAND, and it would
seem that the prospect of portraying one of the many integral characters
in a complex drama must have been enticing to the acting talent.
Unfortunately, it is this very selling point of COP LAND which proves to
be its undoing; the film is simply too unfocused, veering back and forth
from one subplot to the next.  Mr. Mangold has written a involving epic
covering much terrain, and then tried to cram it all into a movie which
runs less than two hours.  There is too much going on in each subplot to
be adequately covered in a one-hundred minute film -- COP LAND is a film
which could stand to improve with a longer running time, where the
relationships between the characters could be developed and examined in
greater depth, and the various story angles could be covered in a more
complete and satisfactory fashion.  As it stands, the stories in COP LAND
seem hurried as they compete with each other for screentime, and leap
forward in sporadic bursts rather than unfolding in a natural
progression.
COP LAND has its strengths: its premise of a small town populated almost
exclusively of corrupt New York police officers is intriguing, and the
film's action sequences, including a nighttime car chase and a rooftop
fight scene are dynamic and well-shot by cinematographer Eric Edwards.
Prolific composer Howard Shore provides COP LAND with a striking, moody
score, and while she has a smallish role in the current context of the
film, Janeane Garafolo once again steals scenes as Deputy Cindy Betts, a
newcomer to the Garrison police force -- what a remarkable talent she is.
While it is somewhat disappointing that the climactic sequence in
COP LAND is a directly confrontational one, Mr. Mangold's inspired use of
sound in conjunction with this battle is effective, original and
striking.  However, COP LAND is ultimately hampered by its insufficient
rendering of each subplot.  It is of course possible to juggle several
subplots and a myriad of characters simultaneously -- Robert Altman's
films are proof enough of that -- but Mr. Mangold's characters are so
well drawn out and the subplots are of sufficient complexity that they
virtually cry out for a more detailed depiction than what is eventually
shown in this cut of the film; watching COP LAND feels somewhat like
watching a random one-hundred minutes of what should be a 140-minute
film.
As for Mr. Stallone, his performance is somewhat of a disappointment.
His 38-pound weight-gain to portray Sheriff Freddy Heflin has been
well-publicized in the media, and his performance is more understated
and self-contained than any of his other recent performances, yet Mr.
Stallone is not particularly successful in depicting his character's
mental and emotional anguish -- Freddy has been transfixed with Liz
(Annabella Sciorra), the wife of tempermental cop Joey Randone (Peter
Berg) ever since he rescued her in an automobile accident which caused
his partial deafness, yet Mr. Stallone's method of portrayal this
onscreen consists mostly of staring vacantly into space, a glimmer of
wistfulness peeking out from behind his eyes, while his character's
increasing unease with the shady goings-on with the corrupt New York
police officers, led by Ray Donlan (Harvey Keitel), which run the town
is also ineffectively depicted.  Mr. Stallone is not great, or even
particularly good, in COP LAND, but he takes a solid step forward in
terms of regaining his credibility with the general public as a bonafide
actor.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Let's hurt somebody." - Aaron Eckhart, IN THE COMPANY OF MEN

Title
Review for Washington Square (1997)
WASHINGTON SQUARE (Buena Vista - 1997)
Starring Jennifer Jason Leigh, Albert Finney, Ben Chaplin,
  Maggie Smith, Judith Ivey
Screenplay by Carol Doyle, based on the novel by Henry James
Produced by Roger Birnbaum, Julie Bergman Sender
Directed by Agnieszka Holland
Running time: 115 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
With the 1996 Gramercy release of Jane Campion's THE PORTRAIT OF A
LADY, the upcoming Miramax release of Iain Softley's THE WINGS OF THE
DOVE, and this Buena Vista release of the Agneiszka Holland-helmed
WASHINGTON SQUARE, it is abundantly clear that film adaptations based
upon the works of Henry James are currently in fashion.  It is no
accident that both period melodramas WASHINGTON SQUARE and the
forthcoming THE WINGS OF THE DOVE are late-year releases, as was last
year's intricate THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY; they are strategically being
positioned in film release schedules in aspirations of possible Oscar
gold.  While the Oscar campaign for Ms. Campion's film fared somewhat
disappointingly, eventually netting only two Academy Award
nominations, WASHINGTON SQUARE, while generally a decent adaptation
of Henry James' novel, should consider itself lucky to do so well
come February 1998.
It will be inevitable that comparisons will abound between Ms.
Holland's version of WASHINGTON SQUARE and William Wylder's 1948
film, THE HEIRESS, featuring an illustrious cast including Ralph
Richardson, Montgomery Clift, and, in an Academy Award-winning role,
Olivia de Havilland, given that both films draw from the same source
material.  Such comparisons will invariably conclude in favour of the
much-revered earlier film, and while there may be merit in such a
conclusion, the mannered WASHINGTON SQUARE, which while more faithful
to James' original novel is also slightly instilled with a modern
feminist edge, remains fairly successfully moving and engaging.
Despite the film's one-sheet, which features Catherine Sloper
(Jennifer Jason Leigh) and her dashing suitor Morris Townsend (Ben
Chaplin) in a passionate if pensive embrace, WASHINGTON SQUARE's key
relationship is not that between the suitor and the painfully shy
heiress, but that between Catherine and her domineering father, Dr.
Austin Sloper (Albert Finney).  Skittishly devoted to her
contemptuous father to the point of tackling him at the front door
upon his daily return and waiting upon him hand and foot, Catherine
is an awkward young woman, sheltered and seemingly oblivious to the
standards of ladylike behaviour as deemed in the 1850s, yet she
appears content with her life in servitude to her beloved father.
The prosperous Dr. Sloper, on the other hand, looks upon his only
daughter with thinly-veiled disdain and embarrassment, resentful of
her mother's death during childbirth and brutally certain that the
eager-to-please Catherine is dim, charmless and has amounted to
nothing.  (His retort to a declaration that his daughter has a great
deal to offer is a genuine, incredulously bland "Such as?")
The status quo in their lives is irrevocably shattered upon the
arrival on the scene of Morris, a handsome young man who begins to
court Catherine, lavishing upon her great interest, attention, and
affection, much to the delight of Catherine's idealist Aunt Lavinia
(Maggie Smith) and to the suspicion of Dr. Sloper, who immediately
concludes that the penniless Morris is interested in her solely for
her inheritance.  While Catherine swoons for Morris, her relationship
with her father becomes increasingly strained, and she
heartbreakingly begins to understand for the first time how unworthy
she has always been in his eyes when Dr. Sloper vows to disinherit
her should she continue to encourage Morris' attentions.
It is not immediately intuitive casting to put Ms. Leigh in the role
of an unattractive spinster, and even moreso as a meek, clumsy
wallflower, but she fares suitably well, imbuing her piteous
character with a desperate craving for affection finally sated by her
romance with the Morris character.  It is in the latter half of
WASHINGTON SQUARE, where Catherine becomes more self-assured and
strong in her resolve, that Ms. Leigh predictably is strongest; her
vivid portrayal of a woman forever changed results in the film's
denouement being as affecting and emotionally resonant as it is.
However, it is Mr. Finney's performance which is the standout in
WASHINGTON SQUARE; his is an imposing and forceful presence in the
film which commands every scene in which he appears, and although his
character's cruel dismissals of his daughter are distasteful, it is
to Mr. Finney's credit that, far from coming off as despicable, there
remains a certain strength, authority, and deeply-buried sense of
genuine concern (if only, perhaps, in his own self-interest) in Dr.
Sloper which is oddly compelling.
The remaining supporting performances are solid.  Ms. Smith is very
amusing in a supporting role, while Mr. Chaplin nicely handles his
character's ambiguous motives with a great deal of subtlety.  While
the Morris character is a challenging role, Mr. Chaplin pulls it off
well, never tipping his hand too early and leaving the audience
hopeful, but uncertainly wavering about its true intentions.  With
his performance here and in Michael Lehmann's THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS &
DOGS, he has built up fine credentials for future thoughtful
Hollywood romantic leads.
WASHINGTON SQUARE's final third is markedly stronger and more
compelling than the previous two-thirds, which may be due to the
turgid manner in which Ms. Holland handles the romance storyline
which is prevalent throughout most of the film's second act.  While
done in a sincere fashion, there isn't a much-needed dizzying,
enthralling sense of passion evident which captures the essence of
Catherine's budding first romance and begins to transform her from a
gawky spinster into a poised, dainty beauty; Catherine and Morris'
affair seems far too polite and mannered.
Attempts to open up the story by screenwriter Carol Doyle are
ill-advised.  The additions of early scenes in Catherine's life fail
to add any added insight not already evident in the main body of the
story, although it does provide Ms. Holland with the opportunity to
open the film with an impressive POV tracking shot.  Sadly, the
costume design by Anna Sheppard, production direction by Allan
Starski, and WASHINGTON SQUARE's score by Jan A.P. Kaczmarek are all
decent but undistinguished.
While Ms. Holland's adaptation of WASHINGTON SQUARE is not a complete
triumph, the intrinsic strength and power of James' story, as
filtered through Ms. Doyle's screenplay, remains intact, and the film
benefits from good performances from its principal cast.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I'll shoot for the Queen, and you can shoot for, well, whomever."
                               - Richard Harris, UNFORGIVEN

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (DreamWorks - 1998)
Starring Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies,
  Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi,
  Matt Damon
Screenplay by Robert Rodat
Produced by Steven Spielberg, Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn
Directed by Steven Spielberg
Running time: 169 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   A sight which never fails to affect me is the annual commemoratory
   gatherings of WWII veterans at war monuments.  It's been over fifty
   years since the curtain fell on the last Great War, and the young men
   who then risked life and limb to fight for their country are now
   aging seniors.  As their numbers dwindle with time and the ceremonies
   now barely rate a five-second blurb with the youth-obsessed media, I
   can't help but be terribly moved to witness these elderly men, in
   full uniform and decorated with ribbons and medals, ignoring the
   protests of their weary bodies as they march with fierce pride and
   solemnly salute their fallen comrades.  I'm overwhelmed with a sense
   of gratitude for the sacrifices and horrors to which these men have
   subjected themselves for the greater good, and saddened by the
   disinterest of the press and the public alike as indicated by the
   sparse attendance of the proceedings.  Shamefully, we have forgotten.
   Steven Spielberg's film, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, attempts to address
   this situation by honouring these valiant soldiers.
   A noble goal, to be sure, but good intentions don't necessarily
   translate into a good film; it's dangerous to fall into the trap of
   judging a film based upon the worthiness of its subject matter.  At
   its best, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is a staggering achievement of
   verisimilitude, recreating the stark terror of the battlefield as
   perhaps no film has ever done before.  Narratively symmetric, it
   opens with a washed-out shot of the stars and stripes fluttering in
   the wind, a present-day war cemetery sequence, and a spectacular
   half-hour battle scene, and closes with a reversal of the same
   elements, in effect coming full circle, although the picture's
   systematic emotional bombardment will undoubtedly result in the
   audience leaving the screening in a markedly different state of mind
   than that as they entered.
   The opening battle segment on the shores of Omaha Beach during the
   D-Day assault is particularly stunning, impressing at once the
   hellish atmosphere of mayhem and carnage, and perhaps most
   significantly, the notion of futility.  History informs us that we
   (referring to the Allied forces) won Omaha, and yet the film
   unblinkingly presents us to the chaos of our troops being mowed down
   in hails of bullets, shredded to pieces by explosives, blood and
   entrails splattering and spilling everywhere, with the cries and
   screams of the wounded and terrified only muted by detonations and
   the sound of ammunition tearing through flesh.  (Curiously enough,
   although SAVING PRIVATE RYAN barely straddled the line between an R
   and the dreaded NC-17 rating from the MPAA, in Ontario it's been
   designated with a relatively biteless rating of AA -- adult
   accompaniment required for under-14s, far weaker than the Rs
   inexplicably given for tame fare such as HIGH ART and HENRY FOOL.)
   Impeccably staged by Mr. Spielberg and captured with the stark,
   glamourless flavour of authentic combat footage by cinematographer
   Janusz Kaminski, the net effect is intensely assaulting and at once
   captures the immense suffering of the soldiers.
   The film wisely decides to forego introductions to the troops prior
   to the battle -- although we immediately latch upon the recognizable
   visage of our modern equivalent to the Jimmy Stewart-ish Everyman,
   Tom Hanks -- lending an unexpected sense of despair to the
   proceedings; not provided with the tools to be allowed to relate to
   the slaughtered onscreen victims as characters and heroes, we're
   forced to view them simply as men, and consequently the bitter
   sentiment of wasted lives is palpable.  Smartly, Mr. Spielberg never
   provides a malevolent close-up of the Axis snipers during the first
   half of this battle -- the Allieds are essentially being attacked by
   a faceless enemy -- and he refrains from indulging in emblematic
   jingoism, avoiding the blatant use of the hateful Nazi swastika until
   quite late in the game; from a larger, philosophical perspective,
   this was a just war, but strictly on the microscopic level of this
   battleground as inspected by this film, principles such as right and
   wrong, good and evil, and heroes and villains don't enter into the
   fray: both sides being humanized, these are men fighting just to stay
   alive.  When the Allied troops are able to topple the German
   stronghold, the mood isn't that of triumphant euphoria or jubilation,
   but of unadulterated relief.
   The Omaha segment is so impressively achieved that it almost seems
   curmudgeonly to point out how clunky the film's screenplay,
   particularly the dialogue, becomes during the middle segment as the
   plot unfolds before giving way to the extended closing battle
   sequence.  Assigned to locate and retrieve a Pvt. James Ryan in a
   goodwill mission, Cpt. John Miller (Mr. Hanks) and his men -- Sgt.
   Horvath (Tom Sizemore), Pvts. Reiben (Edward Burns), Jackson (Barry
   Pepper), Mellish (Adam Goldberg) and Caparzo (Vin Diesel), Medic Wade
   (Giovanni Ribisi), and later, a green translator, Cpl. Upham (Jeremy
   Davies) -- are sent behind enemy lines, and much moralizing and
   philosophizing is performed.  It's all well-intentioned but
   comparatively ineffective in terms of execution, rife with contrived,
   Oscar-ready outbursts of introspection, banter which neither sounds
   genuinely naturalistic nor adequately addresses the issues raised on
   any more than a surface level, and a propensity to lend unearned
   gravity to profundities which lean more towards hokiness than
   provocation.  There's also the problem of tone: the film clearly
   endeavours to capture the aura of a wartorn Europe as seen through
   the bleary eyes of our heroes, and yet two unnecessary comic bits are
   interjected which seem suited for sitcom-level storytelling; it's
   surprising that the film so willingly and needlessly undermines its
   achieved ambiance.  The film's middle stretch has interludes of
   dramatic interest and some thematic exploration, but it's hardly
   groundshattering material.
   SAVING PRIVATE RYAN's arduous middle section would probably be even
   more problematic if not for its direction.  I'm not convinced that
   Mr. Spielberg is The Great Filmmaker Of Our Time; he's indisputably
   made some Great Films (including JAWS, RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, and
   SCHINDLER'S LIST), but, as I recently remarked to a colleague, in a
   reality where Martin Scorsese still walks the Earth, designating Mr.
   Spielberg as America's finest filmmaker (as Time Magazine recently
   declared) is sheer folly.  Nonetheless, he's a director of not
   inconsequential strengths, chief of which is his ability to elicit an
   emotional reaction from his audience; Mr. Spielberg can easily lay
   claim to the title of Master of Emotional Manipulation.  It's a trait
   most conducive to exploitation for this film's subject matter.  I
   appreciated the simple but effective manner of layering several
   voice-overs reading different condolence telegrams as the camera
   panned across a busy room to convey the enormity and tragedy of the
   war, and particularly liked the use of silence accompanying a bit
   with a secretary wordlessly shuffling between three letters and then
   rushing off to draw the attention of her supervisor.  With nary a
   word, the onscreen implications are brutally clear; indeed, what
   words are suitable for such a grievous loss?  It's a much more subtle
   touch than a later monologue by Harve Presnell (performed well,
   incidentally) involving a stirring letter reading.
   For the most part, the film eschews subtlety for the use of emblems,
   both literal and figurative.  Not only does SAVING PRIVATE RYAN open
   and close with a colour-muted shot of the American flag, its vibrancy
   literally drained from it, but it epitomizes in wholesome Pvt. Ryan
   (Matt Damon) the spirit of America; it's no accident that he's from
   Iowa, dead center in the heartland of America, and that his family
   background is in that most American of professions, farming.  (When
   Pvt. Ryan's mother appears onscreen, she's even in the kitchen --
   kudos to the filmmakers for the restraint of not depicting her baking
   an apple pie.)  When Cpt. Miller addresses Pvt. Ryan, particularly at
   a pivotal moment late in the film, he's essentially speaking to the
   audience.  However, the audience surrogate in the picture is not that
   of Pvt. Ryan, but of Cpl. Upham, a nervous wreck thrown into battle
   for the first time.  Like him, we're seeing the horrors of the war
   through startled, inexperienced and idealistic eyes, and consequently
   we're simultaneously dismayed and empathetic at his limited
   effectiveness as a soldier.  Though it was an interesting touch to
   encapsulate the entire conflict into a single scenario -- a German
   soldier killing a Jew as an American soldier stands by helplessly --
   I was most impressed with the film's cynical lesson about the
   consequences of moral righteousness at wartime, an unexpected bit of
   grimness atypical for a film in Mr. Spielberg's oeuvre (although it's
   disappointingly tempered and dulled by a cathartic counterresponse
   which, while audience-pleasing, plays false).
   While SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is far from flawless, during its best
   stretches there are moments of sheer visceral bravura.  Its
   recreation of battles, with the sea literally awash with blood and
   soldiers being slain with horrifying ease, is a testament to the real
   brutality of war.  It's a price which our WWII veterans paid on our
   behalf, and it's something that we should not forget.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
ALIEN RESURRECTION (Fox - 1997)
Starring Sigourney Weaver, Winona Ryder, Ron Perlman,
  Dominique Pinon, Michael Wincott, Dan Hedaya
Screenplay by Joss Whedon
Produced by Bill Badalato, Gordon Carroll, David Giler, Walter Hill
Directed by Jean-Pierre Jeunet
Running time: 108 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Among science-fiction and fantasy aficionados, few film sagas have
   captured the imagination as much as the ALIEN movie franchise, which
   started off with a bang in 1979's unbearably creepy Ridley Scott
   'haunted house-in-space' entry, and continued with a new bent in
   James Cameron's pulse-pounding action-thriller ALIENS in 1986 (an
   exceptionally well-crafted piece of storytelling which I maintain is
   among the best films of its type ever made).  While David Fincher's
   artsy neo-bleak take on the series in 1992's ALIEN3 only succeeded in
   largely alienating (no pun intended) the sizable mainstream audience
   which the prior two films had accumulated and was deemed a box-office
   dud, it was imbued with a collection of interesting new concepts
   which, given the death of feisty protagonist Ripley at the film's
   conclusion, appeared would never be built upon -- until the
   announcement of a fourth entry in the series: ALIEN RESURRECTION,
   whose marketing tagline is "Witness The Resurrection", but might as
   well have been "Ripley's Back!".  About twenty minutes into the
   highly-anticipated new film, I was suddenly struck by the realisation
   that I found myself experiencing something that I'd never expected to
   occur during the screening of an entry in the venerable ALIEN series:
   I was bored.
   Despite all of the horrendous one-liners in the film -- it's hard to
   believe that Joss Whedon actually wrote this dialogue -- and a basic
   scenario which is woefully stale, one can definitely see the seeds of
   intrigue that enticed star Sigourney Weaver to pull her Ripley
   character out of mothballs for this fourth entry in the series.
   (Let's ignore, for the moment, the $11 million paycheque as an
   alternate motivating factor).  There are some interesting and
   imaginative new concepts in this film, and the strange symbiosis
   between the aliens and Ripley here logically follows from the
   previous three films which have seen the two entities increasingly
   intertwined in an idiosyncratic love-hate relationship.  For a $70
   million-budgeted entry in a huge commercial franchise, there's daring
   evidence of a curiously awkward fusion of arthouse sensibilities with
   the film's basic chase narrative.
   However, the film fails to fully develop upon its more intricate
   elements, and instead teeters precariously between conventional
   action and allegorism, failing to satisfy fans of either camps and
   often resulting in unintentional laughs.  More critically
   problematic, however, is the wretched dialogue in the film, filled
   with snappy, attitude-ladened quips which pander to the audience and
   come off as desperately soundbite-friendly.  Or even less so: when
   Ripley matter-of-factly uttered her one-word retort to the exhibition
   of a fork during her period of re-education, I felt my heart sink.
   Danny Boyle (of SHALLOW GRAVE, TRAINSPOTTING, and A LIFE LESS
   ORDINARY fame -- well, maybe not the last one) was originally courted
   to take over helming duties for the project, but after he ultimately
   turned the job down, THE CITY OF LOST CHILDREN's Jean-Pierre Jeunet
   signed on for the project.  Under his wing, the film is predictably
   stylishly directed and filled with Mr. Jeunet's trademark striking
   visuals; there's a distinctly dull, ugly ocher look permeating the
   film, even becoming occasionally grainy as shot by celebrated
   cinematographer Darius Khondji (who won well-deserved plaudits for
   his stunning work in SE7EN), but the impressive (if overly familiar)
   grungy look doesn't make up for the film's more fundamental problems.
   Chief among them is the absence of rich characters in the film.  For
   the most part, the space pirates which eventually make up the hardy
   band struggling to survive the alien onslaught are nondescript and
   lack personality (except, perhaps, for the crass loudmouth Johner
   (Ron Perlman) --  he simply has a bad one).  The characterization in
   Mr. Whedon's screenplay is woeful -- contrast the ALIEN RESURRECTION
   group against the characters in ALIENS, where even minor characters
   like Vasquez and Gorman are well-developed and consequently memorable
   -- and the resultant effect is very little inherent interest in the
   fates of the film's characters and whether they live or die.  For a
   film whose latter half is essentially an extended chase sequence,
   this is not fortuitous.
   Even worse, our beloved heroine Ellen Ripley, newly revived as a
   clone restored from preserved DNA blood samples, isn't entirely human
   -- she's an alien/human hybrid that's consequently more reptilian in
   nature (ineffectively depicted in a scene where she plays
   *basketball*, for crying out loud), possesses a cold and passionless
   demeanour, and has acidic blood coursing through her veins.  It's an
   innovative idea and definitely a new approach to take with the
   character, but it doesn't work: heartlessly ruthless and caustic,
   she's hardly a compelling character, and it's difficult to be engaged
   or really touched by the plight of such a frigid, dryly-observed
   protagonist.
   ALIEN RESURRECTION also suffers from a mundanely straightforward
   storyline which is overly rehashed from previous entries in the
   series.  It's a given from the outset that the film will eventually
   settle into a familiar predicament where Ripley and her company of
   mercenaries will attempt to escape from the marauding aliens, but the
   degree to which this echoes the scenario from ALIENS (heroes must
   evade monsters and reach escape ship before the venue is
   cataclysmically destroyed) is striking, and the sudden leap involved
   between the chase sequence and the initial thread of the scientists
   onboard the Auriga space station studying and attempting to cultivate
   the aliens (highlighted in a scene which plays as a less sympathetic
   rendition straight out of George Romero's DAY OF THE DEAD) is
   remarkably jarring; it's as if the filmmakers were vainly struggling
   to figure out how to get the film between points A and B, and finally
   threw their arms in the air.  The identity and motivations of a
   mysterious entity amidst the space corsairs, an elfin mechanic named
   Call (Winona Ryder -- umm, what happened?) is far less enigmatic that
   desired, while when the "8" tattoo on Ripley is revealed, indicating
   that she's the successful byproduct of the eighth cloning attempt,
   it's inevitable that the results of the seven previous attempts will
   eventually be encountered.  This sequence, strongly reminiscent of a
   similar scene in Tobe Hooper's goofy THE FUNHOUSE, attempts to be so
   filled with pathos that it's mildly disconcerting that the end result
   is near-laughable due to distractingly poor model work.
   The one impressive sequence is that of the film's heroes being
   pursued underwater, a visually impressive and mildly surreal
   experience in an interesting new context where the tension in the
   scene is heightened by deliberately slowing down and drawing out the
   pace of the action.  It's a smart section of the film -- there's
   nothing quite as dreadful as seeing your demise slowly unfold in
   front of you, and being completely helpless to do anything to prevent
   it -- and I only wish that more of the film had been as adept.
   At one point in the film, there was a briefest of glimpses of the
   vulnerable, fearful, and engagingly humanized Ripley which was so
   compelling in the first two entries of the series, and that reminds
   one of just how potent and riveting this film series once was; that's
   the Ripley that I wanted to see.  The susceptible Ripley temporarily
   fought its way to the surface, but was quickly shunted away, usurped
   by her new ultra-cool, wisecracking, bad-ass persona.  With ALIEN
   RESURRECTION, the series has finally collapsed under a weight of
   style and attitude.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"There was a six-year-old girl sitting near me, and she piped up 'That's
 Harvey Keitel' within seconds of the film's start.  I want to know what
 that kid's been seeing." - Charles Odell

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
THE TRUMAN SHOW (Paramount - 1998)
Starring Jim Carrey, Laura Linney, Noah Emmerich, Natascha McElhone
Screenplay by Andrew Niccol
Produced by Scott Rudin, Andrew Niccol, Edward S. Feldman,
  Adam Schroeder
Directed by Peter Weir
Running time: 102 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   When William Shakespeare penned this passage, he could not have
   possibly envisioned a world in which the domestic activites in an
   abode would be broadcast across the continent, or where women would
   install webcams in their apartments in order to convert voyeurism
   into cash.  This is the world of today, and it is the perfect climate
   to unveil a prototypical high-concept project like THE TRUMAN SHOW.
   Truman Burbank (Jim Carrey) seems to have the perfect life.  He has a
   pretty, doting wife Meryl (Laura Linney), a comfortable insurance
   sales position, an immaculate suburban home in the idyllic island
   community of Seahaven, a reliable childhood buddy Marlon (Noah
   Emmerich) -- except for the dog that paws a greeting to him every
   morning and his hydrophobia, this is paradise.
   Or so it would seem.  Bizarre, inexplicable incidents begin to crop
   up in Truman's life.  A lighting fixture unexpectedly plummets from
   the sky.  A rainstorm which gives new meaning to the term 'isolated'
   follows him around.  A radio broadcast appears to be describing his
   every move.  For the first time in his life, it is beginning to dawn
   on Truman that things are not what they appear to be.
   THE TRUMAN SHOW, directed by Peter Weir and written by Andrew Niccol,
   is a remarkably well-constructed film, paced perfectly with every
   scene fluidly leading into the next.  Balancing drama with humour,
   thoughtfulness with abandon, this is a film which addresses an
   intriguing and intricate concept with just the right mixture of
   sermonizing and whimsical fancy.  In many ways, Mr. Niccol's
   screenplay mirrors the spirit of his previous GATTACA -- both films
   focus on the theme of triumph of the human spirit over oppressive
   adversity, with pivotal, character-defining moments occurring at sea.
   Although the film's rather conventional climax doesn't sustain the
   inspired dynamic achieved in the first two-thirds, and ultimately
   just falls short on delivering the intended emotional punch, there
   are moments through THE TRUMAN SHOW which are genuinely stirring and
   moving as Truman attempts to make sense of his unraveling world and
   grasp the implications behind his discoveries of deception.
   Despite the multitude of pertinent issues being broached by the film,
   it remains foremost a finely-crafted piece of entertainment,
   constantly light and accessible.  The tone achieved is far too sunny
   for any sense of fearful paranoia to legitimately intrude, and as the
   carefully-stacked Seahaven house of cards tumbles down, the film
   eschews any psychological ramifications for a man discovering that
   the fundamentals of his entire existence have been false.  The end
   act of THE TRUMAN SHOW essentially boils down to a rehash of the
   reliable, crowdpleasing Underdog Vs. The System formula.
   While the film is an impressive realisation of an inspired concept,
   some elements are lacking.  The device of mysterious Lauren/Sylvia
   (Natascha McElhone) as a contributing impetus to Truman's growing
   awareness isn't exactly convincing.  There's not much of a
   discernable spark between either the two characters or the actors
   themselves, and the scenes in which she indignantly confronts the
   megalomaniac Christoff (Ed Harris) with regards to the moral
   ambiguity of his actions unnecessarily spells things out for the
   audience, thankfully avoided elsewhere in the film.
   In fact, although the film smartly restricts the number of scenes
   depicting the real world outside Truman's artificial utopia to a mere
   handful of select reaction shots from enraptured gazers, it might
   have perhaps been even more indicting and damning to immerse itself
   even *more* deeply in the insulatory Seahaven world, with the
   resultant effect that the repercussions felt as the film finally
   shifts outside the imposed bubble are all the more startling.  Still,
   the scathing commentary issued by this film is on target, and its
   insidiously oblique manner of delivery is far more effective in
   conveying the message than the more forthright anti-voyeuristic
   tirades such as that of the recent Costa Gavras film MAD CITY.
   I've always believed that the versatile Ms. Linney possesses a
   tremendous comic gift -- she has always seems to have a impish gleam
   in her eyes -- and in THE TRUMAN SHOW she runs rampant with her
   duplicitous character, mischievously flashing a glazed, insanely
   jovial grin as she perkily recites impromptu product placement
   slogans.  Cheerfully going over the top, it's hilarious to watch her
   -- who would have ever guessed that she'd have the opportunity to
   outshine the reigning King Of Comedy in the laughs department of a
   film?  Ms. Linney is a delight in the film.
   But it is Mr. Carrey who rules the show here.  He may not have been
   intuitively the most obvious choice to portray underdog hero Truman
   Burbank -- the role is seriously lacking in any of the frenetic comic
   interludes which typify his traditional parts -- but he brings to the
   character tremendous energy and eminent appeal: it's difficult not to
   root for Truman.  In a commanding performance, Mr. Carrey lends our
   protagonist an inherent sense of decency and integrity which makes
   him a genuinely engaging presence, and acquits himself impressively
   in this dramatic turn, demonstrating admirable restraint -- there's
   an early scene where he's down on his knees gardening, and given his
   past track record, one almost instinctively anticipates Mr. Carrey to
   pull one of more infamous, and in this case, wholly inappropriate
   sight gags.  It's almost poetic how this notorious look-at-me actor
   successfully tones it down to play a character who's constantly the
   centre of attention.
   In addition to the fine performances by the bulk of the cast -- Mr.
   Emmerich is particularly noteworthy for issuing his character a sense
   of sturdy trustworthiness -- the film is immeasurably aided by
   wonderful production design by Dennis Gassner in creating Truman's
   antiseptic, white picket-fenced smalltown utopia, and by Burkhard
   Dallwitz's original score.  Technical credits are first-rate all
   around.
   While THE TRUMAN SHOW is clearly a definitive high-concept film, it's
   not exactly a dazzlingly innovative one -- obvious predecessors
   utilising common elements abound, ranging from 1965's SECRET AGENT
   through to the groundbreaking British 1967 TV series THE PRISONER.
   All the same, this is a visionary, award-calibre film: entertaining,
   provocative, and intelligent.
   The curious (and possibly disturbing) thing may be that although upon
   first glance the plausibility of the film's concept seems
   unfathomably outrageous, it's abundantly clear that our society is
   rapidly approaching, if not actualisation, at least permissiveness of
   such a scenario.  Perhaps the highest compliment which can be paid to
   Mr. Weir is that his depiction of this bizarro state is so convincing
   that we accept it without question.  Perhaps we recognize a bit of
   ourselves in this world.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Title
Review for Chacun cherche son chat (1996)
WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY (CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT) (Sony Pictures
 Classics - 1996)
Starring Garance Clabel, Zinedine Soualem, Renee Le Calm, Oliver Py,
  Arapimou
Screenplay by Cedric Klapisch
Produced by Aissa Djabri, Farid Lahoussa, Manuel Munz
Directed by Cedric Klapisch
Running time: 95 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
I was not familiar with director Cedric Klapisch before I caught
CHACUN CHERCHE SON CHAT (WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY), having not seen any
of his prior feature films (RIENS DU TOUT, LE PERIL JEUNE) or
subsequent features (UN AIR DE FAMILLE), but it was not too far into
the film when I became convinced that Mr. Klapisch was a filmmaker of
talent and significance.  There are a handful of scenes and shots in
WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY which virtually had me bolt out of my seat with
the realization that this was a *director* at work here; in an era
where capable if inoffensively bland and uninspired craftsmen (say,
Ron Howard) and flashy cut-cut-cut-cut specialists (perhaps Michael
Bay?) can lay claim to such a title, Mr. Klapisch's talents are
definitely noteworthy and certainly worthy of embracement.
The scene in WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY which cinched my positive assessment
of Mr. Klapisch is Chloe's vacation scene, of which I should say
little other than it's truly an inspired piece of work, utilising
both wit and narrative economy.  This is a sequence which could have
been handled in a million-and-one different ways; Mr. Klapisch pares
down the situation and discards one million of them, selecting the
single most perfect manner to handle the scene, which a lesser
director might simply consider as a throwaway one of little
consequence.
The aforementioned Chloe (wonderful Garance Clavel) is the protagonist
of WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY, a young modelling agency makeup artist who
shares her apartment in Paris' Bastille district with her homosexual
roommate Michel (Oliver Py) and her beloved cat, Gris-Gris (Ms.
Clavel's own cat, Arapimou).  As the film opens, Chloe is in the
midst of preparations for a long-awaited seaside vacation;
unfortunately, Gris-Gris cannot accompany her on the trip, and Michel
is unwilling to look after the cat, so she's in a bit of a bind.
(This, come to think of it, results in another terrific scene where
Chloe sits on her couch checking off her 'To Do' list - "Find someone
to care for Gris-Gris" is the sole unmarked entry - while mournful
music swells in the background, and the cat cutely perches on her
lap.)  After asking around throughout her neighbourhood, she's pointed
in the direction of Madame Renee (Renee Le Calm, a non-actor who
essentially portrays herself), an fiercely-opinionated elderly woman
who works at home as a catsitter.  Madane Renee cheerfully (well,
relatively speaking) takes in Gris-Gris, but when Chloe returns from
her holiday she finds the catsitter thoroughly distraught, for the cat
has gone missing.  The two women then set out in search of Gris-Gris.
On the surface, this does not sound like the most enthralling of film
subjects - a woman in search of her pet cat - but WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY
is not really about Chloe and her cat: it instead uses this as a
starting point from which to leap.  Chloe's search for Gris-Gris
brings her into contact with a diverse group of interesting people in
her immediate community that she would have never otherwise met, and
sets about a chain of delightfully humourous misadventures.  The loss
of Gris-Gris compounded by the encounters with her many neighbours
also triggers Chloe's acute awareness of her own loneliness and
self-imposed isolation, which she attempts to address through by
exposing herself to social environments never before partaken.
Meanwhile, throughout the film Mr. Klapisch weaves in an affecting
thread of lament, mourning the gentrification of Paris as familiar
stores are replaced by new trendy ones, and the old buildings are
displaced by new ones catering to the young.
WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY could have gone wrong at any number of points, but
it never missteps, weaving a compelling, enchanting, often poignant
tale.  The critical element is the performance of stunningly beautiful
Garance Clavel, who is a delight as the adorable Chloe.  A relative
newcomer to film, Ms. Clavel's dazzling performance is completely
convincing and she makes sweet-faced Chloe a terrific, utterly
sympathetic protagonist for the film who is a joy to watch as we
follow her onscreen adventures.  A true revelation, Ms. Clavel is an
actor to watch out for in future projects.
The film profiles a set of completely affable characters who come to
Chloe's aid as she searches for her Gris-Gris.  Madame Renee enlists a
squad of fellow catsitters who set up checkpoints and passionately
scour the neighbourhood in search of the cat, phoning in to Chloe at
regular intervals with cat-watch updates.  In a very touching and
humourous subplot, good-hearted but hapless and slow-witted Djamel
(Zinedine Soualem) falls hopelessly into unrequited love with Chloe
while helping to try to find Gris-Gris, and consequently goes to great
lengths to try to find her pet and thereby win her heart.
Representative of the warm-hearted tone of WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY, the
frequency at which Djamel unexpectedly pops up in the film in search
of the cat is amusing while simultaneously sweet.  Mr. Clavel lovingly
depicts a cheerful, affectionate community with genuine camraderie in
his film, which both makes enjoyable viewing and also adds accentuates
the bittersweet element of this old neighbourhood's slow
disintegration in order to give way to the new.
WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY skillfully depicts Chloe's increasing realisation
of the emptiness in her life, with perhaps the two most effective
scenes being ones where Ms. Clavel has no dialogue - one where Chloe
is sent scurrying about on a fashion shoot at her unrewarding job, and
the other as she silently sits in her apartment listening to her
roommate in the throes of passion with a lover.  Her Chloe is such an
affectionate creation that the audience can't help but root for her
happiness, and that results in her clumsy, naive quest for
companionship becoming all the more compelling.  (The scene where
Michel advises her on which clothes to wear to a nightclub is a
particular standout.)
It is astonishing to consider how such a simple, unlikely concept can
act as the leaping board for such a compelling, airy film, but Mr.
Klapisch pulls it off splendidly with WHEN THE CAT'S AWAY; the film
is simultaneously fun, sweet, amusing, and touching. It's completely
engaging and satisfying - and I don't even *like* cats.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"At one point when berated and bloodied by her male military superior,
 Moore screams out a guttural invitation to him to enjoy partaking in the
 absorption of a certain anatomical member." - Dan Cox, VARIETY, on G.I. JANE

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The venerable LETHAL WEAPON franchise continues its frightful
   tailspin in this tired fourth installment, a formulaic entry whose
   sole apparent purpose is to reunite its familiar cast of characters
   and recycle their old shtick -- we've got Riggs (Mel Gibson) and
   Murtaugh (Danny Glover) squabbling like an old married couple (which,
   after eleven years of onscreen partnership, they more or less are),
   Leo Getz (Joe Pesci) throwing another hissy fit, Lorna (Rene Russo)
   kicking butt (while pregnant, yet), Murtaugh's family endangered
   *yet* again, action and pyrotechnics galore .. hey, it even has Riggs
   doing his signature weirdo arm-socket popping thing!
   Terrific, but haven't we seen this all before?  In the studio's mad
   rush to get the picture in the can -- LETHAL WEAPON 4 began filming
   in January and hit theatres by July, a breakneck pace for a
   heavy-duty star-driven studio flick -- it's clear that the idea was
   to churn out cookie-cutter material by simply dusting off the
   increasingly-sanitized cops the audience has grown to love.  Their
   escapades are all framed within some lazy excuse of a plot -- an
   uninspired piece of vapidity involving Chinese Triad members
   smuggling immigrants for slave labour -- which nobody takes very
   seriously, least of all the film's wisecracking characters.  The
   filmmakers' obvious smug inference is that reassembling the cast and
   running them through the usual series of hijinx *should* be
   sufficiently entertaining.  Familiarity breeds complacency, and
   apparently contempt.
   Well, it almost comes together.  The supporting cast accumulated from
   previous films are obligingly trotted out for requisite appearances,
   legitimately adding little to the mix other than a sense of assuring
   recognition.  My hopes were pinned upon the traditional infusion of
   new blood for this entry coming in the form of outrageous comedian
   Chris Rock (and given the series' growing reliance on jokey
   sensibilities, it was inevitable that a bonafide comic would
   eventually be cast), joining the fray as brash rookie cop Lee
   Butters.  Sadly, his formidable gifts are wasted here, stifled by the
   confines of his surprisingly straight character -- other than his
   eager-to-please relationship with Murtaugh, the film gives Butters
   has no personality of his own to speak of.
   The franchise's indelible appeal, for better or worse (and it's the
   latter if you ask me -- consider its devolution from an edgy action
   thriller centered on a fearlessly suicidal cop to a resolutely
   mainstream product where everybody seems ready to break out into
   group hugs), is the good-natured sense of camaraderie in sickening
   full display here.  From its action-packed opening to its photobook
   conclusion, LETHAL WEAPON 4 is a film *about* its characters -- this
   is, after all, a picture in which an explosive firefight with an
   armoured maniac actually serves as glossy window-dressing for scenes
   of character background and development -- and it's ultimately a
   showcase for the quintessential mismatched buddy team of Riggs and
   Murtaugh, trading quips as they bicker their way through the motions
   of cracking the case.  By now, they've become as all-American as
   apple pie, and the polished, engaging chemistry of their actor
   counterparts remains intact, but by this stage of the game, they're
   going through the motions.
   On the plus side, the film features a few inventively staged (albeit
   logically ludicrous) action sequences and some dynamic mano-a mano
   fight scenes courtesy of Hong Kong wunderkind Jet Li, but as the
   series creatively wheezes and sputters (an obvious tip-off: resorting
   to the use of a Cute Young Kid -- a typical death-knell), my
   idealistic side hopes that the filmmakers have the good sense to
   gracefully mothball the franchise after this picture.  My cynical,
   anything-for-a-buck side, on the other hand...
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
TITANIC (Paramount - 1997)
Starring Leonardo DiCaprio, Kate Winslet, Billy Zane, Kathy Bates,
  Frances Fisher, Gloria Stuart, Bill Paxton
Screenplay by James Cameron
Produced by James Cameron, Jon Landau
Directed by James Cameron
Running time: 194 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Well, it finally made it.  After wreaking havoc with summer film
   release schedules by missing its original release date, after
   overshooting its target and achieving notoriety as the most expensive
   film shoot in history, after bizarre mishaps and calamities during
   production (how often is it that the catering's laced with PCP,
   anyways?), James Cameron's mega-epic TITANIC has finally sailed into
   dock.  While in the months leading up to its release many curmudgeons
   decried its four-plus minute trailer, replete with soapy
   sentimentality and gun battle, I couldn't have disagreed more -- I
   found that the promotional footage splendidly whetted my appetite for
   the film with the promise of grand old-fashioned melodrama of the
   first order amidst a faithful re-creation of one of the most
   spectacular disasters in modern history.
   The first impression the film leaves is a striking one: as is
   typically the case in Mr. Cameron's productions, TITANIC is visual
   eye-candy.  The film's re-creation of the mighty R.M.S. Titanic is a
   stupendous achievement, convincingly colossal and breathtakingly
   majestic.  The sheer magnitude of the ship is immediately conveyed,
   and from the vessel's grimy, hellish, coal-ladened bowels to the
   lavish sets and extravagantly grandiose interiors of the stately
   ballrooms, the net effect is never less than stunning.  From the
   dazzling period costumes right down to minisculars like the woodwork
   and even ashtrays, the film's faithfulness to authenticity is
   impressively persuasive; it's if we're truly back in 1912 on board
   the ship's maiden voyage -- fine praise indeed.  The verisimilitude
   and grandeur of the finely-observed vessel is a marvel of modern-day
   filmmaking.
   No doubt about it -- the ship looks terrific, and the awesome
   duplication is emphasised by repeated matching dissolve shots between
   the sunken rusted carcass of the real-life boat and that of Mr.
   Cameron's cinematic creation, tiny people scurrying about on its
   deck.  Employing this technique, the splendour of his vision is
   dazzling, contrasting the submerged, dead vessel with the shining
   lustre of his Titanic, but soon wears thin after multiple match
   dissolves.
   Of course, as spectacular as his ship may be, it's not enough to
   cinematically resurrect the Titanic simply in order to sink it, and
   Mr. Cameron has consequently grafted a simplistic tale of romantic
   fiction onto the film, focusing upon two young characters:
   devil-may-care drifting artist Jack Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio), who
   won his steerage-class ticket back to America in a last-minute poker
   game (a silly but fairly effective plot device), and upper-class Rose
   DeWitt Butaker (Kate Winslet), onboard along with her domineering,
   class-conscious mother (Frances Fisher) and haughty, prosperous
   fiance Cal Hockley (Billy Zane).  As one can expect, the lovely Rose
   feels stifled by her mother's officiousness and is miserable about
   her engagement with the insufferable Cal -- so much so that only
   Jack's unexpected intervention prevents her from diving overboard one
   fateful evening.  The two begin an affair.
   While Mr. Cameron did weave a set of fictional characters for the
   ride on the Titanic, he didn't give them much depth; there's a lot of
   one-note characterization in the film, which is surprising coming
   from him given his impressive track record of creating involving,
   thoughtful characters in genres where it's usually considered an
   afterthought.  In TITANIC, villainous Cal Hockley is a snooty
   aristocrat who's, well, a snooty aristocrat, while our dashing hero
   Jack is hopelessly lovable.  Meanwhile, the film depicts all of the
   third-class passengers as the salt of the earth, while the
   first-class people are impossibly pompous and arrogantly
   class-conscious, except for the irrepressible "unsinkable" Molly
   Brown (Kathy Bates), whom, it is pointed out, is a third-classer at
   heart and in spirit.  Aspects of the Edwardian class struggle
   inundate themselves so fully into the film that by the time
   star-cross'd lovers Jack and Rose reject a dull first-class dinner
   party for a third-class romp in steerage (complete with fiddler), the
   point has already been clearly driven home.
   The characters in the film are essentially tired, cliched archetypes,
   but that's not necessarily detrimental, particularly in this case;
   indeed, such uncomplex characters lend themselves most handily to
   melodrama, where the more sharply-defined the division between good
   and evil, the better.  Let's see: we have the winning, scruffy,
   poor-but-good-hearted young hero with the spirited, beautiful heroine
   at his side; the hissable, sneering rich villain (with the haughty
   accent to boot) -- perfect, right?
   By all rights it should be, and yet the film is lacking that little
   extra push to drive it into full-fledged, unabashed melodrama; it's
   timidly toeing the water rather than plunging right in.  There's an
   intimate scene shared by Jack and Rose on the apex of the bow railing
   where she excitedly gasps, "I'm flying!"; it should be a
   spellbinding, dizzying moment, yet it somehow lacks a sense of
   rapturously wondrous magic that symbolises their passion.  Throughout
   the film, the score by James Horner fails to lend the emotional punch
   it so sorely requires; consider the effectiveness of his score in the
   last big-budget melodrama brought to the screen, LEGENDS OF THE FALL,
   and contrast with his nautical New Age hodgepodge here.
   One can certainly make an arguable case that Mr. DiCaprio and Ms.
   Winslet are the two best actors of their generation -- I can't
   imagine too many filmmakers frowning at the prospect of them in a
   cast list -- and landing them both for the film was a bonafide coup.
   Still, their performances in the film are at times somewhat tentative
   and reserved amidst all of the unblushing romanticism that Mr.
   Cameron's screenplay churns up; the melodrama of the piece is best
   served during the moments where they throw all caution to the wind
   and simply embrace the brazen sentimentality pervasive in the
   dialogue; I couldn't help from mentally coaxing "More ... more ...
   play it bigger!" during scenes where a more naturalistic acting
   stance was adopted.  Obviously, their respective performances remain
   more than serviceable, but I can't help from wondering how much more
   grand the net effect would be had the characters been portrayed as
   larger-than-life.  At one point, Rose gasps "This is where we first
   met!"; there should be an overflowing of emotion, pathos, and
   poignancy at her utterance, but the actual associative sentiment is
   rather hollow.
   The entire 1912 saga is framed by present-day intrigue involving
   Brock Lovett (Bill Paxton, a veteran on Mr. Cameron's films) and what
   appears to be the insufferable team from TWISTER transported
   underwater (when one yahoo quipped, "Oops, somebody left the water
   running," I hoped someone would toss him overboard) in search of an
   invaluable diamond.  The pursuit of Le Coeur de la Mer is a decidedly
   hokey plot device, but at least it brings the refined grace of Gloria
   Stuart, who plays Rose at age 101, and who narrates the flashbacks
   which comprise the bulk of the film.
   Although the film is primarily set over eighty years ago, Mr. Cameron
   takes great pains to ensure that it's not a stodgy period piece.
   There are dubious anachronisms incorporated in the story which
   blatantly serve to cater to present-day audiences: Jack and Rose
   engaged in spitting lessons, and lady Rose issuing The Finger, as
   well as crowdpleasing moments such as throwaway references to Picasso
   and Monet, Jack strutting faux-haughtily in a new tuxedo, and the
   utterance of various seriocomic one-liners.
   It takes a while for the iceberg to finally down the mighty ocean
   liner, but when it does, it's a one-of-a-kind spectacle and a triumph
   of visual effects.  Breathtakingly played out in approximate
   real-time, the cataclysmic death throes of the Titanic are
   astonishingly realistic.  To his credit, Mr. Cameron ensures that the
   logistics of the vessel's demise are clearly handled via the
   presentation of a computer simulation at the beginning of the film,
   removing any uncertainty about the technical manner of the sinking,
   and, if anything, adding a layer of dread to the entire affair.
   While the Titanic's swan song is undoubtedly the showstopping
   centerpiece of the film, the romance of the first half isn't left
   neglected; indeed, despite the fact that the troubles of our heroes
   are dwarfed by the magnitude of the ongoing catastrophe, the film
   resolutely continues to cut back to them.  More than any of the
   previous films which have dealt with the tragedy of the ship, this
   film specifically focuses on a small core of characters, and
   questionably shares equal amounts of screentime with the craft's
   apocalyptic destruction as it does with the fictionalized below-decks
   escape plot, involving handcuffs, blazing pistols, and countless
   shots of corridors flooding with water.  I felt that the balance
   should have been somewhat swayed; the interesting goings-on outside
   involving the boarding of the lifeboats, the barricading of the
   steerage-class, and the rapidly emerging realisation of the
   situation's gravity was far more fascinating.  (Mr. Cameron also
   continues to play out the class card well into the sinking, depicting
   many of the snooty rich people as being mildly irked by the
   inconvenience of being put on alert and even sending their assistants
   for tea.  Those dumb rich people.)
   The most earthshattering moment in the film is when the ship cracks
   apart and plunges perpendicularly into the icy depths of the
   Atlantic.  ("This is it!" shouts one character in a tone which rather
   distractingly belies excited anticipation more than fear.)  As the
   camera cranes up, revealing passengers vainly struggling to hold onto
   something -- anything -- and others sliding down the now-vertical
   deck of the ship, plummeting into the darkness of the churning water
   below, the vision is truly nightmarish.  There are a lot of terrific
   shots during the film's latter half -- a quick glimpse of a group of
   people floundering in the water like thrashing fish is particularly
   memorable -- but there's plentiful usage of easy sympathy devices --
   women clutching crying little children and the like.  In some
   respect, Mr. Cameron's helming of the human effect of the calamity is
   literally Spielberg-esque in its calculating nature.
   The film reaches emotional resonance in the wake of the disaster,
   which finds the two leads hitting their stride and acting their
   hearts out in a stirring scene of remarkable tenderness and
   poignancy.  It's a heartbreaking moment, and a fantastic payoff to
   the romantic angle in the film.
   TITANIC hinges upon the performances of its two leads, who are
   front-and-centre throughout the flick.  Ms. Winslet, sporting an
   excellent American accent here, has had a remarkable film career to
   date; save for her first Hollywood production, she's turned in one
   award-calibre performance after another.  She's good here, although
   she sadly lacks the vivacity which have marked her previous turns.
   (One is left wondering if her alleged unhappiness during the shoot
   drained her zeal.)  Mr. DiCaprio is saddled with a difficult role in
   the film -- a flawless, dreamy caricature; the man of every girl's
   dreams, and the man that every guy would like to be: dashing,
   handsome, adventurous, spirited.  He pulls it off well, but he's at
   his best in the film's dying moments as his character struggles to
   guide Rose to safety, displaying a remarkably steady and calming
   presence that belies his youthful vigour.
   When the concept for the project was being developed, it was pitched
   to the studios as "Romeo & Juliet onboard the Titanic" (and, to that
   ends, how incredibly apt it was that the most recent film incarnation
   of the Montague spawn was eventually cast as the dashing hero, wasn't
   it?).  TITANIC has the latter part down pat; if the former section
   were nearly as assured, we'd really have something.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"There was a six-year-old girl sitting near me, and she piped up 'That's
 Harvey Keitel' within seconds of the film's start.  I want to know what
 that kid's been seeing." - Charles Odell

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
(Columbia-Phoenix - 1996)
Starring Woody Harrelson, Courtney Love, Edward Norton, James Cromwell,
   Crispin Glover, James Carville, Brett Harrelson, Donna Hanover
Screenplay by Scott Anderson & Larry Karaszewski
Produced by Oliver Stone, Janet Yang, Michael Hausman
Directed by Milos Forman
Running time: 127 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
Milos Forman's first film since the ill-fated VALMONT, Columbia's THE
PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT, is a vastly entertaining (if not particularly
enlightening) biopic of Hustler publisher and self-made millionaire
Larry Flynt, who became an unlikely champion of freedom of speech rights
in the United States in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
The film unweaves its tale in a chronological order: we open with young
and dirt-poor Larry Flynt and his brother Jimmy, peddling jars of water
in true entrepreneurial spirit out in the rural outback of Kentucky.  Cut
to forward in time, where the two Flynt brothers, now young men, are
running the struggling Hustler Go-Go Clubs in Cincinnati.  The strip clubs
are in a dire financial state, and in a last-ditch effort to salvage the
operations, Flynt decides to go to a print shop and churn out a promotional
newsletter.  This evolved into the adult periodical _Hustler_ magazine,
creating Larry Flynt a vast financial empire, and the rest is history.
What sets Flynt apart from other publishers is his struggles against those
who would have him cease publication of his adult material, and who railed
and preached against him - Flynt spent time in incarceration and was
paralyzed by an assassination attempt - and his driven, single-minded
insistence to buck the system and fight for his freedom of expression,
regardless of personal cost.
THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT also weaves in the bittersweet story of Flynt's
true love, Althea Leasure, whom he meets as a dancer in his club and
later marries, and who devotedly stands alongside him throughout his
trials and tribulations.
Considering the serious nature of the film's theme - the importance of
the United States' First Amendment - THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT is
surprisingly and wonderfully light-hearted and humourous.  Much of the
comedy is elicited from Larry Flynt's outlandish stunts at his courtroom
appearances - some of his chosen apparel is hilarious - and for the most
part these elements of the film work far better than some of the more
dramatic points, such as an uninspiring Flynt monologue set at a Free
Speech rally in front of an enormous American flag dealing with the
subjectivity of obscenity.
The film's focus is on the Flynt's many battles over First Amendment
rights and freedom of speech, but the heart of THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT
is the touching love story between Flynt and Althea.  Larry Flynt is
shown as being occassionally gruff, harsh, and overtly aggressive with
his friends and colleagues, but with Althea, we see his loving, affectionate
side.  There's a scene where Flynt tenderly takes his ill wife on a ride
on his wheelchair that is heartbreaking.  Ultimately, the emotional power
that the film hits at its conclusion comes not from his achievements from
his battles against censors, but from the strength of Flynt and Althea's
love for each other.
Woody Harrelson is entirely engaging in what must be certainly a
career-topping performance as the irrepressible Larry Flynt.  Harrelson
plays Flynt with the right mixture of outrageousness and confident
stubborness to make him endearing and entirely sympathetic to the audience,
and a very compelling protagonist for the film.
Courtney Love plays Althea Leasure in a startling turn, completely raw
and impulsive.  It's a very solid performance, brash and naturalistic,
and Love is extremely compelling; it's difficult to take your eyes off
her onscreen, and her chemistry with Harrelson is dead-on.
Edward Norton, as Flynt's straight, level-headed lawyer is often upstaged
by his flashier co-stars in THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT, much as his
counterpart lawyer Alan Isaacman was upstaged by Flynt during many of the
courtroom scenes, but Norton shines in his big scene where he addresses
the Supreme Court in the climactic scene of the film.  One can sense the
frustration that Norton's character feels when Harrelson's free-talking
Flynt sabotages trial after trial on him by openly speaking his mind, and
this results in a heightened emotional punch when Norton's Isaacman has
the opportunity to sway the Supreme Court judges.
Milos Forman keeps the film moving - although it runs over two hours, it
never drags - and his direction of the film is very effective, eliciting
a great deal of empathy for a subject which could be construed by some as
extremely sordid and unsympathetic.  There's also a great visual technique
which Forman uses to indicate the passing of time in one shot, which is
both clever and extremely entertaining.
Two minor quibbles with the film - it certainly seems like THE PEOPLE VS.
LARRY FLYNT is in a rush to get to its main theme, with Flynt battling
against authorities and the system for his freedom of speech.  Consequently,
the first thirty minutes of the film, introducing and setting up the
characters, seem unduly rushed; perhaps it is merely due to the fact that
these characters are so interesting, but I felt it would have worked better
if this route was taken in a more leisurely fashion.  It also felt like
there was a distinctive lack of insight into the inner workings of these
characters - the film clearly shows what Flynt, Althea, Isaacman, and
Rev. Jerry Faldwell did, and on a superficial level some of their
motivations, but it never seemed like one could really understand the
characters on a deeper level.  For example, why Larry Flynt was compelled
by Ruth Carter Stapleton (President Carter's sister) to be born-again is
a mystery to me.  Then again, perhaps it was to him as well.
These two points don't detract greatly from the film.  THE PEOPLE VS.
LARRY FLYNT is certainly among the very best studio-released films of
1996, and works both as a ringing political statement about the importance
of freedom of speech and the depths to which Larry Flynt would go to
advance the cause of free expression, and as a touching love story.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
CAN'T HARDLY WAIT (Columbia - 1998)
Starring Jennifer Love Hewitt, Ethan Embry, Charlie Korsmo,
  Lauren Ambrose, Peter Facinelli, Seth Green
Screenplay by Deborah Kaplan & Harry Elfont
Produced by Jenno Topping, Betty Thomas
Directed by Deborah Kaplan & Harry Elfont
Running time: 98 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   The two niche film genres which roared to success in the 1980s only
   to be arguably overmined were the slasher flick and the teen comedy.
   As the genres reached the end of their respective heydays, it became
   clear that audiences grew tired of watching maniacs in ski masks
   hacking up young virgins, while the typical formula adhered to by
   teen comedies eventually devolved to a group of guys in
   alcohol-induced romps spying on nubile young women in showers.  The
   best films of the teen comedy genre, which CAN'T HARDLY WAIT clearly
   aspires to emulate, the SAY ANYTHINGs and the FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT
   HIGHs, exceeded this stupefying formula by being more observant and
   giving us more -- relevant characters we could care about, and
   indelible, resonant moments: can anyone soon forget the wonderfully
   poignant and emotionally powerful scene in SAY ANYTHING with John
   Cusack standing defiantly with his boombox hoisted overhead?
   There aren't any moments like this in CAN'T HARDLY WAIT, and in truth
   the film doesn't remotely approach the zenith of the genre, but it's
   a harmless, watchable piece with a few somewhat touching moments and
   sporadic funny bits amidst the all of the adolescent hijinx which
   comprise its bulk.  Originally titled THE PARTY (and renamed when MGM
   indicated plans to remake the 1968 Peter Sellers film of the same
   name), CAN'T HARDLY WAIT appropriately spends almost all of its
   ninety-eight minute running time at a raucous house party being held
   to celebrate the senior class graduation of Huntington Hills High
   School.  Here we meet the usual suspects -- the stunning prom queen
   Amanda Beckett (Jennifer Love Hewitt), the self-absorbed class jock
   Mike Dexter (Peter Facinelli), the socially-inept class braniac
   William Lichter (Charlie Korsmo), the self-styled hipster Kenny
   Fisher (Seth Green), and, in a nod to SAY ANYTHING's John Cusack and
   Lili Taylor, our lovelorn chief protagonist Preston Meyers (Ethan
   Embry) and his faithful sardonic friend Denise Fleming (Lauren
   Ambrose); give her a guitar and him some kickboxing moves, and the
   homage would be complete.  Preston has been mooning over Amanda since
   he first saw her four years ago, and with she being unceremoniously
   dropped by her longtime boyfriend Mike and this being his last night
   in town before heading off to a Boston college, he's convinced that
   the fates are aligned in his favour (the incongruous broadcast of
   Barry Manilow's "Mandy" on the radio is a cincher) and heads to the
   party, Denise in tow, in order to win Amanda's heart.
   The motives of the other major characters are decidedly less
   poignant.  Mike, dumping Amanda in his plan to upgrade to college
   women, is out to convince members of his clique to do likewise to
   their high school girlfriends.  William seeks vengeance on Mike for
   years of torment and ridicule in school, and, in the film's most
   misconceived subplot, devises an ridiculous revenge fantasy involving
   chloroform and Polaroids.  And Kenny, who winds up revealing his true
   colours as a poseur, is simply looking -- desperately so -- for some
   action.  The many other characters which populate the party are
   cardboard-thin in depth and accordingly sport names such as Girl
   Whose Party It Is and Exchange Student.  (Melissa Joan Hart of
   SABRINA, THE TEENAGE WITCH makes an impression as the overly zestful
   Yearbook Girl.)
   The cut-loose antics at the crowded, energetic party, in all its
   picture-defacing, furniture-destroying, beer-swilling glory, is at
   times amusing to watch and is supported by an entertaining
   soundtrack, but the film improves when it shifts its focus away from
   the teeming masses of revellers and towards its detached primary
   characters.  Denise and Kenny are the furthest removed from the
   festivities, literally isolated in a locked bathroom by an accidental
   mishap which eventually leads to a extended session of THE BREAKFAST
   CLUB-styled soul-searching and meditation, but almost all of the
   other characters are in some form similarly set apart from the party:
   Amanda mopes through the celebration in the haze of an identity
   crisis, while Mike stumbles about in confusion as he learns that his
   influence over his friends isn't strong enough to overcome their
   hormones.  Meanwhile, Preston wanders around on the brink of the
   ongoing chaos, trying to summon up the courage to present Amanda with
   his heartfelt love letter.
   The screenplay by Harry Elfont and Deborah Kaplan, who also shared
   direction duties, is at times unforgivably lazy -- there are two
   separate occasions where, having presumably written themselves into a
   wall, summon up an incidental character (cameoed by recognizable
   faces such as Jerry O'Connell as a one-time highschool bigshot and
   Jenna Elfman as an ersatz roadside angel) to essentially tell their
   characters what to do next -- but there are moments of cleverness in
   the film, and CAN'T HARDLY WAIT captures the sheer purity of
   Preston's adolescent longing, when the love for a girl is so
   overwhelming that it's the only thing that matters in the world.
   The film's young cast fares well in the film.  Mr. Embry conveys his
   character's dreamy-eyed nature well, while Ms. Hewitt is attractive
   and convincing as his dreamgirl.  Ms. Ambrose is given the most
   complex character and the sharpest dialogue, and acquits herself
   nicely.  Mr. Green's character undergoes the biggest character arc
   in the film, and surprises in his ability to draw audience empathy.
   CAN'T HARDLY WAIT concludes in the way that many films of the genre
   do, with freeze-frame shots of its central characters as superimposed
   text appears at the bottom of the screen spelling out their
   respective eventual fates.  As the final shots of the film unrolled,
   I sunk in my seat -- this device usually leads to a series of glib
   one-liners that typically aren't either clever nor funny.  While this
   rule-of-thumb holds mostly true here, the final three lines, perfect
   in their simplicity, conclude the film on just the right note.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Title
Review for Grace of My Heart (1996)
(Gramercy - 1996)
Starring Illeana Douglas, John Turturro, Matt Dillon, Eric Stoltz,
   Bruce Davison, Patsy Kensit, Jennifer Leigh Warren
Screenplay by Allison Anders
Produced by Ruth Charny and Dan Hassid
Directed by Allison Anders
Running time: 115 minutes
Everyone is at least partially familiar with some of the infectuous
pop ditties from the 1960s and the singers that churned them out, but
how many people can name the songwriters of tunes of this ilk?
Allison Anders' newest feature, GRACE OF MY HEART, tells the story of
an aspiring-singer-turned-songwriter from this era, and follows her
through the ups and downs, from doo-wop to Woodstock.
Edna Buxton, played by Illeana Douglas, comes from an upper-class
Philadelphia family.  After her rendition of "Hey There" wins her a
local talent contest, whose prizes include a trip to New York and a
recording contract, we next see her plodding from one audition to
another in the Big Apple; her 'recording contract' prize has conveniently
dissipated, and she's desperate to make it as a singer.  One audition
doesn't go particularly well - the public wants male singers, she's
told - but the producer takes pity on her and introduces Edna to Joel
Millner, played by John Turturro, who becomes her manager.  There's
a catch: Joel wants Edna to write songs for his other artists to sing,
not her.  Edna, now given the working name Denise Waverly ("Edna: that's
a terrible name" opines Joel), grudging accepts her role as a songwriter
and is put to work in a small office in the famous songwriting
hothouse, the Brill House.  Her songs become chart-toppers and make
other artists stars, but throughout the years and a number of
relationships, Edna never gives up on her dream to make her own records.
A number of men pass through Edna's life: Howard, a fellow songwriter
at the Brill House played by Eric Stoltz, who writes sociopolitical
tunes and is content to ride on the hot coattails of 'Denise'; a
kind-hearted (and married) radio disk jockey played by Bruce Davison;
Jay, played by Matt Dillon as a surf-rocker clearly based upon the
Beach Boys' Brian Wilson.  There's also a rival songwriter, Cheryl,
played by Patsy Kensit.
Illeana Douglas gives a solid performance in the lead role of GRACE OF
MY HEART.  Probably best known for her role opposite Matt Dillon (again)
in Gus Van Sant's TO DIE FOR (1995), or for losing part of her face
courtesy of Robert DeNiro in Martin Scorsese's CAPE FEAR (1991),
Douglas is in virtually every scene of the film, and it's through her
eyes that we see the music and culture scene change in America throughout
the 1960s.
There's a lot of offbeat casting in the film.  John Turturro catches
the feel of the jumpy, fasttalking, and ultimately good-hearted Joel
Millner, although his various hairpieces in the film are in themselves
utterly entertaining.  While Davison works perfectly as a mild-mannered,
kind radio DJ, the use of Matt Dillon as a surf musician is bizarre;
it's amusing to watch him lip synch to music while carrying a surf
board.  He's not bad in the film, mind you - it just seems completely
incongruous.  This is the second time Dillon has played a musician -
some may remember his performance on the other extreme of the musical
spectrum as a grunge rocker in Cameron Crowe's SINGLES (1992) - and
again he seems out of place.  Bridget Fonda (in a cameo role), however,
is perfectly realized as a teen ingenue.
GRACE OF MY HEART takes a very interesting approach to its music,
which of course plays an integral part of the film.  Rather than
recycling pop music from that era, original songs were commisioned
by Anders from various pop artists to recreate the sound of the 1960s,
and the end result sounds completely authentic and may very well be
the strongest element of the film.  The music in the first third of
the film, in particularly, sounds completely in step with the early
1960s.  Anders also seems to make no attempt to hide the fact that
her star actors are lip-synching their vocals during their performances
in the film, which ends up making the film a bit more goofy yet somehow
more fun to watch. (Curiously, Kensit, who actually is a vocalist,
does no singing in the film.)
GRACE OF MY HEART is a very episodic film.  Like MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS,
which also traces popular music over a span of decades, Anders' film
can clearly be segmented into specific vignettes.  It often has the
feel of a shmaltzy TV-movie, full of melodrama that really isn't that
dramatic nor unpredictable.  Does Edna get to record her own music?
What do you think?
However, underneath all the goofiness - the gleeful references to
the lingo (I haven't heard the term 'far out' this often in years),
hippie communes and other cultural oddities of the time, the
hairstyles and fashion - GRACE OF MY HEART has a certain underlying
charm about it that makes it likeable.  Allison Anders has been
acclaimed as an independent filmmaker, but with this film, she steps
firmly into mainstream soil.  GRACE OF MY HEART should be an
audience-pleaser, but with a lead with as low a profile as Douglas
(not to mention a God-awful print campaign), it may be a tough sell
to get the audiences into the theatre.

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   Nobody in Hollywood could have been more pleased with the scientific
   breakthrough announced earlier this year that British researchers had
   performed the first successful cloning of a live sheep than those at
   Sony Pictures associated with the GATTACA project.  In terms of
   timing, such news couldn't have been more perfectly orchestrated,
   bringing to the forefront of public awareness the increasing
   sophistication in the science of genetic research over the past
   decade.  When one combines this with the rampant paranoia and
   mistrust of the government pervasive in popular culture -- the number
   of conspiracy-oriented books lining shelves in stores and the success
   of similarly-themed TV show THE X-FILES is indication enough -- it's
   the perfect climate for the release of a film like GATTACA, which
   profiles a dystopic world of the future where one's DNA is the most
   crucial and valuable commodity.
   Yet, like most great science-fiction, the strength of GATTACA is that
   the film really isn't exclusively a science-fiction film -- at its
   core, it's a very human and often poignant story which deals with the
   themes of potential, spirit and identity.  There's no heavy reliance
   on showy visual effects or displays of stunning future technology, as
   is typical in most sci-fi films; GATTACA is essentially a
   character-oriented drama spun off from a dynamite premise.
   It's the not-too-distance future, and scientific advancements have
   reached an advanced state where genetic tinkering allows the rich to
   create offspring literally devoid of any imperfection. Society has
   been divided into two distinct classes, where success is determined
   by science: the genetically-engineered 'Valids', and the
   naturally-conceived 'In-Valids' who are limited by society due to
   their imperfect DNA structures to serve as working drones.  It's a
   world where prosperity is predetermined at birth; the Valids have the
   world at their feet -- an infinite realm of possibilities to pursue
   -- while the In-Valids have nary a reason to hope.  So what's Vincent
   Freeman (Ethan Hawke), an In-Valid with nearsightedness, emotional
   volatility and a congenital heart condition, to do?  Burdened his
   whole life by living in the shadow of his Valid brother Anton (Loren
   Dean), and by his seemingly-unfulfillable ambition to become an
   aeronautics navigator for the elite Gattaca Aerospace Corporation,
   he's left toiling as a maintenance worker, eyes aimed upwards at the
   stars.
   Of course, Vincent is not content to passively accept his fate, and
   GATTACA, then, is essentially an Underdog Film -- a familiar One Man
   Against Society story.  On that level it works well, but where the
   film truly flourishes is when it focuses upon Vincent's indomitable
   determination to surpass expectations and push himself to the
   boundaries of physical limitation in order to attain his dream,
   against all forms of adversity.  His relentless drive to succeed in a
   near-suicidal, virtually hopeless piece of subterfuge is powerfully
   affecting.  Aided immeasurably by Michael Nyman's stirring score --
   to date, the best score I've heard this year -- it's a genuinely
   moving celebration of the human spirit, while avoiding the trappings
   of becoming schmaltzy or sentimental.
   In fact, New Zealander screenwriter-director Andrew Nicol's feature
   debut is such an auspicious piece of work that it's mildly
   disheartening that the film delves into a generic thriller subplot,
   dealing with a murder mystery on the grounds of the Gattaca Aerospace
   Corporation.  While this successfully taps into paranoiac elements --
   given that Vincent's true identity can be traced through any form of
   DNA residue left, it's entrancing to observe his ritualistic grooming
   each morning to attempt to mask his true identity, and fascinating to
   watch him attempt to cover his tracks by stealthily vacuuming his
   desk and leaving decoy DNA samples (it reminded me in a sense to the
   great moment in WAIT UNTIL DARK where Alan Arkin's Harry Roat Jr.
   markedly pointed out that he hadn't *touched* anything in Susie's
   apartment) -- it also leaves gaping holes in logic which push
   credibility beyond the bounds of belief; consider, if you will, wily
   Detective Hugo (the aforementioned Mr. Arkin) unable to match a
   completely undisguised Vincent against a clearly-identical headshot
   image -- perhaps *Hugo* is nearsighted too.  The murder mystery
   flounders, adding very little to enhance GATTACA and distracts from
   the film's primary theme, but it doesn't sink it.
   Another vaguely ineffective subplot in GATTACA involves fellow
   Gattaca Aerospace Corporation trainee Irene, a genetically perfect
   woman (Uma Thurman - 'nuff said) who provides an interesting
   counterpoint to Vincent in terms of their approaches to adversity,
   but generally serves merely a decorative role in the film.
   Among its arsenal of strengths (crisp, sharp visuals by
   cinematographer Slawomir Idziak; wonderful costumes by the legendary
   Colleen Atwood), GATTACA benefits from superb casting.  Mr. Hawke is
   very solid and sympathetic as the undaunted protagonist and
   demonstrates that he can carry the film, while Ms. Thurman makes what
   she can out of her smallish role.  And who else would one cast as the
   authority figure in the enormous future techno-bureaucracy of the
   Gattaca Aerospace Corporation other than Gore Vidal?
   The standout performance in the film, however, belongs to Jude Law.
   His performance of the crippled Valid unable to fulfill his
   predestined greatness, Jerome Morrow, is a remarkable combination of
   pathos, wit, and quiet resilience and strength, and his subtle
   blurring of the lines of identity between himself and Vincent is
   interesting.  The strange, symbiotic relationship between Jerome and
   Vincent is fascinating and compelling, and Mr. Law and Mr. Hawke play
   well off one another.
   While Jan Roelfs' top-notch production design assists in creating a
   dystopic and conformist world, the ultimate credit must go to Mr.
   Nicol.  His screenplay is intelligent, thoughtful, and well-written,
   and his direction is most accomplished.  The impressive GATTACA marks
   a science-fiction film which eschews effects and explosions in favour
   of a more fundamentally human story, and succeeds wonderfully.  While
   the world depicted in the film is cool, distance, and impersonal, at
   the heart of the picture is real warmth.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"The separate forms of social behaviour that we associate with film and
 television are also starting to break down..." - Jonathan Rosenbaum, 1979

Title
Review for Kissed (1996)
Starring Molly Parker, Peter Outerbridge, Jay Brazeau, Natasha Morley
Screenplay by Angus Fraser and Lynne Stopkewich, based on the short
   story by Barbara Gowdy
Produced by Dean English and Lynne Stopkewich
Directed by Lynne Stopkewich
Running time: 78 minutes
It's tough to make a thoughtful and tasteful film about a taboo
subject like necrophilia, rather than simply taking the easy way
out via an exploitation film or going for shock value.  Eschewing
a brazenly outrageous or exploitive tact on the film's decidedly
taboo subject matter, Lynne Stopkewich's first feature film
KISSED is a magnificent, beautiful piece of work, wonderfully
written, acted, and shot.
Even as a child, Sandra Larson (played by Natasha Morley as a child;
Molly Parker portrays the adult Sandra) is fascinated by the beauty
and stillness of death, collecting dead rodents and other small
animals from the woods in order to perform intricate rituals.
Sandra strips, dances, and lovingly caresses the dead animals
against herself in order to claim their essence before carefully
burying them.
Years pass, but Sandra's interest remains.  Quitting her job at a
flower shop, she gets a job at a funeral parlour and studies embalming.
She gets a boyfriend too, Matt (played by Peter Outerbridge), a
young medical student taking some time off.  When Sandra reveals
her secret to him, Matt's reaction is not that of disgust or horror,
but curiousity.  His passion for Sandra eventually spins out of
control, leading to an inevitable conclusion which is poetic and
poignant.
Molly Parker gives a sensational performance as Sandra.  With her
photogenic freckled features and natural screen presence, she makes
a compelling, engaging lead, and her take on her character is intriguing.
Sandra is, for all intents and purposes, the girl next door (albeit
a little quiet and withdrawn) with a striking little character quirk.
Parker's dreamy narration throughout KISSED perfectly suits the tone
of the film, and her timid mannerisms are wonderfully executed.  She's
a real revelation.
The screenplay for KISSED is wonderfully written - sparse, well-paced,
classy, and very clever.  There are well-timed moments of dry humour,
such as many of the scenes with Sandra's funeral parlour boss, and
in an argument Sandra has with Matt, where she blurts out "I don't
fuck everything that's dead!"  It's particularly impressive that
the screenwriters didn't succumb to the temptation to get overly
clever with the plot, and allowed the film to flow to its natural
conclusion.
Stopkewich's poised direction of the film is first-rate and demonstrates
remarkable proficiency for a debut feature. The film was clearly
lovingly crafted, with virtually every shot well laid out; it's a
stunningly beautiful film to watch.  There's an incredibly surreal
feel to the film, aided in part by the cool lighting as shot by
cinematographer Gregory Middleton, and the music for KISSED, as
handled by Don MacDonald, is orchestrated perfectly.
KISSED simply will not be to everyone's taste.  Despite being a
completely tasteful film, there will be those who simply will not
accept a film whose lead character is a necrophiliac, and will have
the preconceived notion of a groteseque, disturbing film.  My
condolesences go to them, as they're missing a great movie.  I'm
keeping my eyes out for Lynne Stopkewich's next project.
